Captain, I trust you won't mind if we're present while you open the cargo.
What does that device do?
This measures the individual portions.
What's the dosage?
Point zero one millilitres.
Very potent substance.
We've improved our distillation process over the years.
In my grandfather's day, the same amount of felicium would have filled five rooms this size.
But now with our improved processes, this one barrel contains over four billion doses.
I would estimate four billion, three hundred seventy five million
Thank you, Mister Data.
How long is the dosage effective?
It varies with the individual.
But never more than seventy two hours.
And then the symptoms return.
Yes. Unfortunately, there is no cure for the plague.
But felicium inhibits the sickness with total efficiency.
Allowing the Ornarans to lead normal lives.
An unusual disease. Virulent, extremely persistent, yet I can't isolate it.
The plague has baffled doctors on both planets for two hundred years.
We've therefore concentrated on treatment, finding new ways to improve the potency and purity of felicium.
No doubt you have applied your technology from other industries to the refinement of this product.
We have no other industry.
None at all?
We don't need any. The Ornarans provide us everything we need in exchange for this.
Fascinating. Your society is dedicated exclusively to the production of a single product.
A product for which you have no use, but which the Ornarans can't live without.
One of the little ironies of life, Captain.
But one we'd be fools not to take advantage of. It's mutually beneficial.
The Ornarans provide us with the necessities of life, and we provide them with the necessities of living. It is a fair exchange.
Interesting relationship.
Excuse me. I'll take that to Sickbay.
Can I help?
T'JON:No.
Hurry up!
You're feeling better?
T'JON:Yes, thank you. I'm fine now.
Come.
Doctor.
I may not know felicium's full effect on Ornarian physiology, but I know how to interpret physical reactions.
Are the Ornarans recovering?
T'Jon and Romas are feeling fine. In fact, too fine. Felicium's a narcotic.
Then T'Jon, and Romas, indeed everyone on their world?
Is a drug addict.
I think you'll find it's a fascinating tale that we've come across here, Captain.
You've piqued my interest, Number One. Please continue.
Data, what have we got?
Beginning several thousand years ago, the two worlds took different paths. Ornara became technologically sophisticated, Brekka did not. Then two hundred years ago, Ornara was stricken by a devastating plague.
Their advanced technology could provide no solution.
Somehow, and there is limited information on this point, the cure was found in a plant indigenous to only Brekka, and which resisted all attempts at cultivation on Ornara.
In any case, a trading situation developed which still exists.
A nice arrangement for the Brekkians.
And for the Ornarans. Without the medicine, they would all die.
No they wouldn't. Despite what the Ornarans have been saying, it's not a medicine. It was a medicine, but it cured the plague two hundred years ago. The plague is irrelevant now. It doesn't exist.
Then why are they so desperate for the felicium?
It's an addiction. The physical and psychological need is very real.
Thank you.
What are you going to do?
Based on what we know so far, there's nothing I can do.
You don't think drug addiction and exploitation is sufficient cause to do something?
This situation has existed for a very long time. These two societies are intertwined in a symbiotic relationship.
With one society profiting at the expense of the other.
That's how you see it.
I can synthesise a non-addictive substitute which will ease their withdrawal symptoms.
No, I can't do that either.
You can't let them have the felicium.
Why? Because it offends against our sensibilities? It is not our mission to impose Federation or Earth values on any others in the galaxy.
Well in this case, Captain, I disagree, one hundred percent.
Captain, I'm receiving a call from Ornara. The signal is ragged, but I think I can put it on the viewscreen.
Do it.
I'm Margan. Are my people on board your ship?
Some of them, yes.
May I speak to them?
Yes. Lieutenant Yar, have the Ornarans brought in. No, wait, I don't want them to have access to the Bridge. We will contact you in a few minutes.  I will continue this in the guest quarters. Commander, Doctor.
Data, I can understand how this could happen to the Ornarans. What I can't understand is why anyone would voluntarily become dependent on a chemical.
Voluntary addiction to drugs is a recurrent theme in many cultures.
Wesley, no one wants to become dependent. That happens later.
But it does happen. So why do people start?
On my home planet, there was so much poverty and violence, that for some the only escape was through drugs.
How can a chemical substance can provide an escape.
It doesn't, but it makes you think it does. You have to understand, drugs can make you feel good. They make you feel on top of the world. You're happy, sure of yourself, in control.
But it's artificial.
It doesn't feel artificial until the drug wears off. Then you pay the price. Before you know it, you're taking the drug not to feel good, but to keep from feeling bad.
And that's the trap?
All you care about is getting your next dosage. Nothing else matters.
I guess I just don't understand.
Wesley, I hope you never do.
Lieutenant Yar, we're ready in the guest quarters.
T'Jon. Have you got it?
T'JON:Well, it's here, but
You've got to get it to us. T'Jon, please. We're dying down here. You don't know. It's worse than it's ever been before.
T'JON:I'm doing everything I can. You see, what happened was
Stop! I can't listen any more! T'Jon, there are so many people here. So much suffering. We need the medicine. You've got to get it to us. I can't go on. Help, T'Jon. Please.
I'm sorry.
T'JON:You will take us to our planet and leave us there with our medicine or this person dies. Don't you see I have no choice? We were sent to bring the felicium back. The suffering on my planet is too great. People are dying. It doesn't matter whether we're entitled to it or not. We must have it.
Let him go.
T'JON:You will take us there now, or give us a shuttle. But we must have the medicine. If you refuse, this person will die.
I will not be coerced.
T'JON:I will do it. I will kill him.
No. No, you won't. You're not a killer.
T'JON:Help us, please. Help us.
I'm not sure that I can.
My insides are still shaking, but I'm all right.
Captain Picard, could I see you a moment?
I'll stay here.
Come with me, Doctor. This could be interesting.
We have thought about this a great deal.
We both of us feel deeply about what is happening on Ornara.
Although it is going to cause hardship to us and to our people, we have decided to give the felicium to them.
They can pay whenever they are able.
We don't want to be the ones responsible for their suffering.
There goes the other shoe. They know.
What do they know?
They know that the Ornarans no longer have the plague. They know that felicium is no longer a medicine. So, of course, they are willing to give this shipment because they don't want to take the chance that the Ornarans will lose their addiction. They don't want to lose their only customers.
How would they have known all that, unless the plague had once infected their world as well.
They were infected. They used the felicium to cure themselves, but somehow their ancestors realised that it was a narcotic.
They broke the cycle of addiction and never told the Ornarans. They let them continue to believe that without the felicium they would die.
I think it's worse than that. My guess is this refining process of which you are so proud
is only to increase the potency of the felicium and tighten your grip!
What are you going to do?
Are you going to tell them?
No. I'm bound by the rules of the United Federation of Planets, which order me not to interfere with other worlds, other cultures. If I were to tell them any of this, I would violate that Prime Directive.
But you are talking to us about it.
This is information you already know. And so nothing has changed.
If you can't interfere, then you are going to allow the Ornarans to have the felicium?
Yes, I am.
No! Don't do it. Jean-Luc, this is not a symbiotic relationship. This is exploitation, pure and simple! The Brekkians have caused all of this suffering and hardship only to make their pitiful lives easier! And all of it based on a lie. No, deny them this shipment. It is the least we can do.
From the moment they agreed to give them the felicium, my hands were tied.
You are absolutely right, Captain. It's not your business.
T'JON:Are these the spare parts for our freighters?
They look complicated.
T'JON:Are they already?
Aligned?
T'JON:Right.
You'd have to ask the Captain.
Captain Picard, we've arrived at Ornara and assumed standard orbit.
Acknowledged. Thank you.
T'JON:Captain, please. My planet is suffering.
We beg you to give us our medicine.
The matter is already decided. You're beaming down to your world with the felicium.
T'JON:Great.
I knew it. I knew you'd help us.
T'JON:We thank you.
Don't thank me. Sobi and Langor, they decided to let you have it.
We'll discuss the payment terms later.
In the mean time, there's no need to deprive you of your needed medicine.
T'JON:That's terrific.
I'm sure we can come to a fair deal for payment.
May we beam down with you and discuss it?
T'JON:Of course.
You are quite welcome on Ornara.
We appreciate your hospitality.
T'JON:And Captain, we appreciate your gift of the coils.
Once our freighters are fixed, everything'll be back to normal.
No.
T'JON:No?
The coils stay here.
What about our freighters?
You want to repair them, you'll have to learn to do it yourselves.
T'JON:We can't.
If you don't help us, our ships will soon be inoperable.
Quite possibly.
If you withhold those coils, you'll be disrupting the stability of both our planets.
And interfering with a trade arrangement that has lasted for generations! What of your Prime Directive?
In this situation, Prime Directive prohibits me from helping you.
That's absurd!
You did not think so when it worked in your favour.
Do you want our world to suffer?
Oh no, I don't want that.
T'JON:Without the freighters, there will be no more shipments of felicium. We will die.
You must trust yourselves. There are other options.
Ensign, prepare to beam our guests and their cargo down to Ornara.
T'JON:Captain, I hope you realise what you've done to us.
Of that you can be sure. Good luck.
Main Bridge.
When the Felicium runs out, the people of Ornara will suffer horrible withdrawal pains.
No doubt, but they will pass.
That seems so cruel. We could have made their burden easier.
Could we have? Perhaps in the short term. But to what end? Hold. Beverly, the Prime Directive is not just a set of rules. It is a philosophy, and a very correct one. History has proved again and again that whenever mankind interferes with a less developed civilisation, no matter how well intentioned that interference may be, the results are invariably disastrous.
It's hard to be philosophical when faced with suffering.
Believe me, Beverly, there was only one decision.
I just hope it was the right one.
And we may never know. Resume.
Mister La Forge, take us out of orbit.
Destination, sir?
I don't care. Let's just get some distance between us and this system.
Aye, sir. Course nine seven zero mark three one eight. Speed, warp three.
Where will that take us, Mister La Forge?
The Opraline system.
An interesting choice. Why?
Curiosity. We've never been there.
Engage.
All right, Commander. You've got till your next birthday to get that right.
Some things improve with age. Maybe your trombone playing will be one of them.
It's candle time, birthday boy.
So, what did you wish for, Will?
Music lessons.
Mister Data, we must hurry or we'll miss Commander Riker's party.
Sir. I find it interesting how much importance humans place on celebrating the day of their birth. A day they cannot possibly remember.
Captain, I am detecting some unusual fluctuations in subspace frequencies.
You'd better take a look at it, Mister Data.
It appears we are being probed, sir.
Source?
The third planet of the Alpha Onias system. Our reports list it as presently uninhabited. Perhaps reports were incorrect, sir.
Maybe the rumours of a secret Romulan base in this sector are true. Picard to Commander Riker.
I apologise for interrupting your celebration, but I'm going to need an away team. Could you report to the Bridge, please?
Although Alpha Onias three is a class M planet, our survey teams have listed it as barren and inhospitable.
Any life signs?
No, sir, but we have traced residual energy readings to a cavern two kilometres beneath the surface.
Romulans?
It is possible.
I suppose you'll just have to go down there and find out.
Geordi, Worf, you're with me.
Number One. Happy birthday.
I'm detecting high levels of volcanic gases. Sulphur dioxide, methane, hydrogen sulphide.
Toxic?
We're okay for now, but I wouldn't want to spend my vacation here.
What about energy readings?
Magnetic clutter is increasing. I cannot make an accurate determination.
Same here, Commander. I'm getting a lot of confusing readings here,
Commander Riker, please acknowledge.
Riker here.
We're having trouble reading you.
And we are having similar difficulties reading you. I am advising you and your away team
to transport up at once.
That's good advice, Commander. We've got a sudden build up of gases here, especially methane.
Transporter Room.
Take us up.
I can't get a solid lock on you, sir. Too much interference.
I'm trying again.
Transporter room, what's happening?
Report.
I'm trying again, sir.
Doctor Crusher, he's awake.
Beverly?
Will. You remember me. That's good. What else do you remember, Captain?
Captain?
Water, three Celsius. How do you feel?
Confused.
That's understandable, considering what's happened.
What has happened? What happened to Sickbay? To you? To me?
Sit down, Captain.
Captain? I am Commander William T Riker. What is going on here?
Sit. Please. What is the last thing that you remember clearly?
Alpha Onias three. The Enterprise had been probed. Geordi, Worf, and I transported down to track the source.
But all you found there was toxic gas. They barely had time to get the three of you out. Will, that happened sixteen years ago.
That's not possible.
With an Altarian virus, anything is possible. In fact, we've been expecting this.
Could you be more specific?
That day on Onias three, you were infected with a strain of Altarian encephalitis, a retrovirus that incorporates its DNA directly into the cells of its host. It can lie dormant for many years and then suddenly become active again, as it did in your case ten days ago. You have been in a coma, delirious. Your fever finally broke this morning.
But what happened to my memory?
Let me show you a scan of your brain tissue. When the encephalitis became active it caused widespread synapse degradation, interrupting the consolidation of your memory patterns.
Doctor.
Will, this virus inevitably causes memory loss back to the moment of the original infection. In your case, all the way back to Alpha Onias three.
I don't believe this. Is this a dream?
Feel my hand. It is flesh and bone. This is not a dream and you are, in fact, Captain William T. Riker in command of the Enterprise.
The Enterprise. For how long?
Nine years.
If I have lost my memory, how do I get it back?
Memories are formed by association. Smells, sounds, and images from the present could possibly trigger them.
Like a song reminds you of an old friend.
Exactly. In associational therapy, we expose the patient to familiar surroundings. This could stimulate the brain's neural synapses into regenerating.
Then let's get started. There's nothing more familiar than the Enterprise. Maybe that'll bring back some
Will, I said your memory could return. In many of these cases the damage is permanent.
What about Geordi and Worf? Were they infected too?
Thankfully, no. Geordi appears to have been immune and the Klingons don't seem to be affected by the virus.
Speaking of Klingons
There've been quite a few changes on the Enterprise in the last sixteen years.
Deck eight.
Belay that order.
We should begin the associational therapy in your quarters. Personal recollections are always the most vivid.
My life was on the main Bridge. Always has been. If anything's going to jog my memory. Main Bridge.
Repeat command.
I said main Bridge.
Computer's been slow all morning. A processing accelerator's down. Commander La Forge has running a level one diagnostic to isolate the problem.
Geordi.
Oh, it's good to see you up and about again, sir.
Your eyes. What happened to your visor?
My visor? I'm sorry, sir. Doctor Crusher told us that you might not remember. I haven't need a visor since I got these cloned implants, Captain.
Captain.
Welcome back, Captain. We were not expecting to see you on the Bridge so soon.
Commander Data. You're my First Officer?
Do you remember, sir?
Data, I haven't remembered a day for the last sixteen years.
Captain, warbird uncloaking.
On screen.
Shields up. Red alert.
Captain, we were expecting the Decius. There is no cause for alarm.
Cancel red alert. Clearly I need to be briefed.
Captain, the Decius is hailing us. The Admiral wishes to speak to you.
On screen.
Will.
Admiral Picard. Deanna.
How are you feeling?
I've felt better.
Not surprising. Altarian viruses can be a nasty business.
That's an understatement. I can't even
We'll discuss this after we've transport over. Picard out.
Transporter room six.
How are you holding up?
I could get used to the idea of a Ferengi ensign, but Admiral Picard on a Romulan warbird? What is that all about?
I think I should leave all the explanations to the Admiral.
Whenever you're ready, Chief.
Captain Riker. it's good to see you have recovered.
I'm not exactly sure you can call it a recovery, sir.
Then there has been some memory loss.
How much?
Everything since Alpha Onias three.
To lose sixteen years. It's almost beyond belief.
I have trouble believing it myself.
It's overwhelming to have so much of your life missing.
And it couldn't have happened at a worse time. A few more days of relatively simple negotiations, and the treaty will be signed.
What negotiations? What treaty?
Sorry. I'll start at the beginning, which is four years ago. A Romulan battle cruiser strayed into Federation space. Its warp coils had collapsed, life support was failing.
You saved them, Will, you and the Enterprise.
The Romulans were impressed, to say the least. After years of distrust and conflict, they started to talk. You were our key spokesman in securing the alliance with the Romulans.
How far have these negotiations progressed?
The preliminaries are over. All we need do now is escort the Romulan Ambassador to the final session.
Where you will complete the negotiations and sign the treaty.
Captain. Admiral. I am in no condition to negotiate with the Romulans or with anyone else.
Will, you're sound of mind and body. If you are properly briefed, you will still be able to fulfill your duty.
With a sixteen year gap in my head?
We do need you.
Sir, I'm not fit to resume command.
I appreciate your candour, but despite your condition there is no one better equipped to deal with these Romulans than you.
When do we leave?
As soon as the Ambassador transports over from the Decius. We will get through this, as we have many times before.
I hope so.
Let me take you to your quarters.
Good idea. I've had enough surprises for one day.
Anything familiar?
JEAN-LUC:Hi, Dad.
JEAN-LUC:and then Mister Greenburg asked about the Fornax Disaster, and I knew the Enterprise saved all the colonists. But I didn't know.  Here it is. But I didn't know the exact stardate their sun went nova, so of you tell me, I'll write it down and that way I won't forget. You don't remember me, do you?
I'm sorry.
I need to talk to your father, Jean-Luc. Would you mind leaving us alone for a moment?
Why didn't you warn me?
Beverly hoped that meeting him like this might make an impact. Help you remember.
Well, it made an impact alright.
Give it time.
Jean-Luc.
Yes. The Admiral was very pleased when you chose that name. He is a wonderful boy.
Deanna, who's his mother?
She died two years ago. A shuttle accident. I'm sorry, Will.
I have no recollection of her at all. What was she like?
Min was beautiful, of course, strong, intelligent, patient.
Well, if she was married to me, she had to be patient. TROI She was an excellent Captain's wife, and a very good ship's counsellor. She took over after I left.
I can't imagine you leaving the Enterprise.
Admiral Picard offered me a position at Starfleet Command. It was a tremendous opportunity. I couldn't refuse. But, what's important right now, today, is that you have a son who needs you. Spend time with him. You may find part of what you've lost.
JEAN-LUC:Pretty bad, huh?
I've heard better.
JEAN-LUC:I've been practicing but I still can't get a good tone.
You're putting too much pressure on the mouthpiece. Relax the embouchure. Don't use any muscles you don't need.
JEAN LUC:Show me again.
Left hand. Right hand.
Sixteen years, you'd think I'd be able to hit that note.
JEAN LUC:Come on, Dad, you always make that mistake.
Computer. Summarise service record. Riker, William T, Captain. Begin with the Fornax disaster.
Please restate question.
Service record, Riker, William T.
Damn it.
JEAN-LUC:Dad?
Computer lag. I can't believe Geordi's still running his diagnostic.
JEAN-LUC:Is that what you wanted?
Picard to Captain Riker. The Romulan Ambassador is ready to transport over from the Decius.
On my way. I'd better go.
JEAN-LUC:Sure. Dad. Everything's going to be fine.
Troi tells me you met Jean-Luc. How's my namesake holding up to all this?
Better than I am.
We did our best to prepare him.
I'm trying to catch up with all this. I've still got a long way to go. A long way.
Just follow my lead with the Ambassador. You'll be fine.
The Decius reports the Ambassador is waiting to transport.
Beam him aboard.
Admiral Picard, Captain Riker. It's good to see you again.
Ambassador Tomalak. Welcome aboard the Enterprise.
Thank you, Admiral. It is an honour to be the first Romulan to freely walk about a Federation Starship.
Ambassador Tomalak? At Nelvana three, he threatened to take the hull of the Enterprise home as a war trophy.
That was a long time ago. Many things have changed, including Tomalak.
As soon as we arrive at your Outpost twenty three, the final negotiations should go quickly.
I agree, Ambassador. All of the difficult issues have been resolved.
After much debate. Your Captain Riker is the kind of negotiator even the Ferengi should avoid.
But we have come to an agreement both sides are happy with, largely thanks to Captain Riker.
And we are grateful, Captain. The new alliance will greatly benefit my people.
As I hope it will benefit mine.
It will, Captain. It will.
Main Bridge.
The virus you contracted, Captain. Have you fully recovered?
I assure you Captain Riker is quite well. He's looking forward to attending the final negotiations as planned.
Excellent. The signing of this treaty is an historic occasion. You, of all people, deserve to be there.
Thank you, Ambassador.
So this is the Bridge of the Enterprise. And this, I assume, is your Tactical position. Impressive.
Excuse me. Admiral, Deanna, I need a moment with you. Commander Data, if you would accompany the Ambassador on his tour.
Certainly, sir.
Excuse us, Ambassador.
Ambassador, you may find this of interest. These newly refined sensors are capable of pinpointing the power emissions of a cloaked warbird even at warp.
Are you saying you trust Tomalak?
I trust the process we have built with the Romulans over the past four years. They have nothing to gain by betrayal.
Are you sure? You've always said it's a chess game with the Romulans. Move, counter move, guile and deceit.
I sense no such dishonesty in Tomalak. His desire for peace is sincere. He wants this alliance. There is no cause for concern.
No cause for concern? We're talking about revealing the location of Outpost twenty three, the key to all of our defences in the Neutral Zone.
I'm sorry, Will, your information is out of date. The strategic importance of Outpost twenty three is minimal. Has been for years.
Doctor Crusher to Riker. Are you there, Captain?
What is it, Doctor?
Your son has been injured. He's been taken to Sickbay. You'd better come down here right away.
JEAN-LUC:Dad.
Are you alright?
JEAN-LUC:I'm fine.
What happened?
It's broken, but it's going to be all right in just a minute. Now, let's go easy on this arm for a little while, okay?
How'd this happen?
JEAN-LUC:I was in the gym playing parrises squares.
Parrises squares?
JEAN-LUC:I fell off the ramp.
At your age? You could break your neck!
JEAN-LUC:I'm sorry. I didn't mean to.
Continue the compression attenuator for two more minutes.
Yes, Doctor.
Can I talk to you for a moment?
I'll be right back.
Will, how old were you when you first started playing parrises squares?
Alright, I was probably a little younger than he is. It's just that, for all practical purposes, this is my first day as a father and he almost kills himself.
He didn't almost kill himself. He just broke a wrist, just like a lot of other boys his age when they fall.
You're right. It's difficult.
Difficult for you? What about for Jean-Luc? Can you imagine how he feels? You've lost sixteen years. Jean-Luc has lost a lot more than that. First his mother and now his father.
Good as new, Captain. You can take him home.
Thanks. How's the arm?
JEAN LUC:It's fine. Dad, I'm really sorry. I mean, I know you've got more important things to do.
There is nothing more important than this, son.
JEAN-LUC:Deck eight.
Halt. I know how hard this is for you.
JEAN-LUC:It's okay, Dad.
No, okay's not good enough. When I was your age, my own father he wasn't there for me. And I really needed him. I've often wondered what kind of father I'd be. I never felt quite ready. The idea even scared me a little.
JEAN-LUC:Scared? You?
Yeah. But I guess I got over it. You're here. Resume. It's important to me that I don't let you down, Jean-Luc.
JEAN-LUC:You never have, Dad. You've always been there for me.
I'll have to take your word for that because I don't remember any of it. Your first step, your first tooth, nothing. And I want to remember. I guess there's only one thing we can do. We've got to build some new memories.
I'm not sure it's still in the memory banks, but I used to have a great fishing programme on the holodeck.
JEAN-LUC:The Curtis Creek programme?
You know it?
JEAN-LUC:Sure. We've gone to Curtis Creek lots of times.
Would you like to go again?
JEAN-LUC:You bet.
Well as soon as these negotiations are out of the way, you and I are going fishing.
JEAN-LUC:Great!
JEAN-LUC:And then Mom tried to net the fish, and she fell in the creek, too. And then you tried to pull us both out, and you fell in.
I'm not sure I want to remember that.
JEAN-LUC:Mom really liked Curtis Creek. We went there for picnics and stuff lots of times.
What was she like?
JEAN-LUC:She was great. I think of her a lot. I'd better go change.
Computer. Display family record. Riker. William T. Limit to visual.
Display family record. Riker, Mrs. William T.
Please restate request.
Damn.
JEAN-LUC:What's wrong, Dad?
The computer still isn't working properly. I can't get a visual of your mother.
JEAN-LUC:But I know Mom's pictures are there. Did you give a stardate? Computer. Display family record. Riker, Mrs. William T. Home file. Stardate 58416.
Min! Minuet.
JEAN-LUC:Mom was beautiful, wasn't she?
Yes.
JEAN-LUC:What's wrong, Dad?
La Forge to Riker.
Riker here.
Captain, please come to the Bridge.
On my way.
What's the problem?
I've had to shut down the warp engines, Captain.
Why?
Antimatter containment fields are fluctuating. It's nothing to worry about though.
We're on the edge of the Neutral Zone on impulse power, and you're not concerned?
I'll have the engines back online in no time, sir.
Like you tracked down that faulty processing accelerator?
I'm running a level one diagnostic.
For thirty hours? It would never take you more than four. You're incapable of that level of incompetence, Mister La Forge. Worf, where did you get that scar?
In combat.
What battle? When? Which sector? Which unit? Mister Data, if we left immediately, when would we arrive at Outpost twenty three?
At warp one, in three days, four hours.
How about at warp seven?  At warp eight? At warp nine? What's the matter, Data? What happened to those millions of calculations per second?
Pardon me, sir. I am experiencing subspace interference which limits my abilities. I can't operate as quickly as
What did you say?
I said I cannot operate
No! That's not what you said. You said I can't. You used a contraction, didn't you?
Sir, I can explain if you would just give me a moment.
No you can't. Don't even try.
Captain, perhaps it would be best if we discussed this
Shut up!
I beg your pardon?
I said, shut up. As in close your mouth and stop talking.
Will, I sense how upset you are. You're angry and impatient.
Deanna, back off. Well, would anyone else like to speak up? Or shall we end this charade?
As you wish, Commander Riker.
The charade is over.
The Enterprise? my son you created it all.
With the help of our neural scanners and what you would call a holodeck. Now, please tell me. How did you discover the truth? The future we constructed for you should have been convincing.
It wasn't. There was a computer time lag, for one thing.
Unavoidable. Our scanners have a limited response time, so whenever you strayed from our expectations. But surely that was not enough to
To smash your house of cards? No. It was the visual record of my wife, Minuet. Bad move.
But we chose someone from your past who is still alive. A woman you were extremely attracted to
Your mistake, Tomalak. Minuet was nothing more than a computer generated fantasy I once experienced on another holodeck.
Impossible. In your mind that woman exists, physically. Your feelings toward her remain quite passionate.
She was part of a very special programme.
So much effort, so little accomplished.
If it was Outpost twenty three you were after, why didn't you use your neural scanners to probe my mind?
Our scanners are calibrated for Romulan brain patterns. When it comes to human brains, they are less efficient. There were gaps in the information we gathered from your memory.
Gaps? From what I saw, I find that hard to believe. You recreated the Enterprise, the crew, every nuance and smell, sound, with perfect accurate. I didn't see any gaps. I don't buy it, Tomalak.
We're wasting time. Bring him.
When you and your colleagues transported to this planet, you were less than a kilometre from this base. Your capture was a simple matter.
My colleagues, where are they?
We allowed them to transport safely back to the Enterprise, but your signal was diverted.
My people won't stop looking for me, Tomalak.
They already have.
Please, say hello to your son.
Jean-Luc?
That is not his name, of course, nor have you ever really met him. We merely used his image to augment your programme.
What have you done to him?
While I am gone, please give careful thought to your situation.
What's your name?
Whoa. If we're going to get out of here, you're going to have to trust me. Easy, I'm not going to hurt you. Who are you? How did you get here? My name is Will.
Ethan. They brought me here with my parents. We were at a research station on Miridian six.
Miridian six? On the edge of the Neutral Zone? I thought that was uninhabited.
The station was set up last year. Then the Romulans came.
It's odd that the Enterprise wasn't advised. Where are your parents now?
They took them away.
Do you know why the Romulans are keeping you here?
No. I just want to get away.
I'll get us out of here, Ethan.
How? Even if we do get away, they'll find us. They found me when I escaped before.
You escaped?
Yes. I hid in a secret place for weeks, but they caught me when I came out to find food.
I want that information, Commander. I want the location of Outpost twenty three. Very well. I have been given permission to use whatever means are necessary
Ethan, no!
Stop him!
That secret hiding place of yours?
This way
In here.
Their sensors should have picked us up.
No, they can't. I heard them. There's something in these rocks.
Heavy metals?
Right.
The Romulans forgot all about this storeroom when they rebuilt their tunnels. Here, use these. Help me.
After I got away last time, I mapped out all their tunnels. Supply depot, communications, living quarters and shuttlebay.
How many guards in the shuttlebay?
Only two or three.
If we stole a shuttlecraft, that would get us nowhere. The Romulans could follow their own ship to easily. But if we broke into their communications system, we could send a message to the Enterprise.
We can't do that. The transmitter is on a voice-activated security system.
Do you know whose voice activates it?
Only Ambassador Tomalak.
Who?
Tomalak.
Ambassador Tomalak? Tomalak is a Romulan Captain. The only time he was ever called Ambassador was in a holodeck fantasy. How do you know about that?
You, er, you told me about him.
Who are you? What is your part in all this?
They've found us!
But you said their sensors didn't work in this tunnel.
They must have fixed them. We've got to go!
Where are we going to go, Ethan?
The shuttlebay. There's still time.
I've had enough.
Commander, surrender your weapon.
No more games. No more fantasies. I'm not going to play anymore.
It was never the Romulans. It was you all along, wasn't it?
There is no question about it, sir. It is his signal.
Picard to Commander Riker. Do you read me?
Riker to Picard. I'm here.
Are you all right?
Yes, sir, I'm all right. What about
Geordi and Worf?
We beamed them up an hour ago. They're fine.
But we lost you in mid-transport. Where've you been? What is going on down there?
I'm not sure yet, sir.
But I think I'm about to find out. Stand by. What shall I call you? Ethan? Jean-Luc?
It doesn't matter.
This room, it's more than a holodeck, isn't it?
Much more. The neural scanners read my mind, give me everything I want. Just like they tried to give you everything you wanted.
Everything I wanted? You probed the Enterprise. You lured us here so you could play games with me. I didn't want that, you did. Why?
My world was invaded. My people killed. My mother brought me here so our enemies would never find me.
They found her, didn't they?
She knew that they would never stop looking for her, so she made sure I would be safe.
She left the scanners to protect me, to give me anything I wanted.
Anything? Then why did you kidnap me?
I wanted you to stay. It's been so long. I just want somebody real. I thought that you'd be happy. I'm sorry.
I have to return to my ship. Come with me. You don't have to stay here anymore. You don't have to be alone anymore.
My name is Barash.
To me, you'll always be Jean-Luc. Two to transport.
You sent for me, sir?
Yes, Doctor. Sit down. Look, this perhaps may be nothings, but I've been feeling a bit odd of late. Fatigued. And now I've got this damned headache.
A what?
Headache. Headache. Surely you know what a headache is.
Of course. But I don't often encounter them.
The reason is obvious, of course. What are the Ferengi up to? Stand by, Enterprise. Stand by for what?
I don't see a thing wrong.
No, neither can I. Unless they're baiting some kind of trap.
With your head. I see nothing physically wrong, but I want to run some additional scans in Sickbay.
Doctor, all I've got is
Is an order to report to Sickbay. From the one person aboard this ship who can give you an order.
Captain from First Officer. They're finally sending a message.
On my way, Number One. Sorry, Doctor. Duty calls.
They're prepared to talk, sir.
Have they given any hint of what they've been waiting for?
Negative, Captain. They've identified their Captain as Bok. DaiMon Bok.
You'll be able to see him now, sir. They're willing to communicate on visual.
Open hailing frequencies.
Hailing frequencies open, sir.
Ferengi vessel. This is Captain Jean-Luc Picard of the Enterprise. We are transmitting visually.
Is this the Captain Picard?
Do we know each other?
I know you, Picard.
Then you have the advantage. Is this Bok?
I am Bok, DaiMon of the Ferengi. I have asked you here to discuss a mutual problem, Captain.
What problem is that, DaiMon Bok?
I insist on speaking of that matter in person. Shall we meet on your vessel or mine?
Hailing frequencies closed.
Captain, I sense considerable deception on Bok's part. And danger.
Then we should meet him here. Keep him under our control.
Now open, sir.
I appreciate your offer, DaiMon Bok. We would like you to be our guest here.
As you wish, Picard. Perhaps this will begin a new era of cooperation for both our peoples. In one Earth hour, then?
In one hour, DaiMon Bok. End transmission.
I can't believe they're coming here.
They did agree a bit easily. Well, in one hour we shall know why.
Are you always accustomed to getting your way, Doctor?
Only when my way makes sense, Captain. There are still forty minutes before the Ferengi beam over. I'll have these scans done in ten.
It seems an awful lot of effort for something as simple as a headache.
As simple? You should not have a headache unless there's something wrong, sir. It may be true that headaches were once quite common, but that was in the days before the brain was charted, before we understood the nature of pain. When we were suffering from such things as the common cold.
So what's the cause of my headache?
I haven't the slightest idea.  Feel better.
The pain's gone.
Medical fakery. The pain is actually still there. It's just cloaked. I'll want further exams.
Doctor!
When the Ferengi matter is settled.
Commander, you'll soon be getting an intruder alert.
What? Wesley, if you've something to report.
If you'll scan heading four four mark one six three, Lieutenant, you'll find
Intruder alert, sir.
I've got something, sir.
It's an old style starship, Constellation Class, heading this way under impulse power, sir.
Says who?
Ensign, answer the First Officer's question.
Says the long distance sensors, sir. I was in Engineering, playing around with boosting sensor output.
Boosting it? How?  We will discuss this later.
I read it now, sir, as a Constellation class starship heading this way under impulse power. Sending no call letters, sir.
The correct procedure,
What's wrong, sir?
Oh, it's nothing. It's just a, just a mild headache. The correct procedure, Ensign, would have been to signal the Bridge of your finding immediately.
Yes, sir.
Bringing it here personally, perhaps with the idea of being on hand for the Ferengi beam over, might have imperiled this vessel had it been something hostile approaching.
Yes, sir.
We are receiving no signal at all from the approaching starship, sir.
Time, sir.
Time? Oh, for the Ferengi to beam over. Do you see any problems connected with this old starship coming in, Number One?
Suggest it would be safer, sir, to have the Ferengi here whatever happenings.
Concur. Stand by.
Hailing frequencies open, sir.
Welcome you in peace to the Enterprise, DaiMon Bok.
It is our pleasure, Captain Picard. Might I introduce my First Officer, Kazago, and my Second, Rata?
This is my First Officer, Commander William Riker. Second in command, Data. Counsellor Troi.
We have heard that you use females. Clothed females. Most interesting.
They are that, sir.
And the android was mentioned too. What is its price? We should like to purchase it.
He is not for sale. Commander Data is, um, is, um
Is second-hand merchandise. You wouldn't want him.
Second-hand, sir? Oh, of course. A human joke.
Excuse, Captain, but the unidentified starship is coming in. Still no signal at all.
Think nothing of it. It is under our control.
One of our starships under your control?
Do not be alarmed, Captain. It is a gift from us. With which we honour the Hero of Maxia.
Who?
Why you, Picard, of course. Do you not remember the Battle of Maxia?
I'm sorry, I do not remember it, DaiMon Bok. Data?
Captain, he may refer to an incident which occurred nine years ago in the Maxia Zeta star system, in which an unidentified starship
Unidentified? That fine vessel was Ferengi.
Which you destroyed, sir.
The Battle of Maxia. I've never heard it referred to so dramatically before. My sincere regrets, Bok, but that vessel refused to identify itself. It simply attacked us. We defended ourselves.
Such mistakes happen in space.
Hardly a mistake, sir. Your report shows that it deliberately attacked.
Do you want the arriving vessel on main viewer, sir? It is only a thousand kilometres away now.
Put it on your viewer.
Main viewer.
There is no one aboard it.
The log should be downloaded into the Enterprise's records. At a price.
No price!
No price?
For what purpose? What
I just felt something too, Captain.
Perhaps it is his conscience?
Bridge to Sickbay.
No, no. I'm fine
It felt as if it were something from your past.
It's right. I'm fine. What is this all about?
It is about the battle I mentioned, Captain. A gift, in honour of that occasion. Look at that ship closely.
Magnify please, Lieutenant La Forge.
Aye, sir.
Why, it's the Stargazer. It's my old ship. How did you find it?
It was a derelict, adrift in space on the far side of this star system. How it got there is none of my business, Captain. But now, that vessel is yours, if you wish to have it.
We are not selling it to him?
Consider it an act of friendship.
At no cost? Oh, ugly. Very ugly.
Captain's log, supplemental. Bok and his officers have returned to their vessel, inviting us now to officially take possession of the Stargazer.
Like before?
No. It hit with more impact.
Hit? I'm sorry, but anything could be important.
You said you felt something yourself.
I believe so. Like a thought, but rather mechanical in nature.
Are you sure it wasn't one of my thoughts? At that moment, I was remembering being at the helm of the Stargazer. A manoeuvre was being made. We were hit. Something's burning. I can smell smoke. Can you smell it?
There's nothing burning, Jean-Luc.
That was just part of my memory.
Memory or nightmare?
Well, it was strong, whatever it was. Are you ready, Number One.
Staff's waiting, if Doctor Crusher approves.
I'll do better than that. I'll go along.
We were traveling at warp two through the Maxia Zeta star system when this unidentified starship suddenly appeared and fired on us, point-blank range.
Where did it come from?
It must have been lying in some deep moon crater. First attack damaged the shields. In the confusion, they hit us a second time.
No clue who they were?
No names, no reason. Can you identify them, Vigo? If they come in a second time with our shields damaged
Sir? Who's Vigo?
He's my weapons officer on the Stargazer. I'm getting quite caught up in this.
Your shields were failing, sir.
I improvised. With the enemy vessel coming in for the kill, I ordered a sensor bearing, and when it went into the return arc
You performed what Starfleet textbooks now refer to as the Picard Manoeuvre.
Well, I did what any good helmsman would have done. I dropped into high warp, stopped right off the enemy vessel's bow and fired with everything I had.
And blowing into maximum warp speed, you appeared for an instant to be in two places at once.
And our attacker fired on the wrong one.
I did what any good helmsman could have done. You did it first, sir.
It was a save our skins manoeuvre. We were finished. On fire. We had to abandon ship. We limped through space in shuttlecraft for weeks before we were picked up. I haven't thought about this for years.
Sir, the Ferengi are standing by for us to take possession of the Stargazer.
I want to go over to her.
I understand, sir. As soon as my people have made certain she's safe.
And after I have another look at you, Captain.
USS Stargazer. Constellation Class. Starfleet Registry NCC 2893.
I activated the emergency power cells. Amazing they still work.
The rest of the ship is clear of surprises, Lieutenant Yar.
I read about this ship at the Academy, I never dreamed I'd ever be on her.
Yar to Enterprise. All clear, sir.
Hello, old friend.
You'll find this most intriguing, sir.
What did you find, Data?
The last entry dated nine years ago, sir. By you.  We are forced to abandon our starship. May she find her way without us. Apparently she did, sir.
How do you feel, Captain?
Oh, I'm fine, Doctor. Lieutenant Yar, run a structural analysis on the Stargazer for an impulse tow. Data, download all computers to the Enterprise and file. I'm going to look at my old cabin.
Try this, Hero of Maxia.
Captain? Another headache? This really worries me. I want you back on the Enterprise.
But my things
I'll see they're sent to your Enterprise quarters.
Enterprise now taking possession of Stargazer, Kazago.
Permission granted, Riker.
Actually it was quite a bargain, Kazago. I thought the Ferengi always made a profit on things.
Set sub-warp speed for towing, LaForge.
Aye, sir.
Starfleet has responded to our request, sir. A tug will rendezvous with us and tow the Stargazer back to Xendi Starbase Nine.
Very well, Data.
How was it, Captain?
Very strange, Number One. Like going back to the house you grew up in, but no one's home, except the phantoms of the past.
It has troubled you?
Not half as much as this damn headache. Take over, Number One.
Aye, sir.
What's wrong?
I wish I could say.
Shields weakening, Captain. Torpedoes armed. Where are they? Oh my god, sir! Fire! Fire!
What is it, Data? Why all the mystery?
The records of the Stargazer, sir. What the Ferengi call the Battle of Maxia. It seems the Captain's personal log contains a much different version of that conflict than the official historic account.
What are you saying?
It would appear that the starship which Captain Picard attacked, had in fact, been under a flag of truce.
What?
And apparently, the Captain destroyed the ship without notice or provocation.
Impossible. What about the fire aboard the Stargazer?
An accident in Engineering.
And what proof?
It is logged in his own voice, sir. Would you care to hear it, sir? Sir?
This is a confession given by me, Jean-Luc Picard commanding USS Stargazer.
What does this mean?
I don't know, sir. It sounds like your voice.
It is, Number One.
I refuse to believe you ever said that.
I admit I must have mistaken their subspace antenna for a weapons cluster. Unfortunately, I fired our main phasers and our direct hit destroyed the unknown vessel.
I've assumed they've simulated your voice somehow. I've already put Data to work on it.
Thank you, Will. I never made that log entry, of course, but it still leaves you with a duty to perform.
I know, sir, I must report it to Starfleet. That's at least one full day for subspace communications to reach there.
And one more full day for their answer to return. I'd like the truth on this by then. I'd hate to have to prepare a formal defence.
I can't believe they'd ask for your command.
Why wouldn't they? With the Ferengi making these friendship overtures, I could become a severe embarrassment to Starfleet.
I'm certain the Ferengi are behind the faked log. No wonder they're waiting out there. Headache back, sir?
Damn! I'll call the Doctor again.
It's no wonder, with all this going on. Try to relax.
This is a confession given by me, Jean-Luc Picard, commanding USS Stargazer, in the hopes that my belated honesty will be taken into account by Starfleet when judging my actions during a confrontation with an unidentified vessel.
Open hailing frequencies, Geordi.
Open, sir.
I'll take it in the Ready room. Secure channel, La Forge.
Secure, Sir.
Starship Ferengi, this is Commander Riker here. I'd like to speak to First Officer Kazago.
A problem, Riker?
Are our channels secure on your end?
It is now.
Are you aware of the details of the Battle of Maxia?
Captain Bok has just made me aware of it, Riker. The infamy of your Picard is now fully known.
Infamy?
I would call the wanton destruction of an unarmed vessel infamy.
And if I produced evidence that Captain Picard's log entry was falsified to indicate that?
I can hardly imagine you contacted me to discuss an ancient battle. What do you want of me?
Just one question.
As you humans say, I'm all ears.
First Officer to First Officer, Kazago, if your Captain Bok knew about this, then why this peaceful meeting to present us with the Stargazer?
We freely give you back your derelict warship and now you accuse us of crime, Riker? I can bear no more insults!
Yes? Who the hell is it?
Not resting, Captain?
More like dying, Doctor.
Over here.
What is wrong with me?
I wish to hell I knew, Captain, but something unusual has definitely been happening to you.
Why do doctors always say the obvious as though it's a revelation?
Why do captains always act like they're immortal?
No.
You didn't tell me it had been this bad.
It wasn't this bad. But it's getting worse.
This should help a little. It's got to be some kind of emotional pressure connected with the Stargazer.
I got this headache long before I even knew my old ship still existed. Still, perhaps you're partly right.
Want to talk about it? I'm here.
The fight at Maxia. I destroyed an entire vessel. An entire crew.
Did you have a choice?
I don't know anymore. I just don't know.
Commander Riker's told me about the altered log, if that's what's troubling you.
The last three nights I've, I've heard these voices. I'm on the bridge of my old ship. There's fire all around me. The klaxons, smoke. And then I give the order. And now the Stargazer is really here!. And that log. Am I going crazy? How do I know I was in my right mind at Maxia? How do I know I'm in my right mind now?
What was that?
Something to let you sleep.
Yes sleep. Sleep.
Shields weakening, Captain. Torpedoes armed. Where are they?
And now, dear Captain, you are ready to live the past.
Where did they come from? Phasers, sir? Sir? Sir? What should we do, sir? Should we fire back? Fire, Captain? Fire!
You will injure yourself as you once injured me.
Sir!
Damage report!
Fusion generator under surge control, sir! Power systems failing!
Sensor beam bearing on hostile ship!
Seven mark nineteen, sir!
Phasers, sir? Sir?
Ready phasers, and lock! Stand by on warp nine. Heading seven, seven mark twenty. Engage.
Steady. Now, reverse and stop! Phasers fire, torpedoes away! Fire. Fire.
By comparing the Stargazer's main computer log with Captain Picard's personal log, I have found checksum discrepancies, sir.
What does that mean?
All information is time-coded by entry, and the bits when totaled produce an aggregate amount which
I don't want a computer science lesson, Data. Bottom line.
One of these two logs is a forgery, sir.
Correction. The log just found aboard the Stargazer is a forgery.
As I said, that is one of them, is it not?
Captain. You're looking better, sir.
A little sleep, thanks to the good Doctor, works wonders. What report on the logs?
Yes, sir. Whoever tampered with your personal log was clever.
But a bit clumsy. It's definitely a fabrication, sir.
Number One, I'd like you to take a look at this brain scan graph. What are you doing here?
I thought I was Captain of this starship.
Of course you are, but I
Thank you for the confirmation, Doctor. But now, except for Riker, I would like you all to return to your stations. Is that clear?
Sir.
You too, Doctor. I have business with the Commander.
Under protest, Captain.
You have orders for me, sir?
Release the Stargazer from the tractor beam, Number One.
Sir?
The tractor beam.
Sir, are you abandoning?
No, but her inertia will carry the Stargazer along with us. Or did you sleep through the Academy lecture on conservation of tractor beam power?
No, sir. I'll release her, of course.
Obviously, there's some thought process disorder, but I can't find a physical reason for it. Anything?
I'm puzzled too. I keep sensing random thoughts but two sets of them. As if they were his, but intermixed other thoughts which are also his.
I'm busy at the moment, Wesley.
I know, Mom, but this is important. When I went back to the main sensors in Engineering to try some more sensitivity experiments
Does this have something to do with Captain Picard?
Yes, ma'am, if this is what you're talking about here. I don't know much about brain scans but I glanced at these when you were studying them, and I noticed that these patterns are the same as those picked up from the low-intensity transmissions from the Ferengi ship. I went back and checked, and they're exactly the same.
What kind of transmissions?
I don't know. Engineering has nothing like it on record.
Let's get to the Captain.
No, they might be affecting the Captain. To Riker.
You're welcome, ladies. Adults.
The captain, Commander?
Resting in his quarters after ordering both of you to your duty stations.
There have been some, did he say low intensity? Some unusual low intensity transmissions from the Ferengi vessel.
Did who say?
My son. Transmissions which exactly match certain anomalies found in the Captain's brain scans. Something over there is affecting the Captain's thought patterns.
Computer, give me a location on Captain Picard.
Captain Picard is in Transporter room three.
What? Computer, emergency order to Transporter room three.
New information. Captain Picard is no longer aboard the Enterprise.
Welcome back, Captain.
What is happening?
Shields up, computer.
What are you doing?
Collecting on an old debt.
Stargazer, Captain, respond!
Shields up, sir. No way to beam over any help.
Commander, I'm reading something very strange here. A low intensity beam of intermittent pulse inside this starship.
I have a fix on it, sir. Inside Captain Picard's quarters.
You transferred some of his belongings from the Stargazer?
Yes. Including a fairly heavy chest.
Go take a look, fast!
Commander, Stargazer is now powering up, sir.
I have been waiting a long nine years for this, Picard.
I don't know what you're talking about.
Do you not, human? Can you not remember the crime you committed against my very blood? You murdered my only son.
Your son?
He was the commander of the ship you destroyed! On his first voyage as DaiMon.
The ship? The Ferengi ship that attacked me. Or is it about to attack me?
And I have spent these years searching, seeking a proper blood revenge! And I found it! I am rich, Picard, yet two of these cost me the profits of an entire life. You are back in command of the Stargazer, Picard. Its computers will answer your orders. Die well, Captain.
First Officer:First officer's log. Captain Picard has beamed himself to the Stargazer, which is now moving away from us under its own power.
Enterprise to Stargazer, please respond. Enterprise to Captain Picard aboard Stargazer. Please answer. Mister Data, what was Stargazer's condition?
Considerable fire damage to interior surface reported, sir. But none of her main systems were crippled.
Armaments, Lieutenant Yar?
Six photon torpedoes short, sir, probably used when the Captain destroyed his Ferengi attackers nine years ago. Otherwise fully armed.
What do you make of it, La Forge?
It seems to be a network of miniature circuitry, sir. Incredibly complex. Maybe an amplifier.
Where was it in the Captain's quarters, Mister Worf?
His chest from the Stargazer, sir? Just where I had left it. He hadn't yet unpacked.
So, he may not have even known it was there. And if this is able to pick up or magnify thought-altering transmissions
It could have prepared him for whatever is happening now.
Let's find out, or try to. Contact the Ferengi vessel, Lieutenant.
Hailing frequencies open, sir.
Enterprise to Ferengi vessel, we transmit visually. Do you respond?
Why is our gift to you under power, human?
I will discuss that with your captain.
He is working in our ship's laboratory. Where is your Captain?
He's beamed himself aboard the Stargazer, and I'm wondering if this has something to do with it.
How do you have possession of that?
It was found in our Captain's chest, which brought over from the Stargazer.
It is a forbidden device. A thought maker. If your Captain is criminal enough to own one
Kazago, you know who controls those spheres. Now I ask you again, First Officer to First Officer. What's going on?
It is not seemly to question one's own DaiMon, Riker. I am not prepared to do that.
Sir, I have the Stargazer.
Switch, now! Enterprise to Picard.
Do not attack again! We are on a peaceful mission. Give your identity. You force us to defend ourselves. Phasers full up. Arm torpedoes. Why aren't the shields at full power?
We've lost him, sir.
When he put up the shields, sir.
Damn, I said put fusion generators under surge control. You're moving too slowly. Arm the torpedoes, man! Vigo! Get a fire control party up here!
Shields weakening, Captain! Fusion generator online.
Weapons report!
Phasers coming to full charge, sir. Torpedoes armed!
Who are they? Identify them!
They're coming for a third pass at us, sir!
We can't take another hit, Captain!
Sir, I now feel anger from our Captain. Fury over whatever it is he is reliving out there.
The Battle of Maxia, sir. That's what it is.
The Picard Manoeuvre. What is the defence against that, Data?
There is no defence, sir.
Then devise one, fast!
First Officer Kazago to human Riker.
Not now, Kazago.
We do not wish to become involved in what has become clearly a Federation matter.
Fine, fine, Enterprise out!
You should also know that DaiMon Bok no longer commands this vessel. His First Officer has confined him for engaging in this unprofitable venture. Good luck, First Officer Riker.
I have computed a possibility, Commander. Since even deep space contains trace gases, sir, a vessel in the Picard manoeuvre might seem to disappear, but our sensors could locate any sudden compression of those gases.
And use it as an aiming point and blow our Captain to bits?
This class starship has enough power to use our tractor beam on it. Seize it, limit it's field of fire.
Right. Concentrate shields at that point. Make it so. I hope you're right, Data.
No question of it, sir.
Stand by!
Lock on tractor beam.
Ready phasers.
Captain Picard, listen to me.
Vigo, is that you?
It's Commander Riker, sir!
Captain, hear me! Look around you, the Ferengi are using their thought devices on you.
Stand by. Who is this?
It's Riker, sir. Your Number One. Look for a silver sphere. Destroy it with your phaser.
Phaser. A sphere. Bok used it.
Destroy it!
Phaser. Destroy the sphere. Destroy the sphere.
Are you all right, Captain?
Captain? Captain, are you all right? Captain, are you all right?
Where am I, Number One?
Aboard the Stargazer, sir. The sphere you destroyed, it's been controlling your
Bok! Where is Bok?
Removed from command, sir. Placed under guard for his act of personal vengeance. Seems there was no profit in it.
In revenge, there never is. Let the dead rest. And the past remain the past. Enterprise, lock on. Beam me home, Riker.
Magnify.
The last report we have says they were observing the streamer at medium range. Maybe they went in for a closer look, got more than they bargained for.
Hail them.
No response.
Life signs?
Our scanners cannot penetrate the plasma streamer's distortion field.
Can we tractor them out?
No, sir. Ionic interference is too heavy.
I'll take a shuttle in.
Too risky. You could be pulled in too. Bridge to Engineering.
Mister La Forge, can we beam an away team onto the science ship?
We can beam them over there, Captain, but with all this interference, we might not get a positive lock to bring them back.
Commander, if we bridged our transporter system with theirs we might be able to cut through the ionic field.
That's a good idea, Barclay. Captain, I think we can do it. We're going to bridge the two transporter systems.
Acknowledged. Meet Commander Riker in Transporter room three.
Aye sir. Barclay, I'm going to need a systems engineer on this Away Team.
I'll ask Ensign Dern to join you.
I meant you, Barclay.
Shouldn't I stay here and set up the remote link?
Dern can do that. Come on, let's go.
Status, Mister O'Brien?
O'BRIEN:I'll have to send you over one at a time, Commander, because of band width limitations, and the transport cycle will take a little longer.
How much longer?
O'BRIEN:Four, five seconds. About twice the normal time. I'm afraid you're in for a bumpy ride, Commander.
What do you? What exactly do you mean by a bumpy ride?
O'BRIEN:There may be a small amount of static charge accumulation. You'll feel a bit of tingling. It's nothing to worry about.
Let's do it. Mister Worf.
O'BRIEN:Engaging system interlock. Pattern buffers synchronised. Phase transition coils at stand by. Energising. He's there.
I'll go next.
O'BRIEN:Engaging interlock. Buffers synched. Energising.
I'm ready.
O'BRIEN:Engaging interlock. Buffers synched. Oh, wait a minute. I'm reading an ionic fluctuation in the matter stream. Oh, no problem. Okay. Energising.
Reg, you're up. Reg.
Aye, sir.
O'BRIEN:Engaging interlock. Buffers in synch. Phase coils
I'm sorry, I just can't do this.
Reg, you were faced with a difficult transport. Anyone would have been apprehensive in that situation.
Tell that to Commander La Forge and the rest of the away team.
I'm sure they understand. As soon as you feel up to it, you can probably still join them.
No!
Reg, is there something you're not telling me?
Actually, this isn't the first time I've been apprehensive. Every single time that I tried to do it, I had a certain feeling. I guess you could call it mortal terror.
Why have you kept it a secret?
Why? Because my career in Starfleet would be over, that's why.
I doubt that.
I've always managed to avoid it somehow. You wouldn't believe how many hours that I've logged in shuttlecraft. I mean, The idea of being deconstructed, molecule by molecule. It's more than I can stand. Even when I was a child, I always had a dreadful fear that if ever I was dematerialised that I would never come back again whole. I know it sounds crazy, but
It's not crazy about it. You are being taken apart molecule by molecule. Reg, you're not the first person to have anxiety about transporting. We can desensitise you to this type of fear. It's a slow and gradual process, but it works.
It does? How?
Well, you might first try a relaxation technique, like plexing.
Plexing?
Yes, it's a Betazoid method. The next time you feel nervous about transporting, you stimulate a neural pressure point, like this.
There's a nerve cluster just behind the carotid artery. It stimulates the part of the brain that releases natural endorphins.
Plexing. Sounds easy enough.
Here. There.
You know, I feel better already. I think I can do this.
There's no need to rush.
No, no. We talked about confronting my fears. The best way out is through. You said that once, remember?
I suppose I did.
I'm going to beam over there. I can do it.
There's no sign of any survivors. No sign of anyone.
Maybe they abandoned ship.
Unlikely. The escape pods are still on board.
There was an explosion. That much we do know.
Any idea what caused it?
I've ruled out a reactor core failure and there's no sign of a systems overload.
Blast analysis indicates the explosion originated here, in the centre of the transport chamber.
How is that possible? The transporter is still functioning.
Could they have beamed an explosive device aboard?
Commander Riker? Could you come here, please.
Excuse me.
Lieutenant Joshua Kelly. He was the ship's engineer.
How did he die?
He has second and third degree burns over most of his body, but I don't think they were the cause of his death. I'm like to take him back to do an autopsy.
O'BRIEN:You're sure about this, sir?
Sure. Please proceed.
O'BRIEN:It'll only take a minute. It should be a smooth ride over.
Good. Good.
O'BRIEN:I know how you feel about this, sir.
You're afraid of transporting, too?
O'BRIEN:No. Arachnids. Sickening, crawly little things, don't you think? All those legs.
Spiders? They've never bothered me.
O'BRIEN:A few years back, I was called in to re-route an emitter array at a Starbase on Zayra Four. Turns out the entire system was infested with Talarian hook spiders. You ever seen a Talarian hook spider? Their legs are half a metre long. Well, I had a choice. Do I walk away and let the emitter blow itself to hell, or do I crawl in the Jeffries tube with twenty hook spiders?
What happened?
O'BRIEN:It was the hardest thing I ever did, but I got through it. After that, I was never quite as afraid of spiders.
Thanks.
O'BRIEN:Energising.
Reg. Welcome aboard. You ready to work?
Yes, sir.
Good. Why don't you start by downloading the ship's science logs over there.
Aye, sir.
Still four members of the crew unaccounted for. Did you come up with anything?
I don't know how these fit in, but I found them all around the transporter platform.
What are they?
They look like pieces of a standard sample container.
Take them back to the ship, analyze them there. Mister Barclay. Glad you could join us.
Me too, sir.
The Ferengi are claiming two of their freighters were destroyed by a Cardassian warship in your sector.
Is there any evidence to support this?
Although I'm loathe to believe the Ferengi about anything, there was evidence of Cardassian weapons. If the Cardassians also attacked the Yosemite, it could indicate a large scale movement into this sector.
I have an away team on board the ship. The initial report indicates there was an explosion on board, but we're not sure if it was from an attack.
How soon until you know?
A few hours. If it looks like Cardassians, I'll contact you immediately.
Very well.
Bridge to Captain Picard.
Go ahead, Mister Data.
The away team is returning to the Enterprise, sir.
Acknowledged. Have Commander Riker come to my Ready room as soon as he's on board.
Aye, sir.
La Forge to Transporter room three. I'm ready to go.
O'BRIEN:Stand by, Commander.
Barclay to Enterprise. One to beam back.
O'BRIEN:Stand by, sir.
O'BRIEN:You see, sir? That wasn't so bad, was it.
Mission logs, science logs, medical logs, they're all scrambled. Looks like the blast wiped out the ship's core memory.
We could try to reconstitute the data stream.
It's worth a try.
Commander, has anything strange ever happened to you during transport?
Like what?
I don't know. Anything out of the ordinary.
No, not really. This looks hopeless. We're not going to get anything out of these logs. You know, maybe this broken sample container I found can tell us something. Let's try to get this thing back into one piece.
I mean, have you ever seen anything?
Where?
In the, during transport.
Sometimes my visor picks up resonance patterns from the matter energy conversion. It's actually kind of pretty. Why?
Just wondering.
Reg, what are you getting at? Did you saw something during transport?
When I was returning to the Enterprise I could've sworn I saw something in the matter stream.
Something?
There was phased matter all around. At first I thought it was some kind of energy discharge, but then it flew toward me and it touched my arm. How could something be in there? Molecules flying apart, half phased? I mean, it's impossible, isn't it?
We'd better check it out. When we're done here, we'll run a full diagnostic on the transporter, all right?
All right.
O'BRIEN:The confinement beam subsystems check out. So do the phase transition coils.
The pattern buffer is fine.
O'BRIEN:Emitter pads, targeting scanners, they're all working fine. This system's clean. So is the science vessel's.
Reg, there's a lot of energy floating around in the beam. Maybe you saw a surge in the matter stream.
Yeah.
O'BRIEN:I'll run a scan on the Heisenberg compensators.
No, Chief, you've done enough already.
O'BRIEN:It's no problem. Why don't you give me a hand?
You know, maybe ignorance really is bliss.
O'BRIEN:Sir?
Well, if I didn't know so much about these things, maybe they wouldn't scare me so much. I can still remember the day in Doctor Olafson's Transporter Theory class when he was talking about the body being converted into billions of kiloquads of data, zipping through subspace, and I realised there's no margin for error. One atom out of place and poof! You never come back. It's amazing people aren't lost all the time.
O'BRIEN:With all due respect, sir, I've been doing this for twenty two years and I haven't lost anybody yet.
Yes, but you realise if these imaging scanners are off even a thousandth of a percent.
O'BRIEN:That's why each pad has four redundant scanners. If any one scanner fails, the other three take over.
Reg, how many transporter accidents have there been in the last ten years? Two? Three? There are millions of people who transport safely every day without a problem.
I've heard of problems. What about transporter psychosis?
O'BRIEN:Transporter Psychosis? There hasn't been a case of that in over fifty years. Not since they perfected the multiplex pattern buffers.
Reg, transporting really is the safest way to travel.
I'd like to take a closer look at those burns. Take a tissue sample, please.
Yes, Doctor.
Damage to the epidermis only. Initiate a circulatory probe.
Doctor Crusher!
His heart's beating! Cardio-stimulator. Now. It's gone.
Neuro-electrical activity in the cerebral cortex. Nothing.
Now the respiratory system's active. What the hell is going on?
Water, ten degrees Celsius. Computer, access Starfleet Medical Database. Tell me about, er. Describe the disorder transporter psychosis.
Transporter psychosis was diagnosed in the year twenty two oh nine by researchers on Delinia Two.
No, no stop. All I need is, what causes it?
It is caused by a breakdown of neuro-chemical molecules during transport, affecting the body's motor functions, autonomic systems, and the brain's higher reasoning centres.
What are the symptoms?
Victims suffer from paranoid delusions, multi-infarct dementia, hallucinations.
Hallucinations? What kind of hallucinations?
Victims experience somatic, tactile and visual hallucinations, accompanied by psychogenic hysteria. Peripheral symptoms include sleeplessness, accelerated heart rate, diminished eyesight leading to acute myopia, painful spasms in the extremities, and in most cases, dehydration.
Computer what is the treatment for transporter psychosis?
There is no known treatment.
The autopsy showed residual ionisation in every one of Lieutenant Kelly's systems. I think that's what caused the muscular and systemic contractions.
From where did the ionisation come?
There's evidence of electrical burns on the victim's body, as if he was exposed to ionised gas or high energy plasma.
Plasma? There's no way they could've been exposed, unless it was matter from the streamer.
Is there evidence of a hull breach? Could plasma from the streamer have found its way into the ship?
No. Data, what's the report on that broken sample container?
The analysis of the fragments is not yet complete.
Captain, if there's evidence of similar ionisation in those fragments, it could mean they tried to beam aboard material from the streamer.
If the plasma exploded that would explain a few things. Let me know when the analysis is complete.
Aye, sir.
From the looks of these fracture patterns, I'd say that the explosive force came from within the container.
The container does show evidence of residual ionisation. I believe your hypothesis was correct. It was used to store high energy plasma.
So they were collecting samples from the plasma streamer. They had the proper container. How could it have exploded?
Perhaps we should attempt to recreate their experiment to see what happens when matter is beamed aboard under similar conditions.
That's a good idea. We'll prepare a new container. Reg, I don't want to take any chances here. Start setting up a level five containment field here in Engineering, okay?
Aye, sir.
Are you all right, Lieutenant?
I'm fine. Yes, thank you.
Geordi. Lieutenant Barclay appears inordinately preoccupied with his physiological condition. I have seen him check his pulse rate, as well as his visual acuity several times over the last twenty minutes.
Thanks, Data.
Reg?
Yes, sir?
You okay?
I'm just fine, sir.
You look a little pale.
I do?
Look, Reg, it's been a long couple of days. Why don't you get some rest. We've got everything under control here.
I think I'll do that, sir. Thank you.
La Forge to Counsellor Troi.
Go ahead, Commander.
Counsellor, do you have a minute?
Lieutenant Barclay, I've been calling you, why haven't you responded? Reg, what are you doing?
I'm walking.
I can see that. Where are you going?
Nowhere. I just don't get to these decks very often. Look, there's Stellar Cartography. I thought that was deck eleven.
Mister Barclay.
I was I was having trouble sleeping and I'm trying to wear myself out. It is a perfectly normal thing to be doing, isn't it?
Commander La Forge said you seemed a little nervous this morning.
I'm always nervous. Everybody knows that.
He also mentioned that you said you saw something in the transporter beam.
Well I was wrong. They checked the transporter and there wasn't. I mean, there was nothing there. I imagined the whole thing.
You don't sound very convinced of that.
Listen, Counsellor, I really appreciate your concern in this matter but I really wish you wouldn't continue this conversation. I'm really perfectly fine.
Mister Barclay, you're exhausted and highly agitated, and I cannot allow a member of this crew to endanger himself and others. I think
I'm not endangering anyone else and I wish you would
I think it would be in your best interest to take a leave of absence. Reg, I'm temporarily relieving you of duty.
Fine, fine. Do what you have to do, Counsellor.
Computer more birds.  End stress reduction programme. Water.
Specify temperature.
I don't care. Just give me water!
Calm, calm, stay calm.  All right, Computer, let's try some music. Something soothing.
O'BRIEN:Sir, begging your pardon, but couldn't this wait til the morning?
No. Chief, I've just, I've been reviewing the transport logs. What are these energy variations that keep appearing? There was one when I transported to the science ship, you see?
O'BRIEN:They're just ionic fluctuations, sir. A result of our interlock with the Yosemite's transporter system.
A fluctuation occurred while I was inside the matter stream?
O'BRIEN:It's nothing to worry about, sir.
I need you to transport me to the science ship and then directly back again. And while I'm in the beam, can you recreate one of those ionic fluctuations?
O'BRIEN:I guess so. But if you don't mind my asking, sir, what for?
I need. Commander La Forge wants some tricorder readings on those fluctuations.
O'BRIEN:We can do that from right here.
No, I, the transporter sensors may not be sensitive enough. I'm giving you an order, Mister O'Brien.
O'BRIEN:Aye, sir. If you don't mind my making an observation, sir, you forgot to bring a tricorder.
Either there's something in there or I'm going crazy, and I've just got to know. You can understand that, can't you?
O'BRIEN:Yes sir, I can. Stand by, sir.
I want you to wake the senior staff.
Then I saw it again, just twenty minutes ago. It was the same exact thing just moving around in the transporter beam.
Let me get this straight. You think this thing was alive?
It was dark and distorted, and it had what looked like a mouth.
A mouth.
I don't see anything wrong with his arm.
Reg, why did you wait so long to tell anybody about your arm?
Well, I thought I was hallucinating, that I had, that it was transporter psychosis. But now I know what I saw in there was real. I was the only one who experienced ionic fluctuations in the transport. Maybe that's why no one else saw it.
Mister Barclay, I've been told you've been under a considerable amount of strain the past couple of days. Isn't it possible that you simply imagined
I know what you're going to say, Captain. I know I've been acting strange lately. But you've got to believe me. I would never have called you in here unless I was absolutely certain.
Commander La Forge, get Mister O'Brien. Take that transporter system apart piece by piece if you have to. Mister Worf, I want a level three security alert until further notice.
Aye, sir.
I'll run a micro-cellular scan of Mister Barclay's arm. It might take some time, but if there's a problem, I'll find it.
Keep me apprised. Dismissed.
I'm reading minute levels of residual ionisation in the subdermal tissue of his left arm. The patterns correspond exactly to those we measured in Lieutenant Kelly's body and in the sample container from the science ship. There's no question. You have been exposed to the same high energy plasma they were.
So something did happen to me in the transporter beam.
You might've been exposed to something from the science ship. You did say something touched your left arm during transport, and that's exactly where the ionisation is focused.
Does this ionisation pose a threat to Mister Barclay?
It might. I'll have to run a base pair correlation to see if there's any sign of DNA breakdown.
Sir, Commander La Forge and I were planning to recreate the circumstances of the explosion on the Yosemite. That might give us some answers. Permission to continue with the experiment?
Granted. Tell Mister O'Brien to take all the primary transporters offline. I don't want to risk any further contaminations. Make sure you take all the necessary safety precautions.
Aye, sir.
I'd like you to wear this monitoring device. It will tell me if there's the slightest sign of increased ionisation.
Yes, Doctor.
Structural reinforcement is at two hundred forty percent.
Activating containment field. Well, that should do it. Okay, Reg. We've locked onto the coordinates of the plasma streamer. Go ahead and beam aboard a sample, will you?
Aye, sir.
Okay. What would they have done first?
A standard analysis begins with a resonance frequency scan.
That sounds like a good place to start. Let's get it done.
Initiating resonance sweep. Frequency range at three
Barclay, check the containment field.
The field is at its maximum limit, but it is holding.
My visor's picking up bio-magnetic energy. Highly complex patterns. You know, I think these things are alive. Reg.
Reg?  Reg.
Life forms?
That is correct. They appear to be quasi-energy microbes that exist within the distortion field of the plasma streamer.
We didn't detect them until we tried to run the resonance frequency scan. Apparently, they didn't like it very much. They shattered the sample container.
Which caused a plasma explosion similar to the one on the science ship.
Exactly. When we linked up with their transporter system, one or more of the microbes must have got into our system. We think they're still caught in the buffer. It might explain what you saw.
But what I saw was much bigger than a microbe.
Normal spatial relationships are often distorted within the matter stream. Your perceptions may have been exaggerated.
Some of these microbes are also in your body, Reg.
Inside me?
They were in Lieutenant Kelly's body as well. That's what caused the contractions during the autopsy.
The biofilter should have screened them out but it didn't.
The microbes exist simultaneously as both matter and energy. The biofilter cannot distinguish them from the matter stream.
Right, but if we held Barclay suspended in mid-transport at the point where matter starts to lose molecular cohesion.
The molecules would begin to emit nucleonic particles. We may be able to derive a pattern the computer would recognise.
And then reprogram the biofilters to screen the microbes out. I think this'll work, Reg.
Suspend me? I don't like the sound of this.
We'd have to hold you in there for a while.
How long?
Thirty, forty seconds. It's tough to tell. But I think it'd be safe.
But if I'm in the matter stream too long.
Your pattern would degrade to the point where your signal would be permanently lost.
O'BRIEN:After fifteen seconds or so in the beam, you may start to feel light-headed. Try to stay calm. Oh, and it's important not to move around too much.
Right.
O'BRIEN:Initialising the back-up pattern buffer. Holding at stand by.
Ready, Reg?
Energise.
O'BRIEN:Molecular resolution at sixty percent. Engaging static mode. His pattern is locked and holding.
Starting biofilter scan.
O'BRIEN:Signal's holding.
The imaging scanners still haven't isolated the microbes.
O'BRIEN:I'll try increasing molecular dispersion.
His signal resolution's dropped to fifty five percent.
O'BRIEN:Don't worry. I can hold him together.
O'BRIEN:Commander, the signal resolution's down to fifty percent. We need to bring him back.
I know, I know. Just give me one more second. We need more dispersion. Increase phase transition frequency
O'BRIEN:Aye, sir.
The imaging scanners are actuating.
Got it. Pattern acquisition Positive.
O'BRIEN:Programming biofilter.
Don't worry, Reg. This won't hurt a bit.
O'BRIEN:I'm reading a ninety two percent increase in mass!
There's something in the beam with him. Security to Transporter room three.
Right away.
O'BRIEN:I'm setting up a force field round the chamber.
Drop the force field.
There are more crew members in the beam. You have to grab them and hold on.
Understood. Follow me.
Reg, what happened?
Well, when I saw there was more than one of them, I thought maybe the other crew was trying the same thing that we were.
We're infected with something. Lieutenant Kelly tried to reprogram the biofilter
It looks like he pushed molecular dispersion past the integrity point. Your patterns got caught in the beam.
The residual energy from the plasma streamer. It must've amplified the charge in the buffer enough to keep your patterns from degrading.
Captain's log, stardate 46043.6. The reprogrammed biofilter was effective in removing the alien microbes from Mister Barclay and the four crewmembers. The microbes have been returned to the plasma streamer.
Chief.
O'BRIEN:Lieutenant. I'm glad you could make it. You know, I think this is the first time we've ever spoken outside of the Transporter room.
Well, to be honest, I always avoided you.
O'BRIEN:Why?
Because you run the transporters, and I hate the transporters. At least, I used to. So, what's in the box?
O'BRIEN:I thought you might like to meet Christina. Christina, Lieutenant Barclay.
It's your pet spider.
O'BRIEN:Lycosa tarantula. Don't worry, she won't bite.
She's very large.
O'BRIEN:I found her on Titus Four. Almost stepped on her by accident. Oh, I'll get us a couple of drinks, okay? Keep an eye on her, will you?
Sure.
Er, Chief?
Captain, I have identified the signal. It is from the USS Jenolen, a Federation transport ship reported missing in this sector seventy five years ago.
Code one alpha zero. Ship in distress.
Take us out of warp, Ensign. All stop.
Aye, sir.
Report.
We have entered a massive gravitational field, Captain.
There are no stars or other stellar bodies listed on our navigational charts. However, sensors indicate the presence of an extremely strong gravitational source in this vicinity.
Can you localise the source of the gravitational field?
Sensors?
I am having difficulty scanning the object. It appears to be approximately two hundred million kilometres in diameter.
That's nearly as large as the Earth's orbit around the sun.
Why didn't we detect this before now?
The object's enormous mass is causing a great deal of gravimetric interference. That might have prevented our sensors from detecting it before we dropped out of warp.
Mister Data, could this be a Dyson Sphere?
The object does fit the general parameters of Dyson's theory.
A Dyson Sphere?
It's a very old theory, Number One. I'm not surprised that you haven't heard of it. In the twentieth century, a physicist called Freeman Dyson, postulated the theory that an enormous hollow sphere could be constructed around a star. This would have the advantage of harnessing all the radiant energy of that star. A population living on the interior surface would have virtually inexhaustible sources of power.
Are you saying you think there are people living in there?
Possibly a great number of people, Commander. The interior surface area of a sphere this size is the equivalent of more than two hundred and fifty million class M planets.
Sir, I have located the distress signal. It is coming from a point in the northern hemisphere.
Ensign Rager, put us into synchronous orbit above that position.
Aye, sir.
I have located the Jenolen, sir. It is impacted on the surface of the sphere.
Magnify.
There are no life signs. However, there are several small power emanations, and life support is still functioning on minimal levels.
Riker to Engineering. Geordi, join us in Transporter room three. Mister Worf.
This air's pretty stale.
Life support is barely operating.
See if you can increase the oxygen level.
Aye, sir.
Commander. The transporter is still online. It's being fed power from the auxiliary systems.
The rematerialisation subroutine has been disabled.
That's not all. The phase inducers are connected to the emitter array. The override is completely gone and the pattern buffer's been locked into a continuous diagnostic cycle.
This doesn't make any sense. Locking the unit in a diagnostic mode just sends the matter array through the pattern buffer. Why would anyone want to
There's a pattern in the buffer still.
It's completely intact. There's less than point zero zero three percent signal degradation. How is that possible?
I don't know. I've never seen a transporter jury-rigged like this.
Could someone survive inside a transporter buffer for seventy five years?
I know a way to find out.
Thank you, lad. We've got to get Franklin out of there.
Someone else's pattern is still in the buffer?
Aye, lad. Franklin. We went in together. Something's wrong. One of the inducers has failed. Boost the gain on the matter stream. Come on, Franklin. I know you're still in there. It's no use. His pattern's degraded fifty three percent. He's gone.
I'm sorry.
So am I. He was a good lad.
I'm Commander William Riker, starship Enterprise. Lieutenant Commander Geordi La Forge.
The Enterprise? I should have known. I bet Jim Kirk himself hauled the old girl out of mothballs to come looking for me. Captain Montgomery Scott. Tell me, how long have I been missing?
Well
Sir. I have restored life support. The oxygen levels will return to normal shortly.
Captain Scott, Lieutenant Worf.
Lieutenant?
Yes.
Captain, perhaps there are a few things we should talk about.
We should probably get you to Sickbay. Doctor Crusher will want to
You've changed the resonator array.
Geordi, I think our guest is going to have a lot of engineering questions.
Not to worry, Commander. I'll take care of him, sir.
What have you done with the duotronic enhancers?
Those were replaced with isolinear chips about forty years ago. It's a lot more efficient now. That's an EPS power tap.
Ah.
So, you were saying earlier that you were on your way to the Norpin Colony when you had a warp engine failure?
Aye, that's right. We had an overload in one of the plasma transfer conduits. The Captain brought us out of warp and we hit some gravimetric interference and then there it was, as big as life. Is that a conduit interface?
Yeah, it is. You were saying its big as life. You mean the Dyson Sphere?
Aye, an actual Dyson Sphere. Can you imagine the engineering skills needed to even design such a structure?
Yeah, it's pretty amazing. So, what happened when you first approached it?
Well, we began a standard survey of the surface, and we were just completing the initial orbital scan when our aft power coils suddenly exploded. The ship got caught in the sphere's gravity well and down we went. Franklin and I were the only ones to survive the crash.
Can I ask you a question? What in the world made you think of using the transporter pattern buffer to survive?
Well, we didn't have enough supplies to wait for a rescue, so we had to think of something.
Yeah, but locking it into a diagnostic cycle so that the pattern wouldn't degrade, and then cross-connecting it phase inducers to provide a regenerative power source, that's absolutely brilliant.
I think it was only fifty percent brilliant. Franklin deserved better.
I think you're going to enjoy the twenty fourth century, Mister Scott. We've made some pretty incredible advances these last eighty years.
From what I've seen, you've got a fine ship, Mister La Forge. A real beauty here. I must admit to being a bit overwhelmed.
Wait until you see the holodeck.
You have a hairline fracture of the humorous. It will ache for a few days, but it should be fine.
Thank you. Well, I'll say this about your Enterprise. The doctors are a fair sight prettier.
I'm Jean-Luc Picard. Welcome aboard the Enterprise, Captain Scott.
Thank you, sir, and call me Scotty.
How are you feeling?
I don't know. How am I feeling?
Other than a couple of bumps and bruises, I'd say you feel fine for a man of a hundred and forty seven.
I don't feel a day over a hundred and twenty.
I must say, I was little surprised when Commander Riker told me that you were aboard the Jenolen. Our records didn't show you listed as a member of the crew.
Well, I was never actually a member of the crew. I was just a passenger. I was heading for Norpin Five to settle down and enjoy my retirement.
I see. Well, I would very much enjoy the opportunity to hear you talk about your career. I'm sure you would have some fascinating insights into the events of your time.
I'd be happy to.
Good. Well, I look forward to it. Excuse me. Commander, we need to begin a full spectrographic analysis of the Dyson Sphere.
I'll get right on it, sir.
Good. Once again, welcome on board, Captain.
Sir.
I need to get down to Engineering and begin that analysis.
Engineering? I thought you'd never ask.
Captain, the first thing you need to get is some rest. Now this has been a shock to your system, and I want you to not push yourself.
We're pretty busy down there, anyway, Captain Scott. I promise I'd be happy to give you a tour just as soon as the doctor says it's okay.
I'll have someone show you your quarters.
Aye.
This is the food replicator, and your computer terminal.
Good Lord, man, where have you put me?
These are standard guest quarters, sir. I can try and find something bigger if you want.
Bigger? In my day, even an Admiral wouldn't have had such quarters on a starship. You know, I remember a time we had to transport the  Dohlman of Elaas. You never heard anyone whine and complain so much about quarters as she did.
The holodecks, Ten Forward, and the gymnasium are all at your disposal. The computer can tell you how to find them. Until we issue you a combadge, just use one of these panels if you need anything.
You know, these quarters remind me of a hotel room on Argelius. Oh, now there is a planet. Everything a man wants right at his fingertips. Of course, on the first visit, I got into a wee bit of trouble.
Excuse me, sir but I have to return to duty.
Oh. Well then. Thank you.
I want you to shut down the warp engines and recalibrate the aft sensors while I work on the lateral array.
Aye, sir.
Can I help you, sir?
Oh, I don't think so, lassie, but I'll let you know if you can.
Sir, this area is restricted to authorised personnel
Bartel, it's okay. I'll handle it. Captain Scott, this really isn't
We're in Engineering. Call me Scotty.
Scotty, this really isn't a good time for a tour. We're running a phase seven survey of the Dyson Sphere.
I'm not here for a tour, laddie. I'm here to help.
That's very kind, but I'm sure we can handle it.
I was a Starfleet engineer for fifty two years, Mister La Forge. I think I'm still useful.
You're right. We'd be grateful for any help you can give us.
Good. Let's get to work.
Sensor readings indicate the presence of a G-type star at the centre of the sphere. There also appears to be a class-M atmosphere clinging to the interior surface.
Is there any indication that the sphere is inhabited?
Not as yet, sir. Our preliminary data suggests it is still capable of supporting life. We have been unable to find definite signs of current habitation.
Mister Data, send out a series of class-four probes to survey the far side of the sphere. Perhaps we'll have more luck with them.
Aye, sir.
Adjust the frequency stabilisation on the main deflector dish. It's out of synch with the aft sensors.
Laddie, you need to phase-lock the warp fields within three percent or they'll become unstable.
What?
Well look here. The warp field is
We use a multiphase auto-containment field now. It's meant to operate above three percent.
Oh. Well, that would make the difference.
We can re start the engines in ten minutes, Commander.
Thank you, Lieutenant.
I remember a time when the old Enterprise was spiralling in toward  Psi two thousand.
Thank you.
The Captain wanted to try a cold start of the warp engines. I told him that without a proper phase lock it would take at least thirty minutes You canna change the laws of physics, I told him, but he wouldn't believe me, so I had to come up with a new engine start-up routine. Do you know that your dilithium crystals are going to fracture?
We recomposite the crystals while they're still inside the articulation frame. Look, Mister Scott, I'd love to explain everything to you, but the Captain wants this spectrographic analysis done by thirteen hundred hours.
Do you mind a little advice? Starfleet captains are like children. They want everything right now and they want it their way, but the secret is to give them only what they need, not what they want.
Yeah, well I told the Captain I'd have this analysis done in an hour.
How long will it really take?
An hour.
You didn't tell him how long it would really take, did you?
Of course I did.
Oh, laddie, you've got a lot to learn if you want people to think of you as a miracle worker. Now listen
Captain Scott. I've tried to be patient, I've tried to be polite. But I've got a job to do here, and quite frankly, you're in the way.
I was driving starships while your great-grandfather was still in diapers. I'd think you'd be a little grateful for a some help. I'll leave ye to work, Mister La Forge.
May I help you, sir?
Aye, lad. Scotch, neat.
There you go, sir.
Thank you.
What in blazes is this?
Didn't you order Scotch?
Laddie, I was drinking Scotch a hundred years before you were born and I can tell you that whatever this is, it is definitely not Scotch.
I believe I may be of some assistance. Captain Scott is unaware of the existence of synthehol.
Synthehol?
Yes, sir. It is an alcohol substitute now being served aboard starships. It simulates the appearance, taste and smell of alcohol, but the intoxicating affects can be easily dismissed.
You're not quite human, are you?
No, sir. I am an android. Lieutenant Commander Data.
Synthetic Scotch, synthetic commanders.
I believe Guinan does keep a limited supply of non-syntheholic products. Perhaps one of them would be to your liking.
What is it?
It is  It is   It is green.
Ah!
Please enter programme.
The android at the bar said you could show me my old ship. Let me see it.
Insufficient data. Please specify parameters.
The Enterprise. Show me the Bridge of the Enterprise, you chattering piece of
There have been five Federation ships with that name. Please specify by registry number.
NCC One Seven Oh One. No bloody A, B, C, or D.
Programme complete. Enter when ready.
Here's to you, lads.
I hope I'm not interrupting. I was just coming off duty and I wanted to see how you were doing.
Not at all, not at all. Have a drink with me, Captain.
Thank you.
I don't know what it is, exactly, but I would be real careful. It's real
Aldebaran whiskey. Who do you think gave it to Guinan?
Ah.
Constitution class.
Aye. You're familiar with them?
There's one in the Fleet museum, but then of course, this is your Enterprise?
I actually served on two. This was the first. She was also the first ship I ever served on as Chief Engineer. You know, I served aboard eleven ships. Freighters, cruisers, starships, but this is the only one I think of. The only one I miss.
The first ship I ever served aboard as Captain was called the Stargazer. It was an overworked, underpowered vessel, always on the verge of flying apart at the seams. In every measurable sense, my Enterprise is far superior. But there are times when I would give almost anything to command the Stargazer again.
It's like the first time you fall in love. You don't ever love a woman quite like that again. Well, to the Enterprise and the Stargazer. Old girlfriends we'll never meet again.
What do you think of the Enterprise D?
She's a beauty, with a good crew.
But?
But. When I was here, I could tell you the speed that we were traveling by the feel of the deckplates. But on your ship, I feel like I'm just in the way.
Seventy five years is a long time. If you would care to study some technical schematics or
I'm not eighteen. I can't start out like a raw cadet. No, there comes a time when a man finds that he can't fall in love again. He knows that it's time to stop. I don't belong on your ship. I belong on this one. This was my home. This is where I had a purpose. But it's not real. It's just a computer generated fantasy. And I'm just an old man who's trying to hide in it. Computer, shut this bloody thing off. It's time I acted my age.
Come.
Mister La Forge, I understand that before the Jenolen crashed, it had conducted an extensive survey of the Dyson sphere. Have we been able to access any of those records?
We did try to download their memory core, but it was pretty heavily damaged in the crash. We actually haven't been able to get much out of it.
Perhaps Captain Scott could be of use in accessing that material.
It's possible. He does know those systems better than any of us. I'll have Lieutenant Bartel beam down with him.
Mister La Forge, I would like you to accompany Captain Scott.
Me, sir?
Yes. Look, this is not an order, it's a request and it's one which you must feel perfectly free to decline. You see, one of the most important things in a person's life is to feel useful. Now, Mister Scott is a Starfleet officer and I would like him to feel useful again.
I'll go with him, sir.
Thank you.
Commander, I believe I have found something on the sphere which could be a communications device. There's an antenna array approximately four hundred thousand kilometres south of our present position. It is emitting low intensity subspace signals.
Can you open a channel?
No, sir, not from our present orbit. The array is currently directed away from us.
Ensign, prepare to put us in orbit above those coordinates. Captain Picard to the Bridge, please.
Are you feeling all right?
Never get drunk unless you're willing to pay for it the next day. I'll manage.
Okay. Energise.
Sensors indicate that the large circle is a portal or airlock, possibly leading to the interior of the sphere.
This looks like the front door. Should we ring the bell?
Mister Worf, open a channel to that communications array.
Aye, sir.
Some type of tractor beam has locked onto us.
Helm, get us out of here!
We've lost main power. Auxiliary power down to twenty percent.
We're being pulled inside.
Auxiliary power failing.
The resonance frequency of the tractor beams is incompatible with our power systems. Warp and impulse engine relays have been overloaded. I am attempting to compensate.
The tractor beams have released us, sir.
Hold position here until we can get our bearings.
Full sensor sweep, Mister Data. Where are we?
Approximately ninety million kilometres from the star's photosphere. I am reading a great deal of surface instability. It may be
Sir! The inertial motion from the tractor beams is still carrying us forward. Impulse engines are offline and I can't stop our momentum. We're falling directly into the star.
The primary computer database should be online now. Give it a try.
Okay. I've got three access lines to the central core. Still nothing.
Bunch of old, useless, garbage.
Huh?
I say it's old, Mister La Forge. It can't handle the interface of your power converter. This equipment was designed for a different era. Now it's just a piece of junk.
I don't know. It seems like some of it's held together pretty well.
A century out of date. It's just obsolete.
Well you know, that's interesting because I was just thinking that a lot of these systems haven't changed much in the last seventy five years. This transporter is basically the same system we use on the Enterprise. Subspace radio and sensors still operate under the same basic principle. Impulse engine design hasn't changed much in the last two hundred years. If it wasn't for all the structural damage, this ship might still be in service today.
Maybe so, but when they can build ships like your Enterprise, who'd want to pilot an old bucket like this?
I don't know. If this ship were operational I bet she'd run circles around the Enterprise at impulse speeds. Just because something's old doesn't mean you throw it away.
We used to have something called a dynamic mode converter. You wouldn't have something like that on your Enterprise would you?
I haven't seen anything like that in a long time, but I bet I might be able to come up with something similar. La Forge to Enterprise. La Forge to Enterprise, come in, please.
Interference?
No, they're gone.
We will enter the sun's photosphere in three minutes.
Manoeuvring thrusters?
I've got thirty percent power. It won't be enough to stop us.
No, but it may be enough to turn us into orbit, hold our distance from the photosphere. Ensign, port thrusters ahead full, starboard thrusters back full.
Our flight path is changing. Right ten point seven degrees, sir. Insufficient to clear the photosphere.
Lieutenant Bartel, divert all power from auxiliary relay systems to the manoeuvring thrusters.
Aye, sir.
We're in orbit, Captain. Our altitude is one hundred fifty thousand kilometres.
I'll see about getting main power back online.
Very well. Mister Data, begin a scan of the interior surface for life forms. I want to know who brought us in here and why.
Aye, sir.
I can't find them anywhere in orbit.
They could've crashed into the sphere like the Jenolen.
No, we'd be picking up background radiation if they'd gone down.
There's another possibility. They could be inside the sphere.
Maybe. Whatever happened, we've got to find them. If we can get these engines back online, we could track them with their impulse ion trail.
Are ye daft? The main drive assembly's shot, the inducers are melted, and the power couplings are wrecked. We'd need a week just to get started. But we don't have a week, so there's no sense in crying about it. Come on, We'll see what we can do with your power converter.
The sphere appears to be abandoned. Sensors show that the star is extremely unstable. It is experiencing severe bursts of radiation and matter expulsions.
Then that would explain why they abandoned it. But if there's no one still living there, how were we brought inside?
I believe we triggered a series of automatic piloting beams designed to guide ships into the sphere.
Sir, Sensors show a large magnetic disturbance on the star's surface.
It is a solar flare, Captain. Magnitude twelve, class B.
Shields?
Shields are up, but only at twenty three percent.
The star has entered a period of increased activity. Sensors indicate that the solar flares will continue to grow. In three hours, our shields will no longer be sufficient to protect us, sir.
Shunt the deuterium from the main cryo-pump to the auxiliary tank.
The tank can't withstand that kind of pressure.
Where'd you get that idea?
What do you mean, where did I get that idea? It's in the impulse engine specifications.
Regulation forty two slash fifteen, pressure variances on IRC tank storage?
Yeah.
Forget it. I wrote it. A good engineer is always a wee bit conservative, at least on paper. Just bypass the secondary cut-off valve and boost the flow. It'll work.
Okay.
If we've done our jobs properly, the engines should be coming back online about now.
Hey, you were right. The auxiliary tank is holding.
Take the Bridge, Commander.
Oh, no, you're the senior officer here.
I may be captain by rank, but I never wanted to be anything else but an engineer.
All right.
Shields still holding, sir, but they are down another fifteen percent.
Mister Worf, can we use the phasers to open a hole in the sphere?
No, sir. The exterior shell is composed of carbon neutronium. Our weapons would be ineffective.
Mister Data, we have to find some way out of here. Begin scanning for another hatch or portal that might still be open.
The interior surface area is over ten to the sixteenth square kilometres. It will take seven hours to completely scan the surface.
I will endeavour to speed up the process, sir.
The Enterprise ion trail leads right to this point.
It looks like some kind of doorway.
I'll bet you two bottles of Scotch that they're inside the sphere and that they went in right through that hatch.
No bet here. The question is how?
Look at the momentum distribution of the ions. It would take an impulse engine at full reverse to put out a signature like that.
So they didn't go in willingly. This looks like some kind of communications array.
Aye. We found hundreds of them when we did our initial survey seventy five years ago.
Did you try hailing them?
Aye. That was standard procedure at the time. We did it right before we crashed.
Hailing is standard procedure today, too. Scotty, what if those aren't communications arrays? What if they're access terminals which are triggered by subspace signals on certain frequencies.
Frequencies like our standard ship's hail.
Exactly. The Enterprise, when they saw that terminal, they probably did the same thing you did seventy five years ago. Opened a channel. Only this time they triggered something that activated that hatch and pulled the ship inside the sphere.
Very nice piece of reasoning, laddie. Nice indeed.
Yeah. We could probably trigger the hatch ourselves, only we'd get pulled in like they were.
Maybe all we need to do is to get our foot in the door. We might not be pulled inside when the hatch opens if we keep our distance from the sphere. Say, half million kilometres. Then when the hatch starts to close, we move in and we use the Jenolen to jam the hatch open, hoping that the Enterprise will escape.
You can't be serious. That hatch is huge. It'll crush this ship like an egg.
Geordi, the shields will hold. Don't worry about that. I can get a few extra gigawatts out of these babies.
Scotty, it's crazy.
Geordi. I have spent my whole life trying to figure out crazy ways of doing things. I'm telling you, as one engineer to another, I can do this.
All right. Let's do it.
We're at five hundred thousand kilometres.
Engines are ready.
Okay. Here we go.
Come on. There's nothing out here. Give it up.
That's it. Let's go! Full impulse.
Sir, there is an audio message from Commander La Forge.
La Forge to Enterprise, do you read me?
Go ahead, Commander. We read you.
We're using the Jenolen to hold open the hatch that you came through, but our shields aren't going to hold out much longer.
Understood. Ensign, set a course.
The plasma intercooler's gone. The engines are overheating.
I've lost helm control. La Forge to Enterprise. Captain, we're not going to be able to move this ship out of the way when you get here.
You're going to have to destroy it in order to escape.
How much longer before we reach them?
With impulse engines operating at sixty percent power, it will take one minute and forty seconds.
Bridge to Transporter room three. Prepare to beam two from the Jenolen as soon as we're within range.
It's coming apart, Lad. I can't do anything else.
Photon torpedoes armed and ready, sir.
We are within transporter range.
Bridge to Transporter room. Energise.
Aye, sir.
Fire torpedoes.
There now, that wasn't so bad, was it?
Captain's log, stardate 46125.3. Starfleet has dispatched two science vessels to study the Dyson Sphere while we proceed to Starbase fifty five.
So, this  alien space baby, which was about the size of a four story building, really thought the Enterprise was its mother.
You're pulling an old man's leg.
No, really. It was suckling power directly from the ship's fusion reactors, so Doctor Brahms and I changed the power frequency from twenty one centimetres to point oh two centimetres.
You soured the milk.
That's right.
Enjoy these times, Geordi. You're the chief engineer of a starship, and it's a time of your life that'll never come again. When it's gone, it's gone. Now, lad, I thought you were going to buy me a drink in Ten Forward.
Actually, I had a better idea.
You're giving me one of your shuttles?
Well, call it an extended loan. Since you lost your ship saving ours, it seemed only fair.
She's not much to look at.
Laddie, every woman has her own charm. You just have to know where to look for it.
She's a little slow, but she'll certainly get you to the Norpin colony. If that's really where you want to go.
The Norpin Colony is for old men to retire. Maybe someday I'll end up there, but not yet.
Well, bon voyage, Mister Scott.
Thank you, sir, for everything.
Mister Scott.
Goodbye.
Bye, bye.
Scotty.
Thank you.
Bye. Be well.
A good crew.
Yeah, they are.
A fine ship. A credit to her name. But I've always found that a ship is only as good as the engineer who takes care of her, and from what I can see the Enterprise is in good hands.
You take care of yourself out there.
Aye.
Hot chocolate, please.
We don't ordinarily say please to food dispensers around here.
Well, since it's listed as intelligent circuitry, why not? After all, working with so much artificial intelligence can be dehumanising, right? So why not combat that tendency with a little simple courtesy. Thank you.
For someone who just arrived, you certainly aren't shy with your opinions.
Have I been talking too much?
No.
Oh, I do tend to have a bit of a motor mouth, especially when I'm excited. A nd you don't know how exciting it is to get this assignment. Everyone in class, I mean everyone, wants the Enterprise. I mean, it would have been all right to spend some time on Reiner Six doing phase work with anti-matter. That's my specialty.
I know. That's why you got this assignment.
I did it again. It's just that
I know, you're excited. Look, Sonya.
Yes.
I don't think you want to be around these control stations with that hot chocolate, do you?
Oh, I'm sorry. I shouldn't even have this in Engineering. It's just we were talking and I forgot I had it in my hand. I'm going to go finish it over here. Lieutenant La Forge? This is not going to happen again.
Oh, no! Oh, I'm sorry. Oh, Captain.
Actually it's my fault, sir.
Indeed.
Oh, I wasn't looking. It's all over you.
Yes, Ensign. It's all over me.
At least let me, sir.
Ensign er, Ensign?
Oh, Ensign Sonya Gomez.
Ensign Gomez is a recent Academy graduate. She just transferred over at Starbase One Seventy Three.
Is that so? Well, Ensign Sonya Gomez, I think it will be simpler if I simply change my uniform.
Captain, I must accept responsibility for this.
Yes, Chief Engineer. I think I understand.
I just want to say, sir, that I'm very excited about this assignment and I promise to serve you and my ship, your ship, this ship, to the best of my ability.
Yes, Ensign, I'm sure that you will. Carry on.
Oh, my. First impressions, right? Isn't that what they say? First impressions are the most important.
I'll give you this. It's a meeting the Captain won't soon forget.
Deck nine. Officers' quarters.
Crewman? What is going on?
Welcome, Picard, to shuttlecraft six.
Q.
There, there, haven't we been careless. A little cleaning service I'm only too than happy to provide.
We agreed you would never trouble my ship again!
I always keep my arrangements, sir. Look, we're nowhere near your vessel.
I read your graduating thesis. Now, I wouldn't have requested you if you weren't the best.
Where are we going?
Ten Forward. We're going to forget about work. We are going to sit, talk, relax, look at the stars. You need to learn how to slow down.
Oh, no, no, no, no, no. I can't do.
You know, you're awfully young to be so driven.
Yes, I am. I had to be. I had to be the best because only the best get to be here. Geordi, Lieutenant
It's okay. Go on.
Whatever is out here, we're going to be the first humans to see it. And I want to be a part of that. I want to understand it.
Sonya, relax. You're here. You've made it. But you won't last long banging into walls. It'll be there for you, believe me.
Okay.
Look, I promise I won't let anything exciting slip past without letting you know, okay?
Okay.
Okay.
Bridge, this is Ten Forward.
Guinan? I don't remember you ever calling the Bridge before.
Is everything alright?
How do you mean?
Is there anything unusual happening?
No Guinan, nothing out of the ordinary. Why do you ask?
I'm not sure. It's just a feeling. I've had it a couple of times before. It's probably nothing. Forget that I called. Ten Forward out.
The locator beacon won't help. They'll never think to look for you this far away.
Enterprise, this is Picard. Stop this foolishness, Q. Return me to the Enterprise.
I suggest you change your attitude. Petulance does not become you. We have business, Picard.
Keeping me a prisoner here will not compel me to discuss anything with you.
It will in time.
I appreciate your advice, Lieutenant. And, I'll take it to heart.
Guinan?
Can I get you something?
We're fine. Is everything all right?
I don't know.
I think I'll go check out Engineering.
I'll go with you.
Where's the Captain?
In his quarters?
Captain, this is Counsellor Troi.
Computer locate Captain Picard.
The Captain is not on the ship.
Commander, there is a shuttle missing from bay two.
All stop.
Answering all stop, sir.
I have hailed the shuttle on all frequencies. No response.
Sensors indicate no shuttle or other ships in this sector.
We think we can assume the Captain is aboard that shuttle.
How could he get to the shuttlebay and leave the Enterprise without us knowing? That's not possible.
Take it easy, Wes. We're going to find him. I want to begin a methodical search. Worf, set sensors on maximum scan. Data, use our present location as a centre. Plot a search pattern from these coordinates to cover the most area in the least time.
Search pattern has been input, sir.
Engage, Mister Crusher.
First Officer:First officer's log, stardate 42761.3. We have not been able to determine why, or how, Captain Picard left the Enterprise. We can't even be certain he is in the missing shuttle, although that is the assumption on which we are proceeding. For the last six hours, we have been searching without success.
We have covered the area in a spherical pattern which a vessel without warp drive could traverse in the time allotted.
Widen the area.
Do we stay out here years? Decades? I am ageless, Picard. You are not.
The Enterprise will continue with Riker as Captain.
You are an impossibly stubborn human.
Return me to my ship!
If I return you to your ship, will you agree to give my request a full hearing?
You're right Picard. This is the proper venue for our discussion.
Commander. My status board indicates that the shuttle is back in bay two.
Computer, locate Captain Picard.
Captain Picard is in Ten Forward.
I knew it was you.
You! Picard, if you had half the sense you pretend to have, you would get her off your ship immediately. And if you like, I'd be more than pleased to expedite her departure.
You know him?
We have had some dealings.
Those dealings were two centuries ago. This creature is not what she appears to be. She's an imp, and where she goes, trouble always follows.
You're speaking of yourself, Q, not Guinan.
Guinan? Is that your name now?
Guinan is not the issue here. You are. We had an agreement that you would stop meddling with us.
And so I have.
What do you want, Q? You state your business. Get on with it.
I agree, Captain. Enough about this creature. She's diverting us from the purpose of my being here.
Which is?
Ah, the redoubtable Commander Riker. And Micro-brain. Growl for me. Let me know you still care.
Worf.
My purpose is to join you.
To join us as what?
As a member of the crew. Willing and able. Ready to serve. This ship is already home for the indigent, the unwanted, the unworthy. Why not for a homeless entity.
Homeless?
Yes.
The other members of the Q continuum kicked you out.
Not all the Q are alike. Some are almost respectable.
Ready and willing. Able to serve. What would you do? Would you start as an ordinary crewman? What task is too menial for an entity?
Sir, do you mock me?
Not at all. That's the last thing I would do. You, by definition, are part of our charter. Our mission is to go forth to seek out new and different life forms, and you certainly qualify as one of the most unique I've ever encountered. To learn about you is, frankly, provocative. But you're next of kin to chaos.
Captain, at least allow me to present my argument.
Worf.
After our last encounter, I was asked to leave the Q Continuum. Since then, I've been wandering vaguely, bored really, my existence without purpose. Then I remembered all the good times I had with you.
The good times? The first time we met you, you put us on trial for the crimes of humanity.
Of which you were exonerated.
The next time we saw you, you asked me to join the Q Continuum.
A big mistake that you did not accept my offer. More and more I realise that here, here is where I want to be. Think of the advantages. Now, I neither expect nor require any special treatment. And if necessary, although I can't imagine why, I will renounce my powers and become as weak and incompetent as all of you.
No.
No? Oh, Captain, in fairness, let me try, I deserve at least that much.
In fairness? You disrupt this ship, you kidnap the Captain.
I add a little excitement, a little spice to your lives, and all you do is complain. Where's your adventurous spirit, your imagination. Think, Picard, think. Think of the possibilities.
Simply speaking, we don't trust you.
Oh. Well, you may not trust me, but you do need me. You're not prepared for what awaits you.
How can we be prepared for that which we do not know? But I do know that we are ready to encounter it.
Really?
yes. Absolutely. That's why we're out here.
Oh, the arrogance. They don't have a clue as to what's out here.
But they will learn, adapt. That is their greatest advantage.
They're moving faster than expected, further than they should.
By whose calculations?
You judge yourselves against the pitiful adversaries you have encountered so far. The Romulans, the Klingons. They are nothing compared to what's waiting. Picard, you are about to move into areas of the galaxy containing wonders more incredible than you can possibly imagine, and terrors to freeze your soul. I offer myself as guide only to be rejected out of hand.
We'll just have to do the best we can without you.
What justifies that smugness?
Not smugness, not arrogance. But we are resolute, we are determined, and your help is not required.
We'll just have to see how ready you are.
Q!
Bridge, this is the Captain. All stop.
Answering all stop, sir.
Status?
According to these coordinates, we have travelled seven thousand light years
And are located near the system J two five.
Travel time to the nearest starbase?
At maximum warp, in two years, seven months, three days, eighteen hours we would reach Starbase one eight five.
Why?
Why? Why, to give you a taste of your future, a preview of things to come. Con permiso, Capitan. The hall is rented, the orchestra engaged. It's now time to see if you can dance.
Guinan, your people have been in this part of the galaxy.
Yes.
What can you tell us?
Only that if I were you, I'd start back now.
Captain's log, stardate 42761.9. Despite Guinan's warning, I feel compelled to investigate this unexplored sector of the galaxy before heading back.
Captain, the sixth planet in the system is Class M.
There is a system of roads on this planet, which indicates a highly industrialised civilisation. But where there should be cities there are only great rips in the surface.
It is as though some great force just scooped all the machine elements off the face of the planet.
It is identical to what happened to the outposts along the Neutral Zone.
Captain, we are being probed.
What is the source of the probe?
A ship. It is on an intercept course.
On screen. Magnify.
Full scan.
Go to Yellow Alert.
Going to Yellow Alert.
Keep the shields down. We don't want to appear provocative.
Aye, sir.
Mister Data, what can you tell us?
The ship is strangely generalised in design. There is no specific bridge, no command centre. There is no engineering section. I can identify no living quarters.
Life signs?
There is no indication of life.
Lieutenant Worf, what is its alert status?
I detect no shields, no weapons of any known design.
Hailing frequencies.
Open.
This is Captain Jean-Luc Picard of the USS Enterprise.
No response.
This is Captain Picard representing the United Federation of Planets. Guinan.
Activate your viewscreen. I would like you to monitor what's going on up here. I may need your input.
I'm here, Captain.
Viewscreen's activated. I have the other ship.
You're familiar with this life form?
Yes.
My people encountered them a century ago. They destroyed our cities
They scattered my people throughout the galaxy.
They're called the Borg. Protect yourself, Captain, or they'll destroy you.
Shields up.
Aye, sir.
All decks, stand by.
Security, report to main Engineering. We have an intruder.
Lieutenant? Status.
It seemed to make a visual survey of the engine core, sir, then it moved in here.
Interesting, isn't it? Not a he, not a she. Not like anything you've ever seen. An enhanced humanoid.
What is it you want? We mean you no harm. Do you understand me?
Understand you? You're nothing to him. He's not interested in your life form. He's just a scout, the first of many. He's here to analyse your technology. He may attempt to gain control of the ship. I wouldn't let him.
Stop! I cannot allow you to interfere with the operation of this ship. Mister Worf.
Ensign.
Mister Worf, use whatever means to neutralise the intruder.
Because her people had contact with the Borg, I have requested Guinan to participate in this conference. You are aware of what occurred just now in main Engineering.
Yes.
What happened between your people and the Borg?
I wasn't there personally, but from what I'm told, they swarmed through our system. And when they left, there was little or nothing left of my people.
Guinan, if they were that aggressive, why didn't the Borg attack? They could have but they didn't.
They don't do that individually. It's not their way. When they decide to come, they're going to come in force. They don't do anything piecemeal.
Then the initial encounter was solely for the purpose of gathering information.
Yes.
How do we reason with them? Let them know that we are not a threat?
You don't. At least, I've never known anyone who did.
Captain, we are being hailed.
On screen.
This is Captain Jean-Luc Picard of the
We have analysed your defensive capabilities as being unable to withstand us. If you defend yourselves, you will be punished.
Counsellor?
We're not dealing with an individual mind. They don't have a single leader. It's the collective minds of all of them.
That would have definite advantages.
Yes, A single leader can make mistakes. It's far less likely in the combined whole.
Picard. Picard, are you sure you don't want me as a member of your crew?
Captain, the Borg have locked on to us with some form of tractor beam.
We're on our way.
Report, Lieutenant.
The beam is draining our shields.
If they pull down our shields, we're helpless.
Warp eight, any heading. Engage.
Captain, the beam is holding us here.
Increase power!
Shields weakening.
Shields will be down in eighteen seconds.
Locate the exact source of the tractor beam. Lock on phasers.
Phasers locked on target.
Fire.
They still have us.
Shields are down, sir.
A type of laser beam is slicing into the saucer section.
Carving us up like a roast.
With whatever force necessary, terminate that beam. Fire when ready.
Again, Mister Worf.
Tractor beam is released, sir. Force field is maintaining our hull integrity.
Damage report?
Coming in, sir. Sections twenty seven, twenty eight, twenty nine on decks four, five and six destroyed.
Casualties?
Eighteen were in those sections and are missing.
What is the condition of the alien ship?
They have sustained damage to twenty percent of their vessel. Life support minimal.
Conference.
I can't get the shields up.
Divert power from anywhere you need it. Anywhere except for life support.
No, it wouldn't help. The circuits which control the shields, they've been fused.
If you can't reprogram, then reroute.
Eighteen people. Dead, just like that.
I know. Just put it out of your head.
No, I can't. I keep seeing them.
Sonya, stop it. We'll have time to grieve later. Right now, let's just get those shields operative.
Right, right, of course.
Guinan, how much more can you tell us about these creatures?
Bits and pieces.
Anything would help.
They're made up of organic and artificial life which has been developing for thousands of centuries.
The Borg is the ultimate user. They're unlike any threat your Federation has ever faced. They're not interested in political conquest, wealth or power as you know it. They're simply interested in your ship, its technology. They've identified it as something they can consume.
You brought us here, you exposed us to them, and you cost us the lives of our shipmates
Oh, please.
Number One. Eighteen of our people have died. Please, tell us this is one of your illusions.
Oh, no. This is as real as your so called life gets.
This is Lieutenant La Forge, Captain. We've been able to restore power to the shields.
Very good.
Captain, I have the casualty list coming on screen.
Cancel. We'll deal with that later.
Sir, if we're going to have further dealings with the Borg now or in the future, I think that we should find out all we can about them.
Visit their ship?
In my opinion, that's the only choice.
Assemble a minimal away team.
What?
Mister Worf, transporter room three. Data.
I wouldn't go there if I were you.
Oh, I don't know, Guinan. They paid us a visit. It seems only fair that we return the courtesy.
Captain's log, supplemental. We have been attacked without provocation by an alien race which Guinan calls the Borg. It appears that we have neutralised their vessel. Commander Riker is leading an away team in an attempt to learn more about them.
There are no life sign readings.
O'BRIEN:I've laid in coordinates which should set you down in the least damaged section of the Borg ship.
Set phasers on stun. Be ready to increase power in case we need it. Energise.
I wonder why they don't react to us, or why the Enterprise didn't read any life signs, especially with this many of them.
Perhaps because this ship was scanned for individual life signs. Apparently when they are in these slots, they become part of the whole and no longer read as separate life forms.
Captain.
Go ahead, Number One.
Our readings were incorrect. The Borg crew survived
They appear to be in some kind of stasis.
Explain.
There are slots along the wall, kind of like compartments. There are two Borg in each.
Captain, I would theorise that the Borg are somehow interconnected through these slots and are working collectively.
We're going try to access their main computer.
Commander, I believe each slot is designed for a specific Borg. Here is where the connection is made.
Like a juggernaut, it could begin moving at any moment.
The technology required to achieve this biological and artificial interface is far beyond our capabilities. There are many advantages.
Speed being the most obvious. This ship literally just thinks what it wants, and then it happens.
Fascinating.
They either don't see us, or don't see us as a threat.
Transporter Chief.
O'BRIEN:O'Brien here, Captain.
If your lock on the away team wavers in the slightest, beam them back immediately.
O'BRIEN:Count on it, sir.
Captain this is incredible. We've entered what appears to be the Borg nursery.
Describe it.
From the look of it the Borg are born as biological life form. It seems that almost immediately after birth they begin artificial implants. Apparently the Borg have developed the technology
To link artificial intelligence directly into the humanoid brain.
Astounding.
Commander?
What is it?
The ship appears to be regenerating. Perhaps this explains why they have not taken notice of our presence. Their collective effort is being directed into repairing this vessel.
Captain,
The Borg seem to be using their combined power to repair the ship.
Transporter Chief, beam the away team directly to the Bridge.
Let's get the hell out of here. Warp eight. Now, Mister Crusher. Engage.
Captain, the Borg are in pursuit.
On screen. Magnify.
Increase to ten to the third power.
It's continuing to regenerate.
Let's see if we can outrun them. Lieutenant La Forge, I want maximum warp
For as long as we can hold it.
Yes, sir. We are passing warp eight point five.
Eight point eight. Warp nine.
Arm the photon torpedoes. See if we can slow them down.
Torpedoes armed.
Fire.
They had no effect.
Bridge, this is Engineering. We are now at warp nine point six five.
The Borg are still gaining.
They will follow this ship until you exhaust your fuel. They will wear down your defences. Then you will be theirs. Admit it, Picard. You're out of your league. You should have stayed where you belonged.
Captain's log supplemental. We are unable to maintain the gap between the Enterprise and the Borg ship.
Engineering to Bridge.
Go ahead.
You've got all we can give you.
I understand, Mister La Forge.
Captain, the enemy vessel is firing on us. There are no reports of any damage to the Enterprise.
Captain, the target was not the ship. The weapon was designed to drain the shields.
Confirmed. Shield effectiveness has been reduced twelve percent.
Captain, the Borg ship is closing.
They're firing again. Shields have been reduced forty one percent. Another hit and we will be defenceless.
Arm the photon torpedoes.
Torpedoes armed.
Fire the photons.
The Borg ship was not damaged.
You can't outrun them. You can't destroy them. If you damage them, the essence of what they are remains. They regenerate and keep coming. Eventually you will weaken, your reserves will be gone. They are relentless.
The Borg ship is firing. We have lost shields again.
Captain, we've just lost the warp engines.
Where's your stubbornness now, Picard, your arrogance? Do you still profess to be prepared for what awaits you?
The Borg ship is re-establishing its tractor beam.
Lock on photon torpedoes.
Yes, sir.
Without our shields, at this range there is a high degree of probability that a photon detonation could destroy the Enterprise.
Prepare to fire.
I'll be leaving now. You thought you could handle it, so handle it.
Q. End this.
Moi? What makes you think I am either inclined or capable to terminate this encounter?
If we all die, here, now, you will not be able to gloat. You wanted to frighten us. We're frightened. You wanted to show us that we were inadequate. For the moment, I grant that. You wanted me to say I need you. I need you!
Position.
Zero seven zero, mark six three, sir. Back where we started.
That was a difficult admission. Another man would have been humiliated to say those words. Another man would have rather died than ask for help.
I understand what you've done here, Q, but I think the lesson could have been learned without the loss of eighteen members of my crew.
If you can't take a little bloody nose, maybe you ought to go back home and crawl under your bed. It's not safe out here. It's wondrous, with treasures to satiate desires both subtle and gross, but it's not for the timid.
Mister Crusher, set course for the nearest starbase.
Course laid in for Starbase Eighty Three, sir.
Engage.
Q set a series of events into motion, bringing contact with the Borg much sooner than it should have come. Now, perhaps when you're ready, it might be possible to establish a relationship with them. But for now, for right now, you're just raw material to them. Since they are aware of your existence
They will be coming.
You can bet on it.
Maybe Q did the right thing for the wrong reason.
How so?
Well, perhaps what we most needed was a kick in our complacency, to prepare us ready for what lies ahead.
Here you are, your very own quarters. They're as far away from mine as possible, so you don't even have to see me if you don't want to.
Mom, you know that's not why I asked for my own quarters this time.
You don't have to explain. There comes a time in a young man's life when he doesn't want to stay with his poor senile mother. I understand.
I'll come visit you in the old Doctor's Home every Sunday.
Come in.
So, is there a runaway cadet in here?
If so, we may have to call Security.
Welcome back, Wes.
Thanks.
So, how's life at the Academy?
It's great. It's great but it's good to have a break.
I was of course not serious about calling Security. It was a joke.
I got it, Data.
So, are you just going to lounge while we all have work to do around here?
I'm sure I can find some time to help you, sir.
Wes, enjoy your vacation. I'm sure you've earned it.
Thanks.
Well, I think we'd better let you settle in.
Yeah, that's a good idea. Say, Wes, don't sleep your whole vacation away, all right?
Goodbye, Wes.
It's good to have you home, son.
Thanks, Mom.
Really.
Admiral Necheyev has just beamed aboard. She's being escorted right here.
Good.
Earl Grey tea, watercress sandwiches and Bularian canaps. Are you up for a promotion?
I am trying to establish a new relationship with the Admiral. There has been a certain amount of tension between us in the past.
Tension is hardly the word I'd use.
Well, I am trying to get things off on a better note this time. I want to make her feel at ease. I want her to feel that she's welcome aboard the Enterprise.
Is there any reason she shouldn't feel welcome here?
We don't have to like her, Will, but we have to follow her orders, and maintaining this atmosphere of confrontation serves no purpose.
Admiral Necheyev, welcome aboard the Enterprise.
Thank you. You may leave, Commander Riker.
Thank you, Admiral. Captain.
May I offer you some refreshment?
I'll come right to the point, Captain. There is a situation that's developed on the Cardassian border that.  Are those Bularian canaps?
As a matter of fact, they are. I spoke with your aide, Commander Wrightwell, and he said that you were particularly fond of them.
That was very thoughtful, Captain. Thank you.
Please. You were saying about the Cardassians?
Yes. The Federation has just completed a very long and drawn-out series of negotiations regarding the final status of our border with the Cardassians. These will be the official boundaries.
I see.
You'll notice a demilitarised zone has also been created along the border. Neither side will be permitted to place military outposts, conduct fleet exercises, or station warships anywhere in the demilitarised area.
This border places several Federation colonies in Cardassian territory and some Cardassian colonies in ours.
This agreement is far from perfect. Neither side got everything they wanted, but every side got something. And as someone once said, diplomacy is the art of the possible. Those colonies finding themselves on the wrong side of the border will have to be moved.
Well, the colonists are not going to be happy about that. Some of them have been there for decades.
It won't be easy, but it's a reasonable price to pay for peace. Your mission will be to evacuate the colony on Dorvan Five.
Dorvan Five? Isn't that where the group of North American Indians settled?
Yes. They've been there for about twenty years. They've established a village in a small valley on the southern continent. Is something wrong?
Admiral, centuries ago these North American Indians were forcibly displaced from their ancestral lands. These settlers on Dorvan Five originally left Earth more than two hundred years ago in order to preserve their cultural identities.
I am aware of that, Captain.
You see, Admiral, there are some very disturbing historical parallels here. Once more, they're being asked to leave their homes because of a political decision that has been taken by a distant government.
An Indian representative was included in the deliberations of the Federation Council. His objections were noted, discussed, but ultimately rejected. Captain, the Indians on Dorvan are a nomadic group that have settled there only twenty years ago, and at that time they were warned that the planet was hotly disputed by the Cardassians. The bottom line is they never should have gone there in the first place.
Granted, but to go to them now after twenty years later and ask them to leave what is now their home.
I made that same argument with the Federation Council. But it took three years to negotiate this treaty. Some concessions had to be made, and this is one of them.
What if these Indians refuse to be evacuated?
Then your orders will be to remove them by whatever means are necessary. I understand your moral objections, Captain. If you wish, I can find someone else to command the Enterprise for this mission.
That will not be necessary, Admiral.
I don't envy you this task, but I do believe it is for the greater good.
I understand.
And Captain, thank you for making me feel welcome.
You will always be welcome aboard this ship, Admiral.
Thanks, Ensign. Hey, Wes! There you are. Come here for a second. I've got something I want to show you. Come on, come on. You've got to take a look at this. Now, remember how we always used to talk about improving quantum efficiency by creating a new plasmadyne relay? Well, take a look at this.
You've only got one microfusion interrelay in there? Your converter interface'll never hold up.
Hey, I ran these diagnostics myself. This little baby will withstand over five hundred Cochranes of warp field stress.
I don't think so. You better put a secondary phase inverter in there. Look at your subprocessor matrix. It needs an overhaul.
Well, that may be your opinion, Cadet, but I stand by my work.
Read the latest paper from Doctor Vassbinder. He has brilliant new theories on warp propulsion inter-relays. He's say all this stuff is obsolete.
I don't know what's gotten into you, Wes.
Look, do you want my help or not?
With this kind of an attitude, absolutely not. You're dismissed.
Captain's log, supplemental. The Enterprise has arrived at Dorvan Five and I have spoken to the Leader of the Tribal Council. He has agreed to meet with us this afternoon to discuss the situation.
Anthwara, there's very little I can do. The decision about this planet was made at the very highest level of Starfleet.
Do you know how long we have searched for a home? Almost two hundred years. Then we found this world. Can you blame us for not wanting to give it up?
I understand and I respect your people's long journey, but I believe that I can help you to find a new home.
As you can see, there are three other planets in this sector that have environmental conditions similar to those here on Dorvan Five. They're all uninhabited and could be colonised immediately.
And if none of these worlds meet with your approval, then we'll find you other choices.
You do not understand, Captain. The choice of this world was not only because of environmental conditions. There were other more intangible concerns as well. When I came here twenty years ago, I was welcomed by the mountains, the rivers, the sky.
Anthwara, he's laughing at you. He thinks you're talking about old superstition and nonsense.
This is not true. I have the deepest deal of respect for your beliefs and the meaning that they hold for your people.
Then you can respect the fact that this planet holds a deep spiritual significance for us. It has taken us two centuries to find this place. We do not want to spend another two hundred years searching for what we already have.
Captain, I suggest we adjourn. Allow us all time to think about what's been said.
Agreed. We will reconvene tomorrow.
And in the meantime, I would like to invite you all to join us this evening on the Enterprise.
Thank you. We look forward to it.
Ever since you've come on board you've been moody, sullen and rude. What's going on?
Nothing. I just want to be left alone.
That incident in Engineering was inexcusable.
That is my business. I don't need you telling me how to behave.
I shouldn't have to. You're a fourth year Starfleet cadet. You should have a certain level of maturity.
Maybe I am sick of following rules and regulations. Maybe I am sick of living up to everyone else's expectations. Did you ever think of that?
I have been fascinated looking into the history and traditions of your people, and I was very interested to learn that your grandfather, Katowa, was the man who first led the group of Indians from Earth initially more than two hundred years ago.
There was great deal of opposition. Even my own father was against it. But when Katowa made his decision, it was final. My father never said another word.
It's never easy to leave one's home, the safe and the familiar. But there are times when the greater good demands that certain sacrifices are made. I'm sure that was something that your grandfather understood.
So does his grandson. There are also times when a people sacrificed too much. When a people must hold on to what we have, even against overwhelming opposition. What do you know about your family, Captain?
Well, a great deal actually. My father was a strong believer in passing on the traditions and history of the family.
I would like to know more about your family. We have very strong ties to our ancestors. We believe their actions guide us even now. Knowing more about your family might help me to better understand you. Besides, it is always good to understand one's adversary in any negotiation.
I hope that by the end of this matter, you will no longer look at me as an adversary. My family. Well, our roots in Western Europe go back to the time of Charlemagne.
I'm sorry I'm late.
We'll talk about it later.
Wesley Crusher?
Yes?
I am Lakanta.
It's nice to meet you. Can I get you a drink or something.
I have known that you were coming to us for the past two years. Two years ago, I went into the Habak and began a vision quest. While I was there I saw many things, talked to many animals, many spirits. And I saw you.
I don't think I understand.
I know why you came to us, Wesley. To find the answers that you seek.
I just don't know what to do, Jean-Luc. It's as if somebody took my son away and left this stranger in his place.
But in a sense, that's exactly what happened. Wesley left the Enterprise three years ago he was a boy, and now he's returned a young man. And that can't be easy for a mother or a son.
It's gone beyond just the two of us.
Yes, I heard about the incident with Geordi.
Have you heard what happened at the Academy? I called Admiral Brand today. She said his grades are dropping, that he's becoming remote and defensive. If he's not careful, he's going to wash out next term. Maybe you should talk to him, Jean-Luc. Maybe it's the kind of thing a boy, a man needs to discuss with another man.
I don't think he wants either of us to talk to him right now.
But he needs out help.
Beverly, he's got to want that help. If he doesn't, then any efforts on our part can only push him further away. He's got to work this out for himself.
How long have you been watching me?
Since you beamed down.
Well, I'm here. What should I do?
I don't know.
I thought you were going to help me find some answers.
Answers to your questions.
Tell me about this Habak. You said you had some kind of a vision there?
The Habak is holy to us. We hold our rituals and our ceremonies there. It's sacred to us. What's sacred to you, Wesley?
I don't know. I mean, I think a lot of things are important, I have a lot of respect for things. But I don't really consider anything sacred.
Look around us. What do you think is sacred to us here?
Maybe the necklace you're wearing? The designs on the walls?
Everything is sacred to us. The buildings, the food, the sky, the dirt beneath your feet. And you. Whether you believe in your spirit or not, we believe in it. You are a sacred person here, Wesley.
I think that's the first time anyone's used that particular word to describe me.
So, if you are sacred, then you must treat yourself with respect. To do otherwise is to desecrate something that is holy.
Is that what you think I've been doing?
Only you can decide that.
I guess I haven't had a lot of respect for myself lately.
Then perhaps it's time for your own vision quest to begin.
Anthwara, I deeply regret that we have not been able to reach an agreement. But, and I must be blunt, I cannot take no for an answer. This planet will be handed over to the Cardassian government in accordance with the terms of the border agreement. I am very sorry, but you will have to leave.
And if we do not?
Then I will be forced to remove you by whatever means are necessary.
We know you will not take us from this land, Captain.
I may regret doing it, but I am not able
When you first came to us, we did not know why you were sent by the Federation but we knew there must be a good reason. To us, nothing that happens is truly random. So we searched for the true reason you were sent. We did not find it until last night. Are you familiar with the Pueblo Revolt of sixteen eighty?
I am. Several Indian tribes rose up to overthrow their Spanish overlords and drove them out of what is now called New Mexico.
Ten years later, the Spanish returned to reconquer the area. They were brutal. I would use the word savage. They killed hundreds of our people. Thousands more were maimed. The name of one of the soldiers was Javier Maribona-Picard. Your ancestor.
I'm not aware of this incident or of the man you named, and this happened seven hundred years ago. I do not see what bearing it can have
That is why you have come to us, to erase a stain of blood worn by your family for twenty three generations.
Mister Worf, what is going on?
We have unwelcome visitors, sir.
I'm Captain Jean-Luc Picard of the Enterprise.
GUL EVEK:I am Gul Evek. What are all these people still doing here? The evacuation should be well underway by now.
May I have a word with you, alone?
GUL EVEK:As you wish. Wait here.
It was my understanding that there would be no Cardassian presence here for another six weeks. Your arrival here may have upset some very delicate negotiations.
GUL EVEK:Negotiations? The status of this planet has been settled. What are you negotiating?
I would be very happy to explain that to you, but for now I must ask you and your men to leave immediately.
GUL EVEK:Captain, we have been sent here to perform a preliminary survey of all the buildings and equipment being left behind. I have no intention of leaving until our mission is complete.
Very well. Complete your mission. But remember, this is Federation territory, Gul Evek, and until that changes, these people are under my jurisdiction and I will protect them.
GUL EVEK:Is that a threat?
It's a fact. Bear that in mind while you conduct your survey.
This is the Habak, the focal point of our lives. Strangers are not welcome here.
When I asked to come here, you said it would be
You're not a stranger. I told you, I've seen you here before.
What are those figures?
They are Mansara. Dolls that represent the different spirits that come to this place.
This one looks like a Klingon.
Yes. Our culture is rooted in the past, but it's not limited to the past.
The spirits of the Klingon, the Vulcan, the Ferengi come to us just as the bear and the coyote and the parrot. There's no difference.
What should I do?
Start the fire. Then sit and wait.
What am I waiting for?
This is your journey, Wesley. I can open the door, but only you can go through it.
Admiral, the Indian Councils is adamant. They refuse to leave Dorvan Five.
Is there any indication that the Tribal Council will change their position in the near future?
No, sir.
Then I see no other choice.
Admiral, I have every reason to believe that they will resist any attempt to remove them. I strongly urge you to request an emergency session of the Federation Council. The issue of Dorvan Five must be reopened.
Captain, I made that request two days ago. The answer was no. I'm sorry but you have your orders. Starfleet out.
So much for your reprieve from Starfleet.
Anthwara believes that I am responsible for the crimes of one of my ancestors against his people.
Do you believe that?
No, of course not. I respect his belief, but I do not see how it can have any bearing on this mission. But even so, I can't help wondering if a dark chapter in my family's history is about to be repeated. If those people take up arms against us, then I cannot foresee the consequences. Mister Worf, will you come in here for a moment?
Aye, sir.
Mister Worf, will you begin preparations to remove the inhabitants from Dorvan Five.
Aye, sir.
Wesley.
Dad?
You've reached the end, Wesley.
The end of what?
This journey. The one you started a long time ago, when I left you and your mother.
You mean when you died.
You set out on a journey that wasn't your own. Now it's time to find a path that is truly yours. Don't follow me any further.
I don't understand.
Yes, you do. It's just hard for you to accept. Goodbye, Wesley, and good luck.
Dad, wait!
Mister Crusher. Are you all right?
Yeah, Worf, I'm fine.
Lay out a confinement beam trace along the southeastern side of the village. Be discreet. We do not wish to alarm these people.
Yes, sir.
Worf, what are you doing?
We are laying out transporter coordinates for a security perimeter. It may be necessary to remove these people by force.
Worf, we can't do this. These people deserve better than to be removed from their homes.
I understand, but now is not the time or the place to
Do you know what they're trying to do? They're preparing to beam you away and take you to their ship. You're not going to let them do that, are you?
No, we won't. Leave now.
Inexcusable. You defied the orders of the ranking officer on the scene. You put the lives of the entire away team in jeopardy, and you made an already tense situation worse. Your actions reflect very badly on this ship and on that uniform. Now, I want an explanation, Mister Crusher, and I want it now.
What you're doing down there is wrong. These people are not some random group of colonists. They're a unique culture with a history that predates the Federation and Starfleet.
That does not alter the fact that my orders are to
I know Admiral Necheyev gave you an order, and she was given an order from the Federation Council. But it's still wrong.
That decision is not yours to make, Cadet. I don't know what has got into you lately, and frankly right now I don't care. But I will tell you this. While you wear that uniform, you will obey every order you're given and you will conform to Starfleet regulations and rules of conduct. Is that clear?
Yes, sir, it is. But I won't be wearing this uniform any longer. I'm resigning from the Academy.
Riker to Captain.
Go ahead, Number One.
Gul Evek wants to meet with you to discuss the situation on the surface.
Let him come aboard. I'll see him in here.
Aye, sir.
Why are you doing this?
I told you, Starfleet isn't for me.
Look, I may not be able to stop you from throwing away your entire life, but you are going to stand here and explain it to me first. You owe me that much.
I saw Dad today. He told me not to follow him.
You what?
I was participating in an Indian ritual and I had a vision. Dad came to me and told me not to follow him. He said I had to find my own path.
Is that what this is all about? A vision told you to leave the Academy and now you're packing your bags?
No. No, it's more than that. I've known I've needed to do this for a long time. I just haven't been able to admit it to myself.
But you always said that being at the Academy was the best thing that ever happened to you.
I know. For a while it was. But as time went on and graduation got closer, I started feeling really depressed. I thought maybe it was the workload or the stress of being away from home, but it didn't go away. It just got worse.
Why didn't you ever say anything?
I didn't want to disappoint you or Captain Picard or my friends. You guys were all so proud of me.
I'd be proud of you no matter what you were doing, Wesley. I love you.
I know, Mom. I guess the truth is that I was afraid of disappointing myself. I never questioned the fact that I'd be in Starfleet. But when Dad said not to follow him, it just made so much sense. Everything is so clear now.
Maybe it is partly my fault. We didn't realised the kind of pressure we were putting on you to be exactly what we expected you to be
I don't blame you at all. It is my decision. It always has been.
You know that alien from Tau Ceti, the one who could control warp fields with his mind?
The Traveller.
He told Captain Picard a long time ago that you were very special, like Mozart, and that you were destined for something quite different from the rest of us. Maybe this is the first step. I love you.
I love you too, Mom.
You shouldn't be here, Wesley.
Why?
Get down.
Bring them over here.
Why have you taken these men prisoner?
This is not their world. They have no right to be here.
The terms of the treaty gives them the right to survey this planet.
We don't recognise that treaty.
Worf to Picard. An armed group of Indians has taken two Cardassian prisoners. The situation is extremely volatile.
Request instructions.
Stand by, Mister Worf. Have your ship lock on to your people and beam them out of there before something happens.
GUL EVEK:My people? What about these Indians of yours? They've taken hostages. This is our planet, Captain. We will not be chased away by some unruly crowd. Gul Evek to the Vetar.
This is Glin Telak aboard the Vetar. Go ahead.
GUL EVEK:Two of our men on the surface have been taken prisoner. Prepare to send an armed squad of troopers to rescue them and to occupy the village.
Gul Evek, those people are Federation citizens and I am sworn to protect them. If your troops attack that village, my security forces will respond.
GUL EVEK:I hope you realise the consequences of Federation officers firing on Cardassian troops.
Oh, yes, I do. That is why we must to stop this now, before it's too late.
I cannot allow you to hold these men as prisoners.
You have no authority here.
No!
What happened? Did you do this?
I didn't do anything. You did.
I did?
You pulled yourself out of their time. You took the first step, Wesley.
My first step to where?
To another plane of existence, another way of thinking.
I don't understand.
You've found a new beginning for yourself. The first step on a journey that few humans will ever take.
Who are you?  The Traveller.
I've been waiting a long time for this moment, Wesley.
So all those things I saw in the Habak, my father, and the things he said to me, that was your doing?
I merely opened the door for you. What you experienced came from your own mind, your own spirit if you wish. I hoped that you would open your mind to new possibilities, and you did. You pulled yourself out of time, don't you see? You've evolved to a new level you're ready to explore places where thought and energy combine in ways you can't even imagine. And I will be your guide, if you would like.
What about them? I can't just leave them like this.
They must find their own destinies, Wesley. It's not our place to interfere.
But
Have faith in their abilities to solve their problems on their own.
The Cardassian ship is powering its weapons and it's transporters.
This is the Vetar to Gul Evek. Our troops are under attack. They're requesting immediate assistance. What are your orders?
Evek, the last war caused massive destruction and cost millions of lives. Don't send our two peoples back down that same path again. Not like this. Now the future lies in your hands right now. Give us one last chance for peace.
Gul Evek! What are your orders? Can we open fire?
GUL EVEK:Evek to the Vetar. Lock on to our troops on the surface and beam them aboard.
But, sir, they've been fired upon.
GUL EVEK:Those are my orders! Carry them out.
Yes, sir.
Beam up the away team immediately.
Aye, sir.
GUL EVEK:I lost two of three sons in the war, Captain. I don't want to lose the last one.
Anthwara, I want to make absolutely sure that you understand the implications of this agreement. By giving up your status as Federation citizens, any future request you or your people make to Starfleet will go unanswered. You will be on your own and under Cardassian jurisdiction.
I understand, Captain. And we are prepared to take that risk. Will the Cardassian government honour your agreement here?
GUL EVEK:I believe I can convince them that this is an equitable solution. I cannot speak for every Cardassian you may encounter, but if you leave us alone I suspect that we will do the same. Will this be acceptable to the Starfleet Command?
It will not be easy, but with Admiral Necheyev's support, I think they will go along with it in the end.
GUL EVEK:Then if there's nothing else, I will return to my ship. I have a rather long report to write. Captain. Anthwara.
I was right, Captain. You did not take us from our land and you have wiped clean a very old stain of blood.
Captain's log, stardate 47755.3. The Enterprise is preparing to leave Dorvan Five, but former cadet Wesley Crusher will be staying behind.
Where will you go?
The Traveller said that my studies would begin with these people. He said that they're aware of many things. I can learn a lot from them. That's just what I need. More studying.
Somehow I think you'll manage.
Me, too.
Well good luck, Mister. Good luck, Wesley.
Thank you. For a lot of things.
Now you be sure and dress warmly on those other planes of existence.
I will. Bye, Mom.
Goodbye.
Energise.
Oh, you really did it this time, Will. This is not just a scrape, this is a very deep cut. Well, I can heal it, of course, but you've got to stop playing Parrises Squares as if you're twenty one years old. One of these days you're going to fall and break your neck, and I'm not going to be able to heal that as easily.
I wasn't playing Parrises Squares.
Worf's callisthenic programme?
No.
I give up. What was it?
I was trying to feed Spot.
Data's cat?
I told him I'd feed him while he was gone. I was just putting down the bowl of food. The next thing I know there's a hissing ball of fur coming at my face. I hate cats.
I love cats. You know, you've just got to know how to handle them.
Maybe you'd like to do it.
I would be honoured, if I could
Commander Riker to the Bridge.
On my way. Oh, by the way, you'll need this.
Report.
We are picking up a distress call on long range sensors. It is Romulan, sir.
Romulan?
They claim they have suffered a complete engine failure. Power levels are dropping. Life support is failing. It could be a trick.
How long before we rendezvous with Captain Picard?
Approximately thirteen hours.
Lay in a course for the Romulan ship. Let's put up shields and go to Red Alert. I want to be ready for anything.
Aye, sir.
Captain's log, stardate 46944.2. Commander Data, Mister La Forge, Counsellor Troi and I are en route to the Enterprise, after attending a three day conference on the psychological effects of long-term deep-space assignments.
Computer activate automatic helm control.
Helm control activated.
I was just leaving the reception when this Ktarian walks up to me and says,  hello, Diane. I understand you're an empath. I'm a very sensitive man myself. I'm doing a thesis on interspecies mating rituals. Would you care to join me in some empirical research?
That's a very good impression of Doctor Mizan.
How did you know?
He's notorious, but he really is an expert on interspecies mating practices.
Did you help him with his research, Counsellor?
Absolutely not.
I thought it was a topic you were interested in.
How did you enjoy the rest of the conference, Counsellor?
To be honest, I was bored. I spent most of my time at Professor Wagner's phylobiology seminar. I thought the idea of the seminar was that we would all participate, bring different points of views to the discussion. He gathered two hundred scientists from all over the Federation, and all he did was put us to sleep.
I have a memory record of the entire lecture, Counsellor. I can repeat the portions you missed, if you
No, thank you, Data.
Well, it was little better at the physiognomy workshop. Doctor Vassbinder gave an hour long dissertation on the ionisation effect of warp nacelles before he realised that the topic was supposed to be psychology.
Why didn't anybody tell him?
There was no opportunity. There was no pause.  He just kept talking in one long, incredibly unbroken sentence, moving from topic to topic so that no one had a chance to interrupt. It was really quite hypnotic.
Well, I had a great time. The warp-energy symposium was fascinating. I actually had an opportunity to touch a plasma field.
Really? What was it like?
It was incredible. I could feel the plasma moving up my arm. It was warm and, oh, there was this amazing tingling sensation that
Captain? Data?
Moved through my chest. It was incredible. It was like taking a bath in pure energy.
It was not painful?
Oh, no. Counsellor? Is there something wrong?
I'm not sure.
Well, our bioscans check out. There are no physiological anomalies. If something did happen, it didn't leave any biological traces.
How long did it appear to you that we were frozen?
I don't know. Four, maybe five seconds. You just stopped and then started again. I can't explain it.
My memory record does not indicate a pause or disruption during that time period. My internal chronometer and the ship's computer are both perfectly synchronised. There does not appear to be a temporal discrepancy.
Data, let's run a ship-wide diagnostic. Maybe we missed something.
Let's go through all this again. You were sitting there. The rest of us were here. Describe the exact moment when we appeared to freeze.
Well, Geordi was talking about what it felt like to touch the plasma field and you were taking a sip of tea.
Did you sense something from any of us at that time? Any unusual emotion?
Not a thing. I was empathically aware of you right up to the moment you froze, and then it all stopped.  The past few days have been exhausting. Maybe it was my imagination. There were moments in that lecture hall when I thought time was standing still there, too.
Or there is another possibility, Counsellor. This could be nothing more than simple
Are you all right, Counsellor?
What happened?
You were motionless for three minutes eleven seconds.
It appears to be the same effect that you described in us. Do you remember anything?
No. One second I was talking to you, and the next you were all standing around me.
Wait a second. This is weird.
What is it?
I had the tricorder run a comparison between the bioscan I took of you earlier and the one I took just now. In the time between the two scans, you should have aged twenty three minutes, but according to your cellular decay levels you've only aged twenty minutes.
How do you account for this discrepancy?
I don't know, sir. It's as if for Counsellor Troi, for three minutes time just stopped.
Mister Data, contact the Enterprise. Tell Commander Riker to meet us at the rendezvous point as soon as possible. Have him scan the region for temporal anomalies.
Aye, sir.
I'll check the sensor logs, see if I can find anything.
Captain, may I see you?
The Enterprise is not responding to our hails.
Are we within sensor range?
No, sir.
Increase speed to the rendezvous coordinates.
Aye, sir.
We have an engine failure warning in the
Report!
The starboard nacelle just cut out.
Attitude control has been restored.
Full stop. What happened?
The starboard antimatter pod is completely drained. The fuel reserves are empty.
Is there a fuel containment leak?
No, sir. The containment field is intact. all engine systems are operational. The fuel is just gone.
Geordi, I believe I have an explanation. According to the plasma conversion sensor, the starboard engine has been in continuous operation for forty seven days.
Forty seven days? Nah. Let's check that sensor. It must be malfunctioning.
I'll check the fuel consumption logs.
What happened?
My hand.
The cells are metabolising at an incredible speed. Almost fifty times normal.
The pain is going away.
Your metabolism's stabilising.
It happened when I reached for the bowl of fruit.
Captain, I am detecting a temporal disturbance intersecting the table. It appears that within the disturbance, time is moving at an accelerated rate, approximately fifty times faster than normal. The disturbance is spherical in shape. It is extending outward from the hull approximately seventeen metres from the ship.
That would cover the starboard nacelle. No wonder it used up all its fuel.
Check the hull integrity.
It does not appear to be affected.
Mister La Forge, see if you can move us away from the disturbance.
Aye, sir.
Lateral thrusters online. Data, plot a course away from the disturbance.
Make sure it doesn't come in contact with our other engine.
Course plotted. Adjust pitch to twenty seven point three degrees. Set heading one eight zero
Mark zero.
Got it. Reversing at fifteen metres per second.
We are clearing the phenomenon.
All stop.
What was that?
There is another temporal disturbance directly behind us.
Captain?
I think you'd better come take a look at this.
Yes, Mister La Forge?
The sensors are picking up temporal disturbances throughout the region. Different configurations, different sizes. They're everywhere.
Within each disturbance it appears that time is moving at a different rate.
It's almost as if something has shattered the space-time continuum.
The fragmentation effect continues along a heading of two seven zero mark one five.
That's the direction of the Enterprise.
Can we navigate around these fragments?
We'll have to limit our manoeuvring speed to one half impulse, but I think we can do it.
Get us to the Enterprise.
These are the coordinates.
Perhaps the Enterprise has been delayed.
I've got the long range sensors on maximum, sir. There's no sign of the Enterprise. But I am picking up a faint reading. Possibly metallic. It's difficult to tell. The energy levels are practically non-existent.
Take us to it.
Aye, sir.
The fragmentation effect is increasing.
Slowing to one eighth impulse.
There she is.
My God.
Mister Data?
The Enterprise and the warbird both appear to be trapped within one of the temporal fragments.
The fragments seem to be converging at about this point. I'd say we're looking at the centre of the temporal disturbances.
Scan for life signs.
Sensors cannot penetrate the subspace field. I am unable to scan within the vessels.
It looks like the Enterprise has been damaged. There, on the port nacelle.
The warbird doesn't look to have sustained any damage at all. I wonder if the Enterprise even had time to get off a shot.
The Romulans could've decloaked before the Enterprise had a chance to respond.
There's a second energy beam. It's coming from the Enterprise deflector array. Do you have any idea what that could be?
It is impossible to tell from a visual inspection. However, it appears to be focused on the warbird's Engineering section.
We're not going to be able to determine anything from here. We need to get on board the Enterprise.
That would be inadvisable, sir. In each of the three instances we came into contact with one of the temporal fragments, we were integrated into its time frame.
If we beamed aboard the Enterprise, we'd be frozen in time just like they are.
Well, we have to find some way of staying unfrozen. Mister La Forge, what about a subspace forcefield like the one we used on Devidia Two? Could something like that protect us from the effects of the temporal fragment?
Possibly. We'd need an awfully sensitive phase discriminator in order to moderate that kind of field.
The emergency transporter armbands contain a type seven phase discriminator. It should be possible to reconfigure their subspace emitters.
Yeah. Yeah, that would certainly isolate us from the effects of the other time frame. But if we wanted to interact with that environment, we'd have to restrict the field. It would have to be practically skintight.
Mister Data?
I will attempt to narrow the field, sir.
Captain, I think this is going to work, but it's going to take some time.
Well, Mister La Forge, it would seem that time is something we have plenty of.
We've channelled all communications through the subspace relays in the armbands. That way we'll be able to be in continual communication.
How long will the fields last?
About an hour, maybe less. Don't worry. I'll monitor you very carefully.
Counsellor?
I got a little dizzy for a second.
We've created an artificial pocket of time around you, so it's probably playing tricks with your equilibrium. It might take a little while to get used to it. Let me know if it gets any worse.
Beam us directly to the Enterprise Bridge.
Aye, sir. Energising.
There are three Romulans, all of them with disruptors. One at conn. There are none of our security officers on the Bridge. They must have taken us by surprise. It appears that we can move objects in this time frame.
Maybe we could do something to help Will.
I'm wary about making changes in this time continuum until we understand more about what's going on.
Captain, the equipment is no longer functioning. However, the information currently displayed indicates that there was a massive power surge in Engineering.
Security teams had just been sent to transporter room three. And to Sickbay. Counsellor, will you go to Sickbay and investigate? Mister Data, go to main Engineering. See if you can determine the cause of that power surge. I'll be in transporter room three. Mister La Forge?
La Forge here, sir.
Will you lock onto our signals. I want you to beam Counsellor Troi to
I'd rather not, Captain. We've got limited power and your isolation fields consume a lot of energy.
Understood. We'll use the Jefferies tube. Let's go.
Maybe we can go around them.
No, we'll find an alternative route. Let's go back up.
Excuse me, Mister Worf.
Captain.
Counsellor, take a look at this. It appears that Mister Worf had just beamed these three on board, and according to this, three other Romulans had been beamed directly to Sickbay just seconds earlier.
I know. I just saw them.
What are we doing transporting Romulans on board the ship in the middle of a battle? They don't have any weapons and that one looks injured. If they were part of an invasion, then why are they unarmed? It doesn't make any sense.
Captain, there's something I have to tell you. Doctor Crusher has been hit by a disruptor blast at point blank range. If time returns to normal I don't see how she can survive.
Data to Captain Picard.
Go ahead, Mister Data.
Please come to Engineering immediately. It is urgent.
What's the problem, Mister Data?
Captain, I believe I have found the cause of the power surge. There is a warp core breach in progress.
It is the flashpoint of a warp core explosion. And it is expanding.
Expanding? I thought that time was suspended on this ship.
We were incorrect, sir. I have determined that time is moving forward at an infinitesimal rate.
Why didn't we notice it before?
Our initial conclusion was based on our observations of the crew. A warp core breach moves at a much faster rate. The motion of the cloud is within my visual detection threshold. At its current expansion rate, it will consume the Enterprise in approximately nine hours, seventeen minutes.
Is there anything we can do to stop it?
It is no longer a question of stopping it, sir. The explosion has already occurred. The fact that it is moving slowly changes nothing.
Astonishing to see it frozen like this.
Do we know what caused the breach?
No. However, the console displays indicate a power transfer in progress between the Enterprise and the Romulan ship at the moment time decelerated. That is why there is a second beam between the two ships.
Why would we be sending them power?
Perhaps we should go aboard the Romulan ship. The answer to that question may
Captain?
Captain, are you all right?
My head. Oh. Dizzy. I can't.  No! No!
Troi to La Forge. Get us out of here now!
It looks like you weren't completely protected from the effects of the other time continuum. The neurophysical stress must've been overwhelming.
In much the same way deep sea divers experience nitrogen narcosis, you experienced a form of temporal narcosis.
Can we modify the subspace isolators to give us better protection?
I don't think so. I'd say the best thing we can do right now is to be careful, limit our exposure to their time frame. I'd say no longer than ten minutes per trip. And we should stick probably stick together while we're there, just in case.
Very well. Well, the first step is to find out why the Enterprise was transferring power to the Romulan ship. I think we should begin our search in the Romulan engine room. Counsellor, you spent several days on a Romulan vessel. You probably know more about the layouts than anyone here. Perhaps
Captain, it might be better if you stayed here this time and gave yourself a chance to recover.
Yes, very well. I will monitor your progress from here. But just remember, ten minutes, no more.
Yes, Captain.
Geordi, there should be a power utilisation monitor over there. Data.
This is highly unusual. The crew is not at battle stations. The ship is on evacuation alert.
Is that why Romulans were being transported to the Enterprise?
Take a look at this. There's an energy feedback returning through the transfer beam. It's probably what overloaded the Enterprise's engines and caused the core breach.
Perhaps the warbird was trying to destroy the Enterprise.
I don't think so. According to this, the Romulans were actually trying to shut down the power transfer.
Whatever happened, this is beginning to look less and less like a Romulan attack.
Data, why don't we take a look at their engine readouts?
Geordi, the engine core is completely inactive.
That's impossible. The Romulans use an artificial quantum singularity as their power source. Once it's activated, it can't be shut down.
Let's take a closer look.
I think we've found the problem.
It appears to be a highly focused aperture in the space-time continuum. Its energy signature matches that of the temporal fragments we observed earlier. However, it is approximately one point two million times as intense. I believe this may be the origin of the temporal fragmentation.
What are these dark spots?
I am not certain. They exhibit a complex bioelectric patterns. Very possibly organic.
Organic?
From the molecular configuration, it appears  The aperture is beginning to fluctuate. I believe
There's an energy build-up in the phase compensation unit.
ROMULAN 2:Check the main distribution matrix.
That's not it. The matrix is clear. It's the power transfer from the Enterprise. I'm reading a massive feed-back.
ROMULAN 2:Systems are beginning to overload.
Notify the Enterprise to shut down the power transfer immediately.
ROMULAN 2:Unable to comply. Their power interlocks won't disengage. We'll have to disconnect it ourselves.
Disconnect the transfer beam.
ROMULAN 3:There is no pressure.
Impending warp core breach. Shut down all systems.
I believe my tricorder emissions caused the temporal aperture to activate. I suggest we avoid exposing it to any
Further energy emissions.
When time resumed, did you observe any activity in the engine room that might
Suggest what the Romulans were doing?
They may have been attempting to eject their engine core.
I thought I heard one of the Engineers say something about a power transfer. Something about an energy feedback.
Yes, Captain. It looks to me like they were trying to stop whatever was happening here.
Mister La Forge
From where you are, can you determine what's happening on the Romulan Bridge?
I think so, Captain. Wait. Something's not right here. Data, was this man always standing right here.
He's in neural shock,
We must get him to the runabout.
There isn't time. He's dying.
At least this way, he'll be alive in the other time frame. We might have a chance to save him later. Is the Romulan still alive?
Yes, but I am getting unusual readings from his bioscan. I am not sure he is a Romulan.
His cellular structure does not conform to any known species. His bioelectric patterns are in a state of temporal flux. I do not believe that this being is native to our time continuum.
Mister Data, you said that you found organic matter in the temporal aperture.
Correct, sir.
I'd like to take a closer look at those readings.
This is a biospectral analysis of the temporal aperture. The organic readings originated from these dark spots.
They appear to contain some sort of energy patterns. Can you isolate one of them and magnify?
They look like cellular clusters.
Its bioelectric patterns are similar to those of the alien's. However, they are significantly less complex. Its cellular structure appears to be in a state of mitosis.
Data, this could be some sort of embryo.
It is possible. If I could further scan the aperture, it might be possible to
Captain?
Must save. No.
Who are you?
This body is not mine. It was necessary to assume it to exist in your time.
Why are you here?
We had to come to save them. They were in danger.
Who were in danger?
Our young. They will die in the gravity well. It is artificial.
Artificial gravity well? Do you mean the Romulan engine core?
Yes. Our young are trapped. We must get them out, return them to our time.
His molecular structure is destabilising.
How were your young trapped in the core?
We must use a natural gravity well to incubate our young. We thought the Romulan core would suffice. It did not.
Captain, I believe the aliens mistook the artificial singularity, which the Romulans use in their engine, for a natural one. A black hole. They tried to use it as a nest.
That's what deactivated the Warbird's engine core. So the Romulans sent out a distress call.
The Enterprise responded, and found the warbird suffering from an apparent engine failure, and they attempted a power transfer.
Power transfer. Must stop the power transfer. Ruptured time, destroy our young
When the power transfer came into contact with the alien nest, I believe it disrupted the space-time continuum.
Did you who attacked the Enterprise?
Yes. Had to stop power transfer.
Are there any others like you here?
One other.
Do you know where he is? Could he help us restore normal time?
I estimate the core breach will consume the Enterprise in approximately seven hours, two minutes.
Is it possible to lock onto the core itself, beam it into space?
No, sir. We would have to surround the core with a subspace isolation field. It is not possible to generate a field of that magnitude from the runabout.
Mister Data, when you scanned the temporal aperture with your tricorder, it caused time to move forwards and then back again.
Correct, sir.
What if we could reverse that process? Cause time move backwards and then forwards.
We might be able to run time back to a point before the warp core breach occurred and then find a way to prevent the power transfer. And then when time goes forward
The breach never happens.
I could attempt to remodulate the tricorder's delta-band emissions. It should be possible to better control the temporal aperture.
Make it so. If this works, we may not have much time to prevent the power transfer. We'll have to decide precisely where to be and what to do the very instant that time begins to move backwards.
Captain's log, supplemental. After placing the modified tricorder on the Romulan ship, we have returned to the Enterprise.
I have reached Engineering, Captain. Standing by.
Acknowledged. Counsellor, are you in position?
Ready, Captain.
All right, Mister Data.
Initiating tricorder emissions.
Captain.
Go ahead, Mister Data.
The warp core breach has been reversed, sir.
Be ready to stop the power transfer, Mister Data.
Aye, sir.
ALIEN 2:You must stop!
Specified energy systems have been initialised. The power transfer can now be engaged.
Do not initiate that power transfer.
I'm sorry, sir. I already have.
We must shut it down.
The transfer beam is at saturation, sir. It can't be disengaged.
Computer, place a level three containment field around the warp core.
Containment field activated.
Damage report.
Shields down to twenty seven percent.
Captain?
No time to explain, Number One. Continue the evacuation of the Romulan ship. You'll find LaForge in the Romulan engine room. Beam him directly to Sickbay.
Step back, now.
It's all right, Deanna. He wasn't firing at me.
There was an alien here who'd taken Romulan form. I was firing at her. The Doctor got in the way.
Where did she go?
Status, Mister Data?
I was attacked by another alien, sir. I was unable to prevent the power transfer. It cannot be disengaged, sir. A core breach is again imminent.
Can we move the ship?
The feedback from the transfer beam would tear us apart.
Patch me into the navigational control of the runabout.
Got it.
I'm bringing the runabout in.
Mister Data?
The core breach has been prevented, sir.
Data, it appears that severing the power transfer has not only prevented the core breach, but has also restored
Space-time to normal.
The alien who attacked me has vanished, sir.
The warbird has vanished as well.
Judging from the residual temporal fluctuations, I believe they have returned to their own time continuum.
Captain?
It's going to take a little time to explain, Number One.
Captain's log, stardate 46945.3. We successfully evacuated the crew of the Romulan ship, and we're on course to the Neutral Zone to bring them home.
Come in.
Where's that cat of yours?
Spot is sleeping, sir. Why do you ask?
No reason. I've worked out the new rotation schedules. I'd like you to cross-check the personnel assignments. Notify the department heads. Your Bridge shift begins at twenty three hundred hours.
Understood, sir.
Data, what are you doing?
Recent events have compelled me to study how humans perceive the passage of time. For example, I have often heard people comment that time seems to pass more slowly in one instance, or more quickly in another. In reality, the actual passage of time remains fixed.
I suppose it depends on how people perceive time. Every situation is different. It depends on how you feel.
I have been testing the aphorism, 'a watched pot never boils'. I have boiled the same amount of water in this kettle sixty two times. In some cases, I have ignored the kettle. In others, I have watched it intently. In every instance, the water reaches its boiling point in precisely fifty one point seven seconds. It would appear that I am not capable of perceiving time any differently than my internal chronometer.
Well why don't you turn it off?
Sir?
Data, people do not have internal chronometers. Why don't you see what happens if you turn yours off.
Thank you, sir. I will try that.
Just don't be late for your shift.
Sir, we are now twenty minutes from Omicron Theta, mark!
Stand by for subwarp. Head for standard orbit of Data's planet. I wonder why Data hasn't come up here.
He said he wanted to be alone. Perhaps it's a bigger moment for him than we thought.
Aah, ahh, ahh
Data!
Choo!
What are you doing?
Sneezing.
Have you got a cold?
A cold what?
It's a disease my mom says people used to get.
Ah. But humans still sneeze for other reasons and I cannot seem to do it right.
How can you be practicing something like sneezing when we're arriving at your home planet for the first time? Aren't you interested in that?
More than interested. Fascinated. One might say agog. But I also find sneezing interesting.
Captain Picard wishes to see you on the Bridge.
Captain, confirming class M reading there. But the sensors aren't showing any life readings. Not even vegetation.
Strange. The cruiser that found Data reported farmlands here.
Do you want to take her into orbit, Data?
No, thank you, sir.
Continue on into close parking orbit.
Aye, sir.
I could say home sweet home, sir, if I understood how the word sweet applies.
It usually refers to the memories.
It usually refers to one's own memories, Captain. Do the memories you were given include farms, Data?
Affirmative, sir. But the colony's principal interest was science.
Data, I can't understand how you can hold the memories of four hundred and eleven people. If that means every experience, every day of their life?
It does not, unfortunately. It means only the knowledge they had accumulated. Actually, I am quite deficient in some basic human information. Sneezing, for example.
Sneezing?
Approaching close parking orbit, sir.
Assemble your away party, Commander. This must be an exciting moment for you, Mister Data. I'm tempted to lead the away team myself, except that my First Officer would object.
How would Starfleet judge me if I didn't? An entire Earth colony did disappear down there.
You see?
Now in close parking orbit, sir.
Mister Data, welcome home.
First Officer:First Officer's log, stardate 4124.5. We have found Data's home to be a completely dead world made out of lifeless vegetation. No insects, not even soil bacteria. What is it that could kill everything on an entire planet?
Recording signal locked onto the Enterprise, sir.
This looks like anything but farmland.
Agreed, sir. The soil appears almost completely lifeless.
This is the exact position listed in the Tripoli log. Do you recognise anything, Data?
The land contours are familiar, sir. Topographically, this is the correct area.
This once was rich farmland. I'd say something like twenty to thirty years ago.
I was discovered twenty six years ago.
Commander, I'd say that everything on this planet was either dead or dying at the time Data was found.
I was found twenty metres in that direction, sir.
Data, any idea at all why you were given the colonists' memories?
I have always felt that it was done hurriedly, but I know little more. Here, sir. This is where the cruiser's landing party found the signal device that had led them here. And they found me lying there, sir.
You were just lying out there in the open? No identity record, no instructions?
Only a layer of dust.
What's the first thing you remember, Data?
Opening my eyes. Looking into the eyes of the Tripoli landing party. They believed that the signal device sensed their presence and activated me.
Then this very spot was your birthplace.
Commander, I think I've got this place figured out here. This was really very cleverly done to make this look like a natural hollow in the terrain here. There are signs of it being constructed in a hurry as if to hide something here.
Yes, that was it, Geordi. This wakens a memory remnant of how the colonists hoped to remain hidden, but their fear of being discovered led to their storing information in me.
Yeah, thought so.
No life readings in here either, sir.
The colony laboratory. Extremely well equipped. Does this stir any memories, Data?
Only a vague impression of some of my functions being tested here.
Posted by proud parents?
It depicts something that feels familiar, sir. And dangerous. But I have no idea what it represents. And that is all. Except for an impression of this being a Doctor Soong's work area.
Who? You don't mean Doctor Noonien Soong?
He was called that here, but his memories indicate he travelled here under a different name.
Doctor Noonien Soong, my friend, happens to have been Earth's foremost robotics scientist.
Until he tried to make Asimov's dream of a positronic brain come true.
A positronic brain. He promised so much. And then when he failed completely, Doctor Soong disappeared. Now we know he went somewhere else to try a second time. Data, Geordi, we'll get a close look at this lab. You and Lieutenant Worf reconnoitre where these corridors lead.
Aye, sir.
Data, it's you.
An epidermal mold. Made to give your exterior the desired finish.
Lieutenant Yar to Commander Riker.
Come in, Lieutenant.
Sir, this installation is big enough to hold hundreds of people. But all that's here now is empty beds.
Thank you, Lieutenant. Complete your record scans and report back here.
Commander Riker, looks like some sort of storage area.
How many more Datas are there?
Looks like just these two. I mean, that and the real Data.
Commander, can this be another me? Or possibly my brother?
I honestly don't know, Data.
He needs assembling.
He? Data, we don't know that this can become alive.
It is very important for me to know that, sir. I never dreamed it was possible I might find some link with some form like my own.
Understood. We'll take it back to the ship with us.
Captain's log, Stardate 41242.45. Despite having only a few hours in which to explore Data's home planet we've discovered something which may explain Data's beginnings, if we can properly assemble and communicate with what we've found.
Signal from the Captain. They need you at the debriefing.
I've been most anxious to hear the Chief Engineer's opinion, Mister Argyle. Do you believe he can be made to function?
It appears to include all the components in your body. Not that we fully understand your construction either.
We have our top specialists working on its construction, Mister Data.
Just one thing. Without disassembling you, of course, if we should need more
If we should need to compare this with the way you're put together?
Bringing it up here was the right thing to do, Number One. We were just saying, Data, that if your duplicate functions, it might answer a lot of questions.
Does it appear to have all your parts?
Completely, sir.
Will we know how to turn it on?
All right, all right. Legitimate questions about any of this need not be asked apologetically. You feel uncomfortable about aspects of your duplicate, Data. We feel uncomfortable too, and for no logical reason. If it feels awkward to be reminded that Data is a machine, just remember that we are merely a different variety of machine. In our case, electrochemical in nature. Let's begin to handle this as we would do anything else.
Agreed, Captain.
Let's begin with you, Data.
Well, sir, a good starting point may be, why was I given human form?
Well, to make it easier for humans to relate to you. Had to be. But your designer may have had something else to prove as well.
That human-shaped robots need not be clumsy or limited. You certainly operate as well as we do, Data
Better in some ways, sir.
You might want to have a look at this, Captain. Could be a link to the disappearance of the colonists. It was displayed in the lab, no doubt by proud parents. It could be just a child's imagination, but several children did similar drawings.
Doctor Crusher to Captain. At this point, sir, we very much need Mister Data's help.
He's on his way, Doctor.
Press your fingers there, Doctor.  There. It operates almost as a switch.
And these small projections?
An android alarm clock. Is that amusing? They time how long I remain unconscious.
Are you certain about us using these heating devices, Data?
I will feel nothing at all.
Marvellous. It should all be a lot simpler once we can see how your circuitry's connected.
I won't mention it to anyone. You have my word.
If you had an off switch Doctor, would you not keep it secret?
I guess I would.
Notice the micro-circuitry here and here. And another fibroid-like connection here.
Let's close up.
It seemed to go well, thanks to a look inside Mister Data. But there have been no signs of consciousness, yet
It certainly is a good match for Data, sir.
Do you think so, really? I wonder which of them was made first?
He was. But they found him imperfect and I was made to replace him.  You may call me Lore.
I'm also a bit troubled by it describing you as imperfect.
Human language gives me difficulty too, sir. Imperfect could mean I lack certain abilities he possesses.
I wonder. But the point of this is, whether you and it have approximately the same capabilities.
We do, sir, and your referring to him as an it suggests that I, too, fit into the category of a thing.
I see your point. My apologies.
Gladly accepted, sir. As for Lore's abilities, his use of syntax and grammar suggests he was given human memories similar to my own.
And you have about equal physical strength and mental abilities?
I believe so, sir.
Which requires I now ask you a very serious question. Since the two of you are closely related to each other.
The answer, sir, is that my loyalty is to you and Starfleet. Completely.
Thank you, Commander. I was certain of that.
And helm control is here, with the ship's heading given in measurements we call degrees. Three hundred and sixty of them in a full circle this way.
Then you say mark.
On the nose.
Which separates it from another full three hundred and sixty degree circle this way on a right angle to this one.
So by ordering a heading so many degrees this way and so many this way, the ship can travel in any direction. All three dimensions.
And the square of the hypotenuse of a right triangle
Is equal to the sum of the square of the other two. Two something. Which I once heard, but never understood.
All of which you will learn more about when the Captain has approved your being on the Bridge.
Have I committed an offence?
You will find that there are many rules on starships that must be learnt.
You're very clever, Wesley. I now have duties to perform. Correct?
Were you ever this anxious to please, Data?
Never. I judge Lore to be superior in that desire.
Because I was designed to be so human, my brother, I enjoy pleasing humans.
My brother. That has a nice sound to it, Data.
You consider it important to please humans?
It's not important?
There are many things of importance. Some more than others.
Do you realise that Commander Riker's hypotenuse question tricked you into showing your knowledge was greater than you were indicating?
He didn't seem that clever. I'll be more careful.
You tend to underestimate humans, my brother. Praising young Wesley on the helm, for example
A child!
He has a child's body, but we have found him to be much more.
Thank you for that information, too. You do care about how I perform. I pledge to be worthy of your teaching, my brother. Try not to be jealous of my abilities.
What information are you requesting?
Everything available on a Doctor Noonien Soong.
Good old Often Wrong Soong. A joke, brother. Actually, he was a genius by human standards.
But he had destroyed his own reputation by making what seemed wild promises about his positronic brain design, almost all of which failed.
Promises he later proved to be true. Which made you and me possible, brother. Our beloved father. Will I soon have a uniform like that, brother?
If you get one the way I did, Lore, it will mean four years at the Academy, another three as ensign, ten or twelve on varied space duty in the lieutenant grades.
A system designed to compensate for limited human ability. And you, brother, are beginning to think as a human. You and I are completely different from them. Are you truly satisfied with the knowledge and memory of a few hundred human colonists? Suppose it could reflect thousands? Or millions? Or the knowledge of hundreds of millions of life forms of every kind?
How?
We will discuss that in time.
And will we also discuss, Lore, which of us was constructed first?
It would be foolish to underestimate you, brother. Yes, I lied when I said you were made first, but with good reason. Doctor Soong made me perfect in his first attempt. But he made me so completely human the colonists became envious of me.
You lived with the colonists?
Until they petitioned Soong to make a more comfortable, less perfect android. In other words, you, brother. Haven't you noticed how easily I handle human speech? I use their contractions. For example, I say can't or isn't, and you say cannot or is not.  I say tomato, you say tomahto. I say potato, you say potahto.  A very old joke. But then you also have trouble with their humour. Am I right?
Quite true. I keep trying to be more human, and keep failing.
Do you realise, brother, I can help you become more human?
And do you realise, Lore, that I am obligated to report all of this to our ship's Captain?
I assumed as much when I began studying you. May I use this to learn more of this vessel and its customs?
Use it also to describe for the Captain the time you spent among the colonists. Including everything you know about what happened to them.
I promise a report of great detail and accuracy.
Thank you, Lore. I now have duties to perform. Unless of course, you need something more.
I have more than I dreamed possible, brother.
Captain's log, stardate 41242.5. Thanks to Lore's report, we now know what happened to the colonists. Beginning with a child's drawing, enhanced by Lore's description, our computer has constructed the image of a great crystalline entity which feeds on life, insatiably ravenous for the life force found in living forms, capable of stripping all life from an entire world.
But how did Data escape that thing? Or Lore?
Lore had been disassembled. He explained it as jealousy from the colonists. And Data wasn't yet alive at that time.
Which explains why Data could be left outside in no danger from that creature. Whatever happened to the colonists, he would be found by the first Starfleet crew that responded to the signal he transmitted.
By which Doctor Soong left proof behind that his experiment did work.
Captain, how believable do you find that crystal thing?
With so little of even our galaxy explored, I find it at least possible.
Data, are you expecting Lore to come up here? He left your quarters some time ago.
To go?
My turbo-sensors say he went to deck four. Worf?
Where he examined some micro-miniature work tools, and some fine grind quadratanium ?
Which is used in our construction. That particular compound is no more suspicious, sir, than a human looking for an antiseptic or an ointment. Nevertheless, I should check it out.
You're watching everything he does, Data? Is that the act of a brother?
It's the act of a Starfleet officer obeying his Captain, Doctor.
Captain? Speaking strictly as Security Chief, how much can you trust Data now?
I trust him completely. But everyone should also realise that that was a necessary and legitimate security question.
Thank you, sir.
Lesson number one in becoming more human. You must observe all human customs.
Champagne?
An ancient ritual still practiced when they celebrate events of importance. My brother, I toast our discovery of each other. May it fill our lives with new meaning.
I have some doubts about the value of human customs  in this. My brother!
And let us toast also Doctor Soong, who gave me the full richness of human needs and ambitions. A perfect match for my mind, my body.
And let us toast also the great Crystal Entity with whom I learned to communicate. Before Doctor Soong disassembled me, I earned its gratitude by revealing the way to the colonists. Can you image its gratitude when I give it the life on this vessel?
This is strange, sir. I show Commander Data transmitting on a subspace channel.
I know Data's been doing considerable research on Doctor Soong's background. Let's be sure. Wesley, would you look in on Commander Data? Discreetly?
Yes sir!
Crystal Entity. Upon arriving here you can identify me as the machine named Data.  End of message. Come in, please.
Glad you are here, Wesley. Lore suddenly attacked me and I had to turn him off.
Why did he do that, Data?
He discovered we have been using sensors to follow what he does.  I practiced his facial tic. Do I have it right?
I'd suggest you forget imitating him. If you'd said we've been using the sensors, instead of we have, I might have suspected you were Lore.
Yes. I do use language more formally than Lore. Please inform the Captain I will come up to the Bridge and report on this.
Aye, sir.
Wes, tell me again how Data said he immobilised Lore.
He told me he just turned him off, Mom, er, Doctor.
Question, Mister Data. Did you or did you not swear me to secrecy about your off switch?
A change of mind, Doctor. If I cannot trust the bridge crew, whom can I?
Captain, I'm picking up a bogey coming in on a five o'clock tangent.
It's transmitting no ID signal, Captain.
Set main viewer on that tangent.
Shields up. Go to Yellow Alert. Transmit friendly greetings, all languages, all frequencies.
I can't believe anything's overtaking us this fast.
Beautiful, isn't it?
I recognise it, sir. It's the crystal image Lore described.
My God.
Still no ID being transmitted, sir. Also no answer to our inquiries.
Did you get a direct look at it?
It's like a giant snow flake crystal, but much more complex. The entire electromagnetic spectrum seems to play about inside it, but I haven't the slightest idea what it is, sir.
Thank you, Lieutenant. Data, is there anything else that Lore can tell us about it, it may be important. Can you control him enough to question him?
I will have to examine him to know, sir.
Captain, recommend that you do not let him roam the ship freely.
Ensign.
Wesley is only showing himself to be alert and responsible. Something to encourage. Come, you can watch everything I do.
Not if I have a choice.
That is enough, Ensign. When addressing a senior officer.
I've guided his training, sir, I'm the one at fault. You will show the proper respect. I will accompany you down there to make certain of it. With your approval, of course, sir.
Be careful of Lore. Good. He is still unconscious. Notice the same twitch, even though he is unconscious? Stay back. We may have problems if he senses someone else is near.  Lore, I have a few questions to ask you.
Lore, it is Data. He senses you. I cannot control him if you stay. Please! I will record everything he says.
You will bring it to the Bridge, immediately.
And you want to be as stupid as them, dear brother?
Well, Number One?
It was Lore, sir. Same facial twitches that we've seen all along. Lying unconscious on the floor exactly as Data had described. But then it suddenly became violent, apparently sensing that Wesley and I were present.
Or is it Lore pretending to be Data and faking it all?
I asked for Commander Riker's report, Acting Ensign Crusher. And since it now seems clear that you are unable to function within the limits of that appointment
Captain!
Deflector shields holding, sir.
Bring photon torpedoes to ready. Main phasers to ready. Go to Red Alert, please.
Weapons now ready, sir.
No, Captain, let me talk to it.
You didn't say you could do that.  Affirmative. Talk to it.
Open hailing frequencies. Crystal form, I identify myself as Data, advising you to stop your attack. The humans here are powerful, capable of injuring or even destroying you.
Now I call that communicating.
Suggest moving fast to confirm what I told it, sir. Permission to use the large transporter in cargo room three. There I can beam up some living pattern, perhaps a large tree.
Which you'll beam over next to the entity
That is correct, Riker. Our ship's phasers will then blast and disintegrate it, proving we are dangerous.
Make it so.
Sir?
Do it.
Sir, I know this may finish me as an Acting Ensign, but
Shut up, Wesley! Lieutenant, pick a good security team, let me know what he does.
Aye, sir.
Shut up, Wesley?
Doctor.
And since I am finished here, sir, may I point out that
Shut up, Wesley!
That everything that I have said would have been listened to if it came from an adult officer. Request permission to return to my quarters, sir.
Agreed. Doctor, go with him.
You're putting me off the Bridge?
I'm asking that you keep an eye on your son during all of this, Doctor.
Emergency close!
Now, show me your warrior fierceness.
I'll look. But I shouldn't have let you talk me into this.
Mom, it's Data. He's been hurt. It's Data, Mom. I heard you know how to turn them on.
This is very serious.
So just tell me to shut up, Wesley, and I will.
You're being very unfair, Wes.
Data, the Crystal Thing is outside somewhere close to the ship, and Lore is loose on the inside.
How badly are you hurt, Data?
I will function sufficiently to stop Lore, Doctor
Crystal entity form, it's your old friend.
Very good. You've understand perfectly so far. Next, I'll signal that I'm about to transport something out, at which time the deflector shields will turn off for a moment, and if you move in at that time
How sad, dear brother. You make me wish I were an only child.
Then why this marvellous gift? The troublesome little man-child. Are you prepared for the kind of death you've earned, little man?
If you take one step toward my son
Ah, motherhood.
Back off, or I'll turn your little man into a torch. I promise him exquisite pain unless you obey me too, brother.
Move away, Data. Please.
Do you see now the advantages of being completely human? It includes kindness. I give you your life, Doctor. Go home. Quickly. And I may not injure your son at all.
I will stay with Wesley, Doctor.
Go! Or he'll be shrieking by the count of five. One, two, three, four
Thank you for my human quality, Doctor Soong. Wait! A small payment for your son's misdeeds.
Wes! The transporter.
Wesley, now!
Lore's gone, sir. Permanently.
Doctor, now that Wesley's safe, go to Sickbay at once.
Captain, the crystal thing has begun to move away.
Data, are you all right?
Yes, sir. I'm fine.
Get rid of that damned twitch and put on the correct uniform.
Yes, Captain.
Ensign Crusher, are you able to return to duty?
Yes, sir.
Then do so, and let the Bridge know that all is well down here.
Aye, sir.
It's gone, sir. Without Lore, it had no way to reach us.
And we're overdue for our computer refit. Number One, have you ever considered whether Data is more human, or less human than we want?
I only wish we were all as well balanced, sir.
Agreed!
Sir, we are approaching Klavdia Three.
Take us to impulse power.
Aye, sir. Impulse power.
Bridge, this is Engineering.
Yes, Lieutenant.
Now that we're out of warp, I'd like to use this time to make some routine adjustments on the deuterium control conduit. We're overdue.
How much time will these adjustments require, Lieutenant?
A couple of hours, sir.
Proceed, Lieutenant La Forge. Standard orbit, Ensign.
Wes, I'm going to need an SCM model three, from ship's stores. Can you handle that?
Right away.
All right.
Magnify, Mister Worf. Hardly an inviting planet, even for a research establishment.
I would have thought the inhabitants of Daled Four would send a future leader to a more hospitable environment.
For some, security is more important than comfort.
Yes, but sixteen years.
Captain, we're being hailed.
Hailing frequencies, Mister Worf.
Open.
This is Captain Picard of the USS Enterprise.
I am Anya of
Sir, the planet's troposphere is distorting our signal.
Can you clean that up, Mister Worf?
I'll try. Now.
This is Picard of the Enterprise. Please will you repeat your message?
I am Anya. Have you come for Salia of Daled Four?
That is correct.
What species are you?
Human.
Excellent. Bring us aboard. That is all.
Friendly, isn't she?
Friendly or not, Salia has the rank of head of state, so we will treat her and Anya accordingly. Number One, Mister Worf, let's go greet our visitors. You have the Bridge, Mister Data.
Aye, sir.
Welcome to the Enterprise. I'm Captain Picard.
This is Salia of Daled Four.
I didn't feel a thing. Is that normal when one is transported, Captain?
Oh, yes, it is.
Those must be the matter energy conversion controls. May I take a look?
Yes, of course.
I can arrange for a tour of the ship, if you'd like.
Oh, I'd love that.
No, that will not be necessary. Just show us to our quarters, Captain Picard.
Very well.
We're accommodating you in quarters normally reserved for Starfleet admiralty. I'm sure you'll find them quite comfortable.
That's a superconducting magnet, isn't it?
Yes It's an SCM model. How did you know that?
Study, for the last sixteen years it is all I could
Please, Salia, walk ahead with me.
Better be careful. Those can rip the iron right out of your blood cells.
Commander, who is she?
I think she's a governess.
No! The girl.
I don't know if she'll have time for you, Wes. She's destined to rule an entire world.
Come in.
You wanted to see me?
Yes. Data, the girl who came on board.
Salia of Daled Four.
Who is she?
Little is known. She was born on Daled Four. Her parents were from opposite sides in a civil war which has lasted for centuries. They both died shortly after her birth. A Federation ship brought her and her governess to Klavdia Three so that she could be raised in a neutral environment.
And now she's returning?
It is hoped she will unite the factions and bring peace.
Ensign Crusher, report. Are you all right?
Geordi? Yeah, I'm fine. I just
Wes, we're waiting for that magnet.
I'm on my way.
Captain, we've broken orbit and laid in a course for Daled Four. We will remain on impulse power until Lieutenant La Forge completes his adjustments.
Mister Worf, have our passenger's accommodations met with their approval?
I doubt if anything ever meets with that woman's approval, sir.
Captain, I'm concerned our new passengers. Their emotions do not fit who they are and what they're doing.
Are you suggesting they're not who they say they are?
Actually no, it's more like they're not what they say they are.
Picard to Salia's quarters.
Yes?
May we turn on the viewer?
Yes, of course.
Are your quarters satisfactory?
Yes, very. Tell me, Captain, who was the young man I met before?
That was Ensign Wesley Crusher.
Thank you for checking on us, Captain. I only hope our quarters on Daled Four will be this luxurious.
Please feel free to contact me at any time. Picard out.
What I sensed before hasn't changed.
What puzzles me, Captain, is how she is expected to bring peace to Daled Four. Its inhabitants have been fighting throughout their recorded history.
What do we know about the cause of these wars?
Only that it is the difference between night and day.
Data, you used a colloquialism.
Did I? What I meant, sir, is that Daled Four rotates only once per revolution. Therefore one side is constantly dark, and the other side constantly light. One might surmise that the two hemispheres have developed disparate cultures, which is a major cause of most wars.
This child is supposed to bring them together.
She seems too delicate for such a task.
Do not be fooled by her looks. The body is just a shell.
How can I be a leader if I don't know anything about my people?
You will lead because you are accepted by both sides. And because it is in your blood.
What is expected of me once I'm there?
You will know.
How?
You just will. Salia, you must arrive with an open mind, without preconceived ideas of the worlds you will find or the people on either side.
It's very frustrating.
You feel the weight of so much responsibility, you're not sure you'll live up to everyone's expectations.
It's not only that. Nobody's even asked me if this is something I want.
It is your duty.
And I have no choice.
It won't be as bad as you think. In fact, it could be quite wonderful. Besides, you are the last and only chance.
Don't you think I'm going to need more than instinct to do whatever is expected of me on Daled Four?
Energy depletion level?
Point oh four percent and increasing.
Wesley? Wesley, you haven't found that defocused area yet?
I'm looking.
Yeah, I see the way you're looking. Wesley!
What?  Sorry. I've got my mind on something.
I can see that.
It's this girl they beamed up, Geordi. She's perfect. Absolutely perfect.
Now I understand why you can't concentrate.
I'll do better.
Okay.
Warning, resonant field applied.
What is it? What happened?
Nothing. I had it on the wrong setting.
I suppose it had to happen to you. It usually does at about this age.
What usually does?
Glands erupting with hormones. It happens to all of us.
Just because I said that I think she's interesting
You said she was perfect. Come on down. You're no use around here for now. Come on down. Go talk to her. Use the ladder.
That's silly, Geordi. But since you recommended it, how should I approach her? If she'll talk to me, what should I say?
Just say, 'Hi, I'm Wesley Crusher. I'd like to talk to you'.
And then what?
Whatever occurs to you.
What if nothing occurs to me?
Look, Wes, I don't have time for this. You're going to have to ask somebody else.
Okay.
That is how the Klingon lures a mate.
Are you telling me to go yell at Salia?
No. Men do not roar. Women roar. Then they hurl heavy objects. And claw at you.
What does the man do?
He reads love poetry. He ducks a lot.
Worf, sounds like it works great for the Klingons, but I think I need to try something a little less dangerous.
Then go to her door. Beg like a human.
It should be that simple, Wesley. Judging by her appearance it is likely you and Salia are biologically compatible. Of course, there could be a difference in the histocompatibility complex in the cell membrane, but.
Data, I want to meet her, not dissect her.
Picard to Salia's quarters.
Yes, Captain?
May I activate the viewer?
Hurry, go, go.
Certainly.
We've invited Anya to take a tour of the ship. Maybe you would like to join her?
Very much.
Your escort will with you shortly. Picard out.
I think I'll go on the tour.
Why can't I? This is the only chance I'll ever have to see a vessel like this.
No. You must remain here where it is safe. Salia, do an old woman a favour and obey me for the rest of this trip.
You are no more an old woman than I am a leader.
Yes. Come in.
I'm here to escort you on a tour of the Enterprise.
Salia will remain behind. I will be right there. You are a leader. And I am older than you could ever imagine.
What should I say? How do I act? What do I do?
Guinan, I need your help. Could you step over here a minute?
Sounds simple enough.
Now, the first words out of your mouth are the most important. You may want to start with something like this.  You are the most beautiful woman in the galaxy. But that might not work.
Yes. Yes, it would.
You don't know how long I've longed to tell you that.
But you were afraid?
Yes.
Of me?
Of us. Of what we might become.
Commander?
or that you might think that was a line.
Maybe I do think it's a line.
Then you think I'm not sincere?
I didn't say that. There's nothing wrong with a line. It's like a knock at the door.
Then you're inviting me in?
I'm not sending you away.
That's more than I expected.
Is it as much as you hoped?
To hope is to recognise the possibility. I had only dreams.
Dreams can be dangerous.
Not these dreams. I dream of a galaxy where your eyes are stars, and the universe worships the night.
Careful. Putting me on a pedestal so high, you may not be able to reach me.
Then I'll learn how to fly. You are the heart in my day and the soul in my night.
I don't think this is my style.
Shut up, kid. Tell me more about my eyes.
This is the dilithium crystal chamber. Our Chief Engineer, Geordi La Forge.
What is that? What are you doing?
Nothing to be concerned about. Just performing some routine adjustments.
I wasn't aware that the deuterium control conduit required routine adjustments.
I perform periodic inspections on all engineering systems.
In this case you seem to have found a malfunction.
It's not a malfunction. It's simply that a minute defocused area has developed. It lowers our operating efficiency.
It could also lead to excess prion production.
Our computer would detect that.
Unless, of course, it too is malfunctioning.
Look, I really have to get this finished.
Anya. Please come with me.
I will be back to check your progress.
Ensign Crusher, what can I do for you?
Nothing.
Is there a problem?
No.
Could you show me how to work the food dispenser?
Sure.
Really, it's quite simple. You just tell the computer what you want and it prepares it for you.
Oh. What should I order?
I don't know. what do you like?
I'd like something sweet.
I know. Computer, Thalian chocolate mousse.
It's a wonderful sensation.
On Thalos Seven they age the beans four hundred years.
You've been there?
It's one of my favourite places.
It must be fun to visit a planet like that.
It's the best part of being on the Enterprise.
I've studied about some of them, but to see them, that would be wonderful. Tell me about some of the other places you've been.
Oh, there's too many.
The only world I've known is Klavdia Three.
It's about time we changed that.
How?
Come with me.
I'll be with you in a moment.
What's wrong with him?
Andronesian encephalitis.
That disease is contagious.
Very unlikely. Our air filtering system can handle
But there is a chance.
If you mean mathematically, yes, the probability is not zero.
I cannot rely on your primitive technologies. Kill the patient!
What?
Destroy the patient. Immediately!
Now, you calm down.
If you won't take action, then I will!
Security to Sickbay! Hurry!
Wait! Hold your fire.
Worf!
What is she? Keep her away!
Do not interfere!
She wants to kill Hennesey!
His disease threatens Salia.
Captain, there is no chance of contagion.
The situation is under control.
That's not good enough!
Well, it will have to be.
Your powers are infinitesimal compared to mine.
Yes, that may be, but you will obey my orders. You are to remain in your quarters and in your present form for the rest of this voyage. Is that clear?
Very.
Keep her under guard.
Aye, sir.
Wait for me. What kind of creature is she?
I've never seen anything like her.
There is mention in the galactic zoological catalogue of a species called allasomorph, which is supposed to possess the power to alter their molecular structure into other life forms.
Such a creature would make a perfect protector.
I want a Security team stationed outside Sickbay, Mister Worf.
Aye, sir. Captain, what if Anya transforms?
Improvise.
Can a place so remarkable truly exist?
Yes. There are many more. All of them are different.
I've learned about them. That's all I did on Klavdia Three, was learn. I know so much, but I've seen so little.
Think of what you have to look forward to. This is a great time to be alive.
For you.
For both of us. This is all just beginning. We've only charted nineteen percent of our galaxy. The rest is out there, just waiting. Look what we've already discovered.
I have never seen anything so wondrous.
Wait. Computer, Rosseau Five.
It's breathtaking!
Yes.
And you've been to this place?
Someday, you'll visit Rosseau Five, and many other places, all more spectacular.
If only it were possible.
Listen.
What is it?
In a moment, the harmonic resonance from the neutrino clouds will become synchronous.
It's so beautiful! It's like this place has a voice and is trying to speak to us. Thank you for sharing all of this with me.
Someday, you'll see it all for yourself. Look over there.
Remain here. You are restricted to these quarters for the remainder of this voyage.
You are the protector of this ship, are you not?
I am in charge of Security.
You must understand my duties as well. If you confine me to this cell, I cannot protect Salia.
There is no need for concern. She is safe on this ship.
You must understand that I cannot make such an assumption.
You no longer have the choice. You have to trust me to protect her.
No. A true protector cannot have two charges. Your responsibility is to the ship. My duty is to Salia.
My responsibility to the ship includes protecting Salia.
You know I'm stronger than you.
I was unprepared.
You underestimated me in your Sickbay. That is usually fatal.
Still, you are here, confined to your room.
I ceased my struggle by choice, not because of you or your Captain.
I would have stopped you. If not me, someone else.
No, you cannot control me.
We will see.
We've obviously brought a very dangerous life form aboard this ship. I want to minimize the chances of any incident.
Whatever kind of life form Anya is, emotionally she's Salia's mother.
The most dangerous animal is a mother protecting her young.
Exactly.
Captain, this is Anya.
Yes?
Salia is gone. Where is she?
This has all been so wonderful. I'm not even sure it's real.
Believe me, Ten Forward isn't an illusion.
Not that. I mean the way I feel.
You won't find a better dish of chocolate anywhere.
I'm sure I won't.
Is something wrong?
I've had a great time being with you, Wesley.
And that makes you sad?
When I was on Klavdia Three, all I could think of was leaving that isolation. What makes me sad is having to face it again after seeing what else is possible.
Is that what awaits you on Daled Four? Isolation?
Yes.
I thought you were going there to reunite two warring parties.
What else do you know?
Very little. The ship's computer doesn't have that much on Daled Four. How will you stop the fighting?
I'm not certain. I only know I will have many responsibilities when I get there. Your language has no word for the position I'll hold. In many ways I'll have even less freedom than I did on Klavdia Three.
You could stay.
On the Enterprise?
Why not?
Because I can't.
Just because a girl runs out, doesn't mean she doesn't wish you to follow.
What is it? What happened? Salia!
Stay away from me! I'm sorry.
I don't understand.
I can't stay here! I can't have this life! I want it more than anything, but I can't have it!
Salia, nothing is impossible.
Not for you.
There's a way. I know there is!
Leave her alone!
Ensign, step away from her.
Come with me.
Energy depletion level?
Zero.
La Forge to bridge.
Yes, Lieutenant?
I've just completed my final adjustments. Thanks for the time. You now have warp engines available.
Very good.
Number One, get us to Daled as quickly as possible.
Ensign Gibson, take us to warp eight point eight.
Warp eight point eight, sir.
Estimated time?
Three hours, nine minutes.
Ensign Crusher, when you're finished with your duties in Engineering, report to my Ready Room.
Yes, sir.
You have the Bridge, Number One.
Aye, sir.
The woman, Anya, is not what she appears to be. She is an allasomorph.
A shape shifter?
Yes. She's not only a governess, she's also the girl's protector. Now, I don't care to interfere in the personal relationships of those under my command, but in this case.
You want me to stay away from Salia?
Yes, I do. For the good of the ship and the safety of everyone on board.
I will do as you ask.
Why won't you let me have a friend?
It is my duty to protect you from danger.
There's no danger here.
There is always danger from one who is not your kind. Salia, he's confusing you. You're forgetting you responsibilities.
Whether or not I see Wesley is for me to decide.
It is not! I raised you, I protected you and I intend to deliver you to Daled Four!
Maybe what you want doesn't matter any more.
Salia, please. I know it's difficult for you. But you must do what you are destined to do.
Standard orbit.
Aye, sir.
Hailing frequencies, Mister Worf.
Captain, I am encountering the same interference we experienced on Klavdia Three.
The troposphere appears to be distorting our signals. It is fascinating, Captain. Klavdia Three and Daled Four have almost identical atmospheres.
Magnify. Times twenty.
How could anyone exist in an environment so totally hostile toward human life?
Mister Data, do whatever is necessary to override the interference. Let's complete our mission.
Come in. Salia! You shouldn't have come.
Do you want me to leave?
I didn't say that.
Then you want me to stay.
Does Anya know you're here?
That doesn't matter.
I'm glad you came. I thought Anya would have kept you with her.
I have certain rights.
So in other words, you slipped out.
While she was asleep. I hope you didn't get in trouble from your Captain.
Oh, I haven't got in trouble yet.
Anya thought you would corrupt me.
With my wild way of life?
Maybe. With the normal things people do when they like each other.
Wesley, get out of here now.
What's going on?
Just go, please.
Security, crew quarters!
No! Anya, No!
You should not have disobeyed me.
I had to.
I warned you to leave her alone.
Captain's log, stardate 42568.8. Since Anya's powers of transformation apparently gave her the ability to escape her guards unnoticed, we have sealed her quarters with a forcefield that will contain her no matter how small a form she may take.
Captain, I'm receiving an audio signal.
Audio on.
Come in Enterprise. This is Command Headquarters of Daled Four. We have been expecting you.
Sir, sensors indicate the communication originated from a terawatt source on the planet.
That's more power than our entire ship can generate.
It is what is needed to penetrate the atmosphere.
Which means we lack the ability to respond, sir.
Sir, there are beam-down coordinates encoded within the carrier signal.
Splendid.
I'll arrange for our guests to beam down.
Forcefield off.
Come in.
We have arrived.
Salia will be with you in just a moment.
You're not going?
No. My duties have been completed. I have done all that I could. I hope it was enough.
You've raised me well, and I thank you for that.
I would not have harmed the boy, I only wanted to frighten him.
I know.
You are ready for what awaits you and you will do well. I know that I have been hard on you, but I wanted to prepare you for anything you might be required to do.
Will I ever be able to leave Daled Four?
Probably not. But anything is possible.
That's what Wes said.
I hope he's right.
Where will you go?
The third moon is within range of this ship's transporter, I shall go there. It was my home before we went away.
I'm going to miss you.
I know.
I am ready now.
I will escort you to transporter room six.
You will be happy to see me leave.
No. You are a worthy opponent.
Thank you. At heart, we are very much alike.
Yes, we are.
Perhaps we shall fight again. On the same side.
It would be an honour. Shall we go?
Come in.
Wesley, I have to go now.
Was it fun?
What do you mean?
Playing humanoid. Was it fun?
Wesley, look at me. Right now, this minute, this is what I am. A humanoid girl.
What are you really?
Does it matter?
Yes.
Our natural state is one unlike anything you can imagine.
So you took this form for our benefit? That's why you wanted to know what species we are.
I'm sorry I hurt you. I didn't mean to.
I loved you.
I love you, too.
Can you?
Yes, oh yes. I have the same feelings, the same emotions as you. You must believe me.
Please go.
Wesley, let's not say goodbye like this.
Prepare to beam Salia to the specified coordinates.
O'BRIEN:Aye, sir.
Our world is grateful for the courtesy which you have extended us.
I hope some day that the Federation and Daled Four will have formal contact.
That is my wish as well.
O'BRIEN:Coordinates have been input, sir.
Proceed.
Wait. A taste to remember me by.
I wish there were something I could give you.
You already have.
I'm glad you came to say goodbye. Thank you, for everything.
I want you to leave now.
Why?
I cannot arrive on my planet in this form, and I want you to remember me as I am now.
Don't' worry, I will.
Energise.
Seeing her on the transporter pad, it was like seeing pure light. I miss her. I feel empty.
I know that sensation. But there'll come a time when all you remember is the love.
I'm never going to feel this way about anyone else.
You're right.
I didn't expect you to say that.
There'll be others, but every time you feel love it'll will be different. Every time, it's different.
Knowing that doesn't make it any easier.
It's not supposed to.
Lieutenant Shipley, let's get a triangulation on these sector points.
Aye, sir.
Sorry I'm late. I overslept again. What have we got?
Well, the cluster's a lot more dense than we thought. It's going to take three days just to map out one tenth of it.
Three days?
I think we've found a way to speed that up a bit. We've been testing a way of channelling warp energy directly to the main deflector grid. It should enhance the long range sensors.
The modification would increase our sensor efficiency and imaging resolution by twenty five percent or more.
That sounds like that'll use up a lot of warp energy.
We'd channel it through the EPS mains on deck four, near Cargo bay four.
Okay, let's give it a try.
Data, let's get those field taps online.
Commander, I would like to remind you about my poetry reading this afternoon.
I wouldn't miss it for the world.
I can't wait to see what he's come up with.
Then we sat on the sand for some time and observed How the oceans that cover the world were perturbed By the tides from the orbiting moon overhead 'How relaxing the sound of the waves is,' you said. I began to expound upon tidal effects When you asked me to stop, looking somewhat perplexed. So I did not explain why the sunset turns red And we watched the occurrence, in silence, instead. DATA:That poem was written in anapaestic tetrameter. For my ninth poem, RIKER:I don't understand. I can barely keep my eyes open. DATA:Throughout the ages, from Keats to Jorkemo, poets have composed odes to individuals who have had a profound effect on their lives. In keeping with that tradition, I have written my next poem in honour of my cat. I call it Ode to Spot. Felis catus is your taxonomic nomenclature. An endothermic quadruped, carnivorous by nature. Your visual, olfactory, and auditory senses Contribute to your hunting skill and natural defences. I find myself intrigued by your subvocal oscillations. A singular development of cat communications That obviates your basic hedonistic predilection, For a rhythmic stroking of your fur to demonstrate affection. A tail is quite essential for your acrobatic talents. You would not be so agile if you lacked its counterbalance. And when not being utilised to aid in locomotion It often serves to illustrate the state of your emotions. DATA:Commander, you have anticipated my denouement. However, the sentiment is appreciated. I will continue. Oh, Spot, the complex levels of behaviour you display Connote a fairly well developed cognitive array. And though you are not sentient, Spot, and do not comprehend I nonetheless consider you a true and valued friend.
I have no problem getting to sleep. Then I think I'm sleeping all night. When I wake up, I feel exhausted.
How long has this been going on?
Two, three days. Do you have to hold that thing that close? I'm sorry. I've been on edge all day.
Well. other than some muscle tension in your neck, I don't see anything physically wrong with you. Have you been having bad dreams?
Not that I can remember.
This could be the result of lack of REM sleep.
What do you recommend?
Drink this before going to bed.
What is it?
A recipe for a warm milk toddy.
A hot milk toddy? You're kidding.
The heat activates amino acids in the lactose, making it a natural sedative. Besides, this is a recipe of the Captain's Aunt Adelle. It's delicious.
Well. at this point, I'll try anything.
And listen, if it still bothers you tomorrow, come and see me and I'll run further tests.
Thanks.
Everything's in place. Warp grid couplers, subspace field taps. All right, let's do it. Lieutenant Shipley, initiate warp power transfer.
Aye sir. Verifying sensor calibration. EPS mains holding stable. Sensor array online.
Come on, work.
Geordi, active scanner output has increased by twenty six percent.
Inform Astrophysics that the new La Forge sensor array is online and awaiting major scientific discoveries.
Yes, sir.
Geordi, may I make a personal inquiry? It concerns my poetry reading.
Sure, Data. What is it?
I noticed that many spectators seemed distracted during my presentation. Was my poetry uninteresting?
Well, it was very well constructed, a virtual tribute to form.
Thank you. And?
And what?
Did it evoke an emotional response?
Well.
Your hesitation suggests you are trying to protect my feelings. However, since I have none, I would prefer you to be honest. An artist's growth depends upon accurate feedback.
Well, your poems were clever, Data, and your Haiku was clever, and your sonnet was clever. But did it evoke an emotional response? To be honest, no, I don't think so.
Then I did not succeed in my efforts.
No, it's not that you didn't succeed. You accomplished a lot, but, if you want to touch people, don't concentrate so much on rhyme and metre. Think more about what you want to say instead of how you're saying it.
That's the power grid warning.
I am reading a massive EPS explosion.
Where?
I am attempting to localise it. It is Cargo bay four.
I've got three people in there. Damage control, medical team to Cargo bay four. Let's go.
The field imbalance has subsided.
There may still be a residual discharge. Stand clear.
Is there something wrong, sir?
And there's no evidence of an EPS explosion.
Sensors seemed to think there was.
I think my modification to the sensor array may have caused a pattern recognition failure.
Just a sensor glitch?
That's my guess.
Let's perform a level three diagnostic on the internal sensor network and make sure that we haven't overlooked anything.
Aye, sir.
Could we pick this up in the morning, Geordi? Get a fresh start? Would you do me a favour? Stop by my quarters, oh seven hundred hours. I'm having trouble waking up.
Sure, Commander. Goodnight.
Goodnight.
Commander.
Gordon.
Who is it?
It's La Forge.
Come in.
Good morning.
Morning? I just went to bed.
Commander, it's oh seven hundred hours.
She said, if they're not squirming, we won't eat 'em!
Ah, Mister Worf, my good Klingon. Sir, welcome. What a pleasure it is to have you with us again so soon. So, Lieutenant, haircut today? Trim your beard?
I would like my hair trimmed.
Ah. A trim, of course.
Not like last time.
Oh no, just a little off the top. I took way too much off last time. I was just telling my colleague, Mister Setti, how thick and luxuriant Klingon hair is. It's such a pleasure to cut. Sometimes I get carried away. All those away missions, the wind and dry air, the elements really are harsh on the hair. I'd like to suggest that you start using a conditioning agent.
I promise, not too much off the top.
Just before the grid alarm sounded, we were running warp power through this junction. Somehow, it must've tripped the internal scanners.
And it showed up as an EPS explosion?
Yes, but the question is, why? I've made modifications to the sensors before but nothing like this has ever happened.
We can't waste time chasing down sensor ghosts. We should probably keep the whole array offline until we can get take a closer look.
Excuse me.
I know the feeling. The past few nights, it seems like as soon as my head hits the pillow, it's time to get up in the morning.
I'm sure we could all use a little shore leave after this survey's completed.
Definitely. Keep me posted?
Yeah. Data, I'm wondering if you could give me a hand. I need to run a structural integrity scan. I want to make sure that none of the conduit was
What is it?
This is the second time today that my visor's just cut out like that.
Are you all right, Geordi?
I don't know. I just had a very weird feeling. Maybe I should go to Sickbay.
I will run the integrity scan.
Thanks, Data.
This is curious. There's a slight bacterial infection around your neural inputs. It was probably interrupting the data stream.
An infection? From what?
It doesn't match any bacterial strains on record. I'm going to have to sterilise the area. But I need to run a resonance tissue scan to search for any signs of additional infection. Come over here. Sit down. Now, come forward. Now, you're going to need to hold very still.
How's the scan going, Data?
I have just started the scan. Did you not go to Sickbay?
Data, I've been there for over an hour and a half.
That is not possible. My internal chronometer indicates you have been gone for exactly one minute, fifteen seconds.
I'm telling you, Data, I've been gone for over an hour.
Computer, what is the time, please?
The time is fourteen twenty seven hours.
You are correct. Ninety two minutes, seventeen seconds have passed since you left the room.
What have you been doing all this time?
I have no memory of events during that period. When we are finished here, I will perform a self-diagnostic.
You know, first we picked up a false EPS explosion, then my visor cuts out twice, and now you lose an hour, all in the Cargo Bay. La Forge to Engineering I want a diagnostic team to Cargo bay four immediately.
On our way, sir.
Ensign Rager, cartography needs a better position to study cluster FGC thirteen. Bring us about, heading one twenty three mark four.
Aye sir. Helm won't lock to those coordinates, sir.
First time navigating through a globular cluster, Ensign? You have got to compensate for gravimetric interference before
Is there something wrong, sir?
No. I don't know. Put us back on our original heading, Ensign.
Don't tell me. This can't be right. Data, come here and take a look at this, would you? I think we have another sensor glitch.
Sensors are functioning normally. They are detecting a subspace particle emission originating from within this room.
From within this room? That's impossible.
The emission is emanating from this direction. Geordi.
The structure of the bulkhead has been altered on a subatomic level. The metal itself is in a state of quasi-molecular flux.
What's causing it?
This is where it gets a little wild, Captain. Behind that panel is a junction we were using to transfer warp power to the sensor array. We're reading a subspace particle stream emanating from that junction.
It appears to be composed of spatially inverted tetryon particles. We believe they are emanating from a tertiary subspace manifold.
But I thought that tetryons were unstable in normal space.
We don't understand it either, sir. Something from that deep in subspace shouldn't be able to exist in our universe. But there it is.
Does it pose a danger to the ship?
Not unless it spreads. If it does, we can beam the bulkhead into space and erect a forcefield in its place.
Well, keep that option ready. In the meantime, proceed with the analysis.
Aye, sir.
When I sat down at the console, it triggered a response like I had been trapped. I had to get out of there.
Was it something about the console itself?
No. I felt like I was disconnected. Like it was something I had dreamed.
You're the third person today who's come to me with something like this. An intense emotional response provoked by an object.
Did any of them know why they'd the response?
No, they couldn't explain it any more than you could. You know, at this point I'm not willing to say it's coincidence.
Maybe we should all get together.
Talking about it would help you understand your response. I'm going to find out if anyone else on the ship has had these kind of experiences.
Will, you told me you had an unusual experience when you sat down at the console. Why don't you describe it?
It was vague, the way you recall a dream. I remember the sensation of feeling trapped and something about a smooth surface.
I had a similar response, but to a pair of scissors.
Have you dreamt about scissors recently?
I may have. I do not have a distinct memory of it.
When my visor cut out in the cargo bay, I had a weird feeling too. It was something about a smooth surface. It was smooth and cold, Yeah, it was cold.
Yes, cold.
It was elevated? A platform.
Right. Like a bench, or a table
It seems you've all had a similar experience. Is there anything else you remember besides a table?
Maybe there's a way we can all help ourselves to remember more.
Well, you all remember a table, so let's start with that. Computer show me a table.
There are five thousand forty seven classifications of tables on file. Specify design parameters.
Can you be more specific about the table? You mentioned it was smooth and cold. Can you remember what shape it was?
Long. It was long.
Yeah, and it had a rectangular shape.
Computer, show me a rectangular conference table.
It's too high. Computer, reduce the height of the table by twenty five percent.
No, the table was smaller. And it was inclined. Computer, decrease the table's surface area by twenty percent and incline the top fifteen degrees.
No, it wasn't made of wood. It was smoother, more metallic.
Computer, make this a metal table.
Yeah, that's starting to look right.
Was there anything else in the room? Furniture? Chairs? A door? Other people?
No, it was dark.
Yes, it was dark. I couldn't see beyond the table.
Computer, lower the surrounding light level.
There was a light right in my face. A bright light. Computer, give me a bright light right above the table.
Specify light source.
I couldn't tell. It was above me. An overhead lamp.
Estimated distance of light source.
I don't know. It was at least two or three metres above. Brighter. Brighter.
You said you were uneasy when you sat down at the conn. position.
Yes. I felt trapped by the console. But it wasn't like this. There was something else here.
A restraint of some kind?
Yes, there was a restraint. It was flat and metal. It was made of metal. it came down over my legs. No, no, it was across my chest, right here.
It was holding you down?
Yes, it was part of the table. It was here. It was right here.
Computer, create a restraining arm attached to the right side of the table, at the mid-point.
Was it like that?
Computer, put controls on the restraining arm. A control panel. Lights.
There was something else there. Over the head of the table. A metal swing arm. Computer, create a metal swing arm, double jointed, total length one metre. Connect it to the head of the table.
There was something attached to it. A tool of some sort. Scissor-like. Computer, produce a pair of scissors attached to the armature. The handle is wrong. It was not scissors. Computer, make the handle a single grip ten centimetres long, solid metal. Now make one blade longer, curved inward. And give the other blade a jagged edge.
All right, you were lying on the table. You had a bright light shining in your eyes. Were there any smells in the room? Were there any sounds?
Yes. Yes, there was a sound. Computer, there were noises coming from the darkness. Strange, like whispering.
More like clicks. Clicking sounds.
Louder. Faster. More of them.
I've been in this room before.
We've all been here before.
Here it is again. Something has caused high levels of serotonin to be produced in Geordi's visual cortex. When I examined him earlier today, I thought it was the result of a bacterial infection, but now I'm finding the same thing in all three. They all have elevated levels of serotonin. It's concentrated in the hippocampus, which suggests that they've been exposed to a neuro-sedative. And that's not all. I have detected minute tetryon particle traces in their subdermal tissues.
Tetryons? Like the emissions in the cargo bay.
I have completed my self diagnostic, and have confirmed that I was not aboard the Enterprise for ninety minutes seventeen seconds yesterday afternoon.
Are you sure?
Whenever I am on the ship, the warp field leaves an electromagnetic signal on my internal servo-fluid system. Between the period of twelve fifty four and fourteen twenty six hours that signature is missing.
Computer, are there any members of the crew of the Enterprise missing?
There are two crewmembers unaccounted for.
Identify them.
Lieutenant Edward Hagler and Ensign Sariel Rager.
When did they leave?
They have not been present since twenty three thirty two hours.
How did they leave?
Method of departure unknown.
Picard to Bridge.
Bridge here, Captain.
Raise shields. And I want a level four security alert. I need to know if anyone comes on or off this ship.
Aye, sir.
Mister La Forge, Mister Data. I believe that if we find the source of those tetryon emissions, we'll find the missing crewmembers.
We're on it, sir.
Doctor Crusher? You'd better take a look at this.
My God.
What is it?
It looks as though your arm has been severed and then reattached.
What?
The skeletal structure in your radius and ulna is offset by point zero two microns. Your arm has been amputated then surgically reattached.
Any progress with the analysis, Lieutenant?
Take a look at this.
Data, the tetryon emissions have intensified. They seem to be focusing in this direction, coalescing here. They're reading as a point of subspace energy.
It appears to be the beginnings of a spatial rupture.
The tetryon emissions are modulating in a way that looks like somebody's controlling the energy. You know, the signals from the modifications I made to the sensor array, some of them dig pretty deep into subspace. Maybe they caught somebody's attention.
At the rate the rupture is expanding, we will soon be in danger of hull breach.
Maybe we should try surrounding it with a subspace containment field.
Other than the tetryon emissions in cargo bay four, our internal sensors haven't recorded anything unusual in the past three days.
Initiate a metallurgical analysis of the ship's hull. Subspace field incursions may have left a trace.
Captain, sensors indicate that Lieutenant Hagler has returned to the Enterprise. He is in his quarters, deck seven, section nineteen.
Computer, emergency entry, Chief Medical Officer Beverly Crusher.
Crusher to Sickbay. Get a plasma infusion unit to deck seven, section nineteen.
His blood is turning into a liquid polymer.
We've set up a containment field in cargo bay four, but the rupture just keeps expanding. I'd say we've got another five or six hours before it breaches the hull.
Can we still beam the affected sections out into space?
No, sir. The spatial rupture is creating severe nucleonic interference. It is impossible to obtain a positive lock on the bulkheads.
Has your analysis suggested any way in which we might seal this rupture?
We think we can close the rupture by neutralising the tetryon emissions with a coherent graviton pulse. But we'd have to do that at the source.
How do we find the source?
Good question. The emissions are coming from a tertiary subspace domain, but subspace has an infinite number of domains. It's like a huge honeycomb with an endless number of cells. We need to isolate the exact cell that these emissions are coming from.
If someone homed onto the subspace signals created by our modified signal array, could we do the same to them? Track the tetryon emissions to their universe?
Tetryon particles have a random momentum. Our sensors cannot track them, sir.
Perhaps we could construct a homing device. Something that our sensors could track.
That's a good idea, but there's no way to get that device to the source.
Yes, there is. Give it to me. They've taken me for the last few nights. If I'm right, the same thing'll happen tonight.
If you had a homing device, we could track it to your location in subspace. And as soon as they send you back to the ship, we could transmit the graviton pulse and neutralise the tetryon emissions.
If they send him back. Ensign Rager still hasn't been returned.
They're going to take me whether I want to go or not.
Well, we could wait as long as possible for you to be returned, Number One, but when the spatial ruptures begin to threaten the ship, then we would have to transmit that graviton pulse.
Understood.
Perhaps there's a way that we could give you an advantage. A way of keeping you conscious after they have taken you. Doctor, can you develop some counter-agent to the neuro-sedative that they have been giving the crew?
I could give you a neuro-stimulant, but the dosage would have to be rather high to counteract the effects. It could be risky.
I'm willing to take that risk.
Make it so. Mister La Forge, begin work on that homing device.
This should be enough to ward off their neuro-sedative for about twelve hours.
I hope it's enough.
It's going to have to be. I can't risk giving you a higher dosage.
I've locked this tricorder into a continuous cycle. That way, it'll keep recording whether you open it or not. Hopefully you can bring back some information about their domain. We've modified a sensor relay emitter to transmit a subspace beacon. When this indicator lights up, it means that we've locked onto your location.
Understood.
Captain. Commander Riker has been taken from the Enterprise.
Mister La Forge, report.
I still can't locate the homing signal. We've covered the entire upper subspace energy band. We're extending the scan to adjacent levels.
Mister Data, your status?
The rupture has expanded another four point two percent.
Without further reinforcement, containment field integrity will fail in approximately fourteen minutes.
Can you divert more power to the containment field?
I can try to augment the field with auxiliary power, but it won't be much.
Make it so.
Aye, sir.
Captain, I've located the homing signal. Locking onto it now. It's coming from a subspace energy level of sixteen point two keV.
Stand by to initiate the graviton pulse.
Graviton emitters at full power, sir. Standing by.
Mister Data, how much time?
At the present rate, containment failure will occur in approximately nine minutes.
Captain, the containment field is beginning to fluctuate. Failure anticipated in
Three minutes, eleven seconds.
We can't afford to wait any longer. Begin the graviton pulse.
Initiating pulse now.
Data to Engineering. The graviton pulse is having an effect. Tetryon emissions have decreased by nineteen percent.
Captain, additional subharmonics have appeared. They are reinforcing the tetryon emissions. They appear to be counter-acting the graviton pulse.
The rupture is beginning to expand again, sir.
Looks like somebody is fighting back.
Can you strengthen the graviton pulse?
I can try to set up a random frequency shift. If we can keep them from guessing our pulse modulation, they might not be able to compensate.
Tetryon emissions continue to increase. The rupture is still expanding.
Hull breach is imminent.
They're reacting faster than we can shift frequencies. Shipley, programme the emitters for full spectrum pulse compression. I want to channel all of the graviton energy into a single burst. Let's see if they can handle that.
Ready, Commander.
The rupture is beginning to close, sir.
Recharge the emitters. Let's hit them again. Come on.
Ready.
The rupture is eighty six percent closed.
We're almost there. One more burst should do it.
Emitters recharging.
Captain's log, stardate 46191.2. The tetryon emissions in cargo bay four have ceased, and there have been no further indications of alien intrusions. All Enterprise crewmembers are safe and accounted for. But we are still left with some unanswered questions.
Based on the information gathered by Commander Riker's tricorder, we have determined that the molecular structure of the alien life forms is solanogen-based.
We think that's why they couldn't come through into our space, as easily as they could take us into theirs. They needed to learn how to remodulate their cellular energy states in order to survive in our universe.
The tricorder readings indicate they created a small pocket of our universe in their laboratory to keep those they abducted alive.
Like putting a fish in a bucket of water.
That's probably what they were trying to do in cargo bay four. Create a pocket of their universe in ours.
What can we do to prevent this from happening again?
It looks like they found us initially by discovering my modified sensor signal. We should warn all Starfleet ships not to make that same mistake.
Have we any idea what came through the rupture before we were able to shut it down?
No sir. We were unable to track it once it left the cargo bay.
Maybe it was a probe of some kind.
Possibly they were simply curious. Explorers like ourselves.
Ensign Rager and I were lucky to have escaped. Lieutenant Hagler's dead. Whoever it was sent that thing was more than simply curious.
Routine deep sensor probe indicates no obstacles or vessels within a range of three light years.
Confirm.
The martial arts competition is in three days. Are you prepared?
I will be if you'll meet me on the holodeck later. I need your help on the Mishiama wrist-lock and break. If it works on you, I can use it on anyone.
A valid assumption. Who is your first competitor?
Science Officer Swenson.
You will defeat him easily.
I'm more concerned with Lieutenant Minnerly's kick boxing.
You are favoured in the ship's pool.
You bet on me?
A sure thing.
Captain, estimated rendezvous with the shuttle in one hour and ten minutes.
Thank you, Lieutenant.
Aye, sir.
It'll be good to have Counsellor Troi back, won't it, Number One?
It certainly will.
Sir, I'm receiving an emergency transmission from the shuttle.
On main viewer.
I can't, sir. We're receiving audio only.
Open the frequency.
Aye, sir.
What a jolt!
Position report.
Sir, I have an onboard systems failure. You'll have to tell me where I am.
I read your coordinates at three seven zero point two three six. Confirm.
I can't confirm. My instruments are haywire.
Lieutenant Prieto, is Counsellor Troi all right?
Yes, sir. Just a little shaken. We're being buffeted a bit. Losing more power! My flight control computer's fried.
Main Engineering.
Lieutenant Commander Leland T. Lynch here, sir.
How long before we can return to warp power?
Captain, I'm in the middle of realigning the dilithium crystals.
There is an emergency. We need warp drive. How long?
Twenty minutes. Maybe more.
We don't have it, Mister Lynch.
I'll align it by hand.
Whatever it takes.
Aye, sir.
Shuttle, this is the Enterprise. Your coordinates now read two three seven point one zero one. Ben, you're dangerously close to a planet.
I can see it.
The planet is Vagra Two, sir, in the Zed Lapis sector. Uninhabited.
Lieutenant, report!
This is Counsellor Troi. I'll relay, sir. The pilot is busy. We've lost most of our impulse power.
Engineering, status report.
Working on it, Captain. Three minutes.
But there are no guarantees.
Captain, we're out of control. We're caught in the planet's gravity.
Captain's log, supplemental. We've lost all contact with shuttlecraft thirteen, and can only assume they've crash-landed on Vagra Two. Meanwhile, main Engineering is trying to return us to warp power.
Forget the final check. Initiate start-up sequence.
Beginning check list.
Override. We are going directly to start-up.
That procedure is not recommended.
Understood. Now. Prime matter-antimatter injectors. Set ratio at twenty-five to one
Ratio set.
Power engine core. Inject reactants.
Leland T. Lynch here, Captain. We now have minimum warp drive.
Course plotted and set for Vagra Two.
Warp eight.
I said minimum warp drive, Captain.
You heard the order, Mister Lynch. Make it so.
Yes, sir.
Approaching Vagra Two, Captain.
Strange, sir. There's no emergency signal from the shuttle as yet.
What is this place, Mister Data?
There is little information in the library computer other than the fact of its existence. Our sensor show no signs of life forms, virtually no vegetation.
Atmosphere?
Minimum for our needs, sir.
Standard orbit.
Aye, sir. Standard orbit.
I've located the shuttle.
Life signs?
Not yet, sir. Still probing. It appears to be buried under a lot of debris. I may have something, sir. Faint life signs. Very faint.
How many?
There's no way of telling from here.
Data, can we beam up the injured?
No, sir. Our sensors are not fully penetrating whatever the debris is.
That's very unusual.
Yes, sir. I cannot explain.
Number One, prepare your away team.
Right away. Data, Yar.
Doctor Crusher, have you been monitoring all this?
Yes. I'll meet the away team in transporter room four.
Let's go. The life signs are weak.
What is this?
No idea. We'll go around, just to be on the safe side.
Let's try the other way.
Enterprise, this is Riker. We've got a problem.
What kind of problem, Number One?
I'm not sure yet. There appears to be some kind of a slick blocking our path. Will keep you apprised.
Maintain an open frequency.
Aye, sir.
Analysis, Mister Data.
Inconclusive, sir. I cannot tell you what it is, but I can tell you what it is not.
Explain.
There is no evidence of neural or circulatory systems. No internal organs. Cellular structure unknown. It does not have any proteins which are known to us.
It's narrower over here. We can get over it.
How is it moving, Data?
I do not know, sir. It does not appear to have a skeletal framework or musculature.
Then what's causing it to move?
It appears to be following us, sir.
No sign of intelligence, no brain as we know it, yet evidence of thought, Mister Data?
Insufficient information, sir.
Is it a life form, Data?
Again, insufficient information, sir.
Theorise.
It is possible.
Very good, tin man.
What is it, Number One? What are you seeing?
Trouble.
Captain's log, supplemental. While on a mission to rescue survivors from an unexplained shuttle crash, the away team has encountered a strange creature which seems able to assume different forms, including one which resembles humanoid.
Easy, Number One. Let's find out what it is we're dealing with.
Agreed, Captain.
Number One, I don't believe that the location of the crash and the proximity of the creature is a coincidence.
I am Commander William Riker of the USS Enterprise.
I am Armus. Why are you here?
We mean you no harm. We have injured crewmen in the shuttlecraft. We need to get to them. May we pass?
You haven't given me a good enough reason.
Preserving life, all life, is very important to us.
Why?
We believe everything in the universe has a right to exist.
An interesting notion which I do not share. You may now leave, if you wish.
We're not going without our shuttle crew.
I warn you.
Enough! We have people who need attention. We won't hurt you, but we must help them.
Number One!
The creature attacked us. Lieutenant Yar is down.
It seems to feed on our phaser energy.
We had no effect on it.
What's Lieutenant Yar's condition? Doctor Crusher, report!
She's dead.
Transporter room, get them up, now.
I need her in Sickbay now.
Go to Yellow Alert, Lieutenant Worf. I'll be in Sickbay.
Aye, sir.
Status, Doctor?
Unchanged.
Can you bring her back?
We'll see. Neural stimulator.
Neural stimulator locked in.
Interlock current feeds. Set sensitivity factor to four point four.
Affirmative.
NURSE 2:Monitoring two point three, one point eight.
You did it.
No. I've got her on full support. There is no independent brain function.
NURSE 2:Current feeds operating.
She's not responding, Doctor. Her synaptic network is breaking down.
Inject norep.
Neurons are beginning to depolarise.
Let's go for direct reticular stimulation.
Direct?
Do it!  Increase to seventy microvolts.
Eighty five microvolts.  Again.  Ninety. Again. Again. She's gone.
Gone?
There was too much synaptic damage. That thing just sucked the life right out of her. There's nothing I can do.
Your friends have deserted you. They're not coming back.
You're wrong.
I killed one of them.
Yes. I know.
How could you be in there and know that?
I felt her die.
Do you want to know why I killed her?
Your answer would be meaningless. That act had no reason.
Exactly. It had no meaning. I did it because I wanted to. It amused me.
No. You thought it would amuse you, but it didn't. You felt no satisfaction.
No. It was too easy.
You wanted her to suffer. You have a great need.
I need nothing.
Liar. End this. Let us go.
Not yet.
They won't give you what you want.
And what is that?
To break their spirit.
Oh, is that what I want? If breaking their spirit will amuse me, then that's what I will have.
Never.
She didn't do anything. Her phaser was lowered.
She only wanted to get to Troi and Lieutenant Prieto.
There was nothing provocative about what she did.
She was killed in a brutal, senseless act.
Lieutenant Yar's death is very painful for all of us. We will have to deal with it as best we can for now. Until the shuttle crew is safely beamed aboard this ship, our feelings will have to wait. Is that understood? Lieutenant Worf, you are now Acting Chief of Security.
I will do my best, sir.
Doctor, what is the state of the shuttle crew?
We're still receiving faint life signs, but the sensor readings are fluctuating. They may not be accurate.
Armus is capable of creating undefined forcefields. In effect, we are powerless to communicate or use the transporter unless it allows it.
A creature against whom we seem to have no defence. Number One?
It's down on that planet waiting for us to come back. It killed Tasha and it could have killed us, but it didn't. Deanna and Ben are alive for a reason, and it knows we're not going anywhere as long as they're still alive.
Are you saying it's attack on Yar was not arbitrary but part of some tactic?
The only way to find out is to go back down.
Commander, I may be able to see something in the creature which might be helpful.
Agreed. Prepare your away team, Number One.
Lieutenant Worf?
I will remain on the ship. The object here is not to engage the creature in battle. The goal is the safe return of Counsellor Troi and Lieutenant Prieto. I can best accomplish this at the Tactical Station.
Very good. Number One?
Enterprise.
Number One.
We're approaching the shuttlecraft. The creature is covering it.
I lied to you. They came back.
Let me talk with them.
No.
Why? Does the thought of my having contact with them make you uneasy?
No. Not being able to contact you, not knowing if you are alive, makes them uneasy. Can't you feel how worried they are?
Yes. Yes, they are worried.
They care for you. You must be very special.
We are members of a community. We all care for one another.
Equally?
You were really surprised they came back.
Yes.
Why? Because the others did not?
What others?
You can't hide the emptiness from me. The others. The ones who hurt you. Who left you alone, rejected. The ones who make you so angry.
What do you know of them?
Only what you tell me.
I will tell you nothing.
Not now. But soon.
Captain, look at this. The force of the energy field around the shuttlecraft decreased for a few moments when the creature was draped over it.
But not low enough to beam them out.
Almost.
It's approaching the away team now, and the energy field over the shuttlecraft is back to full intensity.
Chart it. I want to see if there's a pattern.
Aye, sir.
She said you'd be back.
Then she is alive.
For now. Why have you returned?
We have no choice. We're here to negotiate for our team. What do you want?
Maybe I want nothing.
Then you would have killed all of us.
I still might.
What do you want? Tell me. Maybe we can reach an accommodation.
If I tell you, will you give it to me?
I might. It depends.
I am a doctor. I need to treat our injured friends.
Say please.
Please.
You ask nicely. I will allow it. Wait! I've changed my mind. Talk to her from here.
How? Troi, can you hear me?
Deanna, are you all right?
Beverly?
I can hear you.
Are you all right?
Yes.
We've encountered some difficulty.
I know.
She needs our help.
So what.
Our friends are suffering only a few metres away, yet you block our path. Why?
You are all ungrateful.
What is he made of?
It did not register on the tricorder.
It? Does that mean I am not alive?
No. Clearly you are some kind of intelligent form.
But you said I did not register on your instrument. Perhaps your instruments are useless.
Don't help him.
Data.
Half metre to the right, Geordi.
Aren't you going to lead him to his sight again, robot?
No. You will just move it again, and I will not help you hurt him.
Then give it to him. I will find something else to amuse me.
You said they wouldn't amuse me. You were right.
And the emptiness remains. You sound so alone.
I am alone.
Abandoned. Who deserted you?
Creatures whose beauty now dazzles all who see them. They would not exist without me.
You were together?
They perfected a means of bringing to the surface all that was evil and negative within. Erupting, spreading, connecting. In time it formed second skin, dank and vile.
You.
Yes.
They discarded you and left.
And here I am.
You have my pity.
Your pity? Save that for yourself.
Help! Data, something's got me!
Touch him and he dies.
No! No, don't!
Enterprise?
Armus has enveloped Commander Riker.
I'm beaming you up.
If any of you leave now, he dies.
And so do the survivors of the crash.
Captain's log, supplemental. There is grave danger to the crew on Vagra Two. My first officer is missing, attacked by this entity known as Armus.
Captain, perhaps you should look at this. We have the chart of the energy field surrounding the shuttle.
There are a great deal of fluctuations.
Yes, but there is a pattern. Here is when it killed Lieutenant Yar, and here is when it absorbed Commander Riker.
And here, here, where the energy is lowest?
Both times it had enveloped the shuttle.
It has something to do with Counsellor Troi. Somehow when it's dealing with her, the energy field is affected. I want to talk to her. I'm going to beam down. Lieutenant Worf, you have the conn.
Imzadi! No! Please, stop hurting him!
He resists. If he would give himself over, the pain would diminish. He struggles. You should feel his strength.
I can.
Should I let him go?
You only ask to torment me.
Perhaps.
How should I answer? What can I offer except myself?
And would you give yourself for him? Would you give that much?
Yes. Without hesitation.
Just for him?
No, not just for him. I would do the same for any of the others. Armus, you have me. Let them go.
Perhaps. Ah, another has arrived.
You are the one in charge?
Is Commander Riker alive?
Answer, Tin Man.
I would guess that death is no longer sufficient entertainment to alleviate its boredom. Therefore, Commander Riker is alive.
Maybe. Don't you want to ask me what I want?
No.
Not even to protect your own existence?
I want to see my people in the shuttle.
Entertain me.  Then I will do it myself. You, Tin Man.
Now tell me, how would you feel if you were the instrument of death for your leader?
Don't struggle, Data.
I have no control over what you do with the phaser. Therefore, I would not be the instrument of his death.
Perhaps killing the Doctor would engender more feeling?
No, the control is still yours.
And what about you, Doctor? Are you ready to die? Tell me you are not afraid.
I am afraid.
Beg me to spare you.
No.
One of you is going to die, and you, Doctor, get to choose. You don't like that, do you?
Then I choose myself.
No. You are going to live. One of them dies.
Maybe this one. Though I would not call it death, since he is only a device. Tell me, Tin Man, how does it feel to face your own extinction.
Curious.  You are capable of great sadism and cruelty. Interesting. No redeeming qualities.
So what do you think?
I think you should be destroyed.
A moral judgment from a machine.
Data. Armus, we're finished dealing with you.
I have your man in here, and the others in the shuttle.
It doesn't matter. We will no longer be a source of amusement.
I can kill them.
Yes. You can. But only I can command them. They follow my orders.
Have them amuse me.
Only if you let me see my people on the shuttle first. I must see them.
Not possible.
Then our business with you is concluded.
And you claim you care about your comrades.
I care. Which is why I must see them.
You want to see your people? Then, here. Look at this one.
He's alive. Don't move.
Is he all right?
All signs show normal.
So much frustration. It had to get rid of me.
Now, let me see the others.
No.
I will not allow my people to entertain you until you do.
They are incapable of entertaining me.
I want the four of you out of here. Enterprise, beam up the away team immediately.
Aye, sir.
They're no longer involved. This is between you and me.
They may leave.
Now.
I want to leave this place.
You want me to give you transportation?
For which I will trade you lives.
I must see my people in the shuttle.
Will you give me what I want?
I have the means. But first I must see my people.
If you must.
Troi, are you all right?
Yes, but Ben is not.
He's alive.
Were you able to help Tasha?
No. Troi. Troi, we must talk. I believe it's possible to outmanoeuvre this creature, and beam you and Ben back up to the ship. We've been monitoring the energy field that surrounds the shuttle. When the creature is here, the field weakens. Do you know why?
The creature is filled with rage. Undirected, unfocused rage. When he confronts it, his guard goes down because he's feeling it instead of suppressing it. Acknowledging his needs makes him vulnerable.
What caused the rage?
He was left here. Abandoned.
The forcefield will have to drop below two point seven before we can beam them up.
Satisfied?
Yes.
Then can we leave?
Where do you want to go? Do you want to try to find those who left you here?
She told you about them.
How long have you been here?
Since they left. A very long time.
A long time to be alone.
Save your compassion. It's revolting. You offer it like a prize when in fact it's an insult.
Because you feel unworthy.
You overrate your gift. You humans are puny, weak.
But our spirit, it is indomitable.
And still you die from a flake of my power.
A great poet once said, 'all spirits are enslaved that serve things evil'.
You do not understand. I do not serve things evil. I am evil.
Oh, no, you are not.
I am a skin of evil left here by a race of Titans who believed if they rid themselves of me, they would free the bonds of destructiveness.
Yes. So here you are. Feeding on your own loneliness. Consumed by your own pain. Believing your own lies.
Set the computer. When the energy level reaches two point six point two zero five, automatically beam up Troi and Prieto. We'll do a parallel transport on the Captain.
Yes, sir.
You say you are true evil? Shall I tell you what true evil is? It is to submit to you. It is when we surrender our freedom, our dignity, instead of defying you.
I will kill you, and those in there.
But you will still be here. In this place. For ever. Alone. Immortal.
Stand by for parallel transport.
The energy level has dropped to two point six point three.
That's your real fear. Never to die. Never again to be united with those who left you here.
Energy field is two point six. Computer beginning transport.
I'm not taking you anywhere.
Captain's log, stardate 41602.1. The shuttlecraft has been destroyed to prevent any possibility of Armus leaving the planet. Vagra Two will be declared off limits. But the damage has been done. One of the saddest duties I've ever had to perform is now ahead of me.
We are here together to honour our friend and comrade, Lieutenant Natasha Yar. Coming to terms with the loss of a colleague is perhaps the most difficult tasks we must face in the work we have chosen to pursue. We will all find time to grieve for her in the days that are ahead, but for now she has asked that we celebrate her life with this.
Hello, my friends. You are here now watching this image of me because I have died. It probably happened while I was on duty, and quickly, which is what I expected. Never forget I died doing exactly what I chose to do. What I want you to know is how much I loved my life, and those of you who shared it with me. You are my family. You all know where I came from and what my life was like before. But Starfleet took that frightened, angry young girl and tempered her. I have been blessed with your friendship and your love. Will Riker, you are the best. You trusted me, you encouraged me, and most of all you made me laugh. Deanna, you are capable of so much love. You taught me without ever having to say a word. I realised I could be feminine without losing anything. Ah, Worf. We are so much alike, you and I. Both warriors, orphans who found ourselves this family. I hope I met death with my eyes wide open. Beverly. Your fierce devotion comes from within. It can't be diminished. From you, I have learned to strive for excellence, no matter what the personal cost. Wesley, I'm sorry I won't be able to see you grow into the exceptional man you'll be. But your kindness and innocence are ageless. Geordi, in those moments I felt the most despair, you took my hand and helped me to see things differently. You taught me to look beyond the moment. My friend Data. You see things with the wonder of a child, and that makes you more human than any of us. Captain Jean-Luc Picard. I wish I could say you've been like a father to me, but I've never had one, so I don't know what it feels like. But if there was someone in this universe I could choose to be like, someone who I would want to make proud of me, it's you. You who have the heart of an explorer and the soul of a poet. So, you'll understand when I say, death is that state in which one exists only in the memory of others. Which is why it is not an end. No goodbyes. Just good memories. Hailing frequencies closed, sir.
Au revoir, Natasha. The gathering is concluded.
Sir, the purpose of this gathering confuses me.
Oh? How so?
My thoughts are not for Tasha, but for myself. I keep thinking how empty it will feel without her presence. Did I miss the point?
No, you didn't, Data. You got it.
Captain, we are nearing the periphery of Sector twenty one five oh three.
Be on the lookout for a Cardassian patrol ship, Mister Worf. They should be hailing us soon.
Even with a treaty, they're still skittish about protecting their border.
Last time I was in this sector, I was on the Stargazer, running at warp speed ahead of a Cardassian warship.
Running, Captain? You? That's hard to believe.
Believe it. I'd been sent to make preliminary overtures to a truce. I'd lowered my shields as a gesture of good will. But the Cardassians were not impressed. They had taken out most of my weapons and damaged the impulse engines before I could regroup and run.
The Cardassians have no honour. I do not trust them.
They're our allies now, Mister Worf. We have to trust them.
Trust is earned, not given away.
I hope their scout ship makes contact soon. It's not a good idea to stay too long on a Cardassian border without making your intentions known.
O'BRIEN:What is it?
Kelp buds, plankton loaf and sea berries.
O'BRIEN:Sweetheart, I'm not a fish.
It's very healthy. I had this every morning when I was growing up.
O'BRIEN:What? No muffins or oatmeal, or corned beef and eggs?
For breakfast?
O'BRIEN:Keiko, I've been thinking You've been introducing me to all this wonderful food that you're accustomed to. I'd like to do the same. Isn't that what marriage is about? Sharing?
What kind of foods?
O'BRIEN:Scalloped potatoes, mutton shanks, oxtails and cabbage.
Kind of heavy.
O'BRIEN:Oh, you'll love it, I promise. I can still remember the aromas when my mother was cooking.
She cooked?
O'BRIEN:She didn't believe in a replicator. She thought real food was more nutritious.
She handled real meat? She touched it and cut it?
O'BRIEN:Yeah, like a master chef. She was fantastic. Of course, I'll have to use the replicator, but I'll make something special for you tonight. You'll love it, I promise.
Okay. Maybe I'll have something special for you, tonight, too.
O'BRIEN:Something's wrong.
Red alert. Take emergency stations.
Cardassian ship preparing to fire again, sir.
Increase power to forward shields. Hail them again, Mister Worf.
What the hell is he doing? Damage report.
Minor damage to secondary hull before we put our shields up, sir. No casualties. Structural integrity intact.
Engineering to Bridge. Starboard power coupling is down.
Evasive action, delta sequence. Ready phasers, Mister Worf.
Delta evasion plan initiated.
Limit targets to engines and shields.
Aye, sir. Ready.
Fire.
Direct hit, sir. Moderate damage to their aft shield generators.
Continue phaser fire.
Multiple hits, sir. Power failure in forward shields.
The Cardassian ship is standing down, sir.
Let's see if they'll answer our hail now, Mister Worf.
Frequency open.
This is Captain Jean-Luc Picard of the Federation Starship Enterprise.
I am Gul Macet of the Cardassian ship Trager.
Why have you fired on us?
A curious question, Captain. In war, one attacks one's enemies.
There is a treaty between our peoples.
Perhaps that fact was unknown to the Federation starship which destroyed our space station in the Cuellar System two days ago.
A Federation starship?
Attacked an unarmed science station. They had barely enough time to send an emergency signal before they were incinerated.
Gul Macet the Federation and the Cardassians have struggled too hard for peace to abandon it so easily.
We are not the ones who abandoned it, Captain.
Let me talk to my superiors, find out what's behind this. Give me one hour. The alternative is for us to continue firing at one other, and in such a contest, you would be at a disadvantage.
Very well. One hour.
Captain, we've confirmed your report. It was the starship Phoenix, under the command of Benjamin Maxwell.
Ben Maxwell? But he's one of Starfleet's finest captains. He must have had provocation.
I wish we knew. He's gone on silent running. Doesn't answer our communiqus.
Then he's still in Cardassian space?
The station he destroyed was in sector twenty one five oh five. You're the nearest starship. We want you to go in and find him.
Will the Cardassians cooperate?
They've granted you safe passage. We've agreed that you'll take along a delegation of observers as a show of good faith. Jean-Luc, I don't have to tell you the Federation is not prepared for a new sustained conflict. You must preserve the peace, no matter what the cost. Haden out.
There will be three Cardassians transporting aboard. Their Captain, Gul Macet and two of his aides. My intention is to be as open as possible with them, allow them to share in our search for the Phoenix.
Sir, it is necessary to assign them a security detail.
They're our guests, Mister Worf. I don't want them to feel like prisoners.
I tend to agree with Mister Worf, Captain. I think we should limit their access while they're on board. They don't need to have the run of the ship.
At least allow me to post guards in some of the sensitive areas of the ship.
Very well, let's limit their access. But you instruct your people they are guests.
Aye, sir.
Counsellor, I want you to stay as close to the crew as possible. Some of them may feel uncomfortable with Cardassians on board. I don't want any incidents.
Yes, Captain.
Mister Data, is there anyone else on board who served previously with Captain Benjamin Maxwell?
Accessing. Chief O'Brien served under his command aboard the Rutledge, sir.
Indeed. Number One, will you and the Counsellor meet our guests in Transporter room three? And inform Chief O'Brien I will be calling on him.
Yes, sir.
Welcome to the Enterprise. I'm First Officer William Riker, Counsellor Deanna Troi.
I am Gul Macet. My aides, Glinn Daro, Glinn Telle.
This is our Transporter Chief, Mister O'Brien. Shall we?
Captain's Log, supplemental. We have entered Cardassian territory, and are proceeding on our quest to locate the Phoenix.
And with long range sensors, we've been scanning a radius of ten light years. We can effectively scan one sector in a day.
We're scanning Sector twenty one five oh five now. There's still no sign of the Phoenix.
In fact, you have no assurance that the ship is still in Sector twenty one five oh five.
In fact, we have no idea where it is. We thought the last known coordinates were a reasonably good place to start.
Captain Picard, you can understand that we are sceptical. Do you expect us to believe that you are using every means at your disposal to track down one of your own?
Of course you are concerned, Gul Macet. It is precisely because of that fact that I have included you in every aspect of our effort. You're present with my staff. You're hearing reports as I hear them, nothing edited, nothing withheld.
Very well.
Transporter Chief O'Brien, has served with Benjamin Maxwell. I thought that he might be able to provide some insights. Mister O'Brien, I understand that Captain Maxwell lost his family during a raid on an outpost.
O'BRIEN:More like sabotage, sir. It was on Setlik Three. A squad of Cardassian militia made a sneak raid on an outpost, wiped out close to a hundred civilians.
Then it's revenge he's after.
O'BRIEN:That's not what I meant.
Maxwell is taking retribution for his own loss.
O'BRIEN:Captain Maxwell would never
Gentlemen, please, let's not indulge in speculation. Can we confine our discussion to facts? Now, Mister O'Brien
Worf to Captain Picard.
Go ahead, Mister Worf.
Long range sensors have located the Phoenix.
Gul Macet, will you join me on the Bridge?
O'BRIEN:Deck six.
Deck ten. Your Captain is most impressive.
O'BRIEN:Yes, he is.
Chief O'Brien, our Transporting system is still operating with active feed pattern buffers. I would like to talk with you about your technology.
O'BRIEN:I'll have to get Commander La Forge's approval on that.
I understand. In the meantime, we're going to your Ten Forward. Will you join us?
O'BRIEN:If my Commander tells me to discuss the Transporter with you, I will. If Captain Picard orders me to tell you everything I know about Ben Maxwell, I will. But who I choose to spend my free time with, that's my business.
Captain, the Phoenix in Sector twenty one five oh five.
Ensign, set a course, warp six. Mister Worf, send a message by subspace. Tell them to prepare for a rendezvous.
Yes, Captain.
Captain, a suggestion.
Yes?
We have a number of ships in sector twenty one five oh five. If you will give us more precise coordinates and the ship's coded transponder frequency, we would be able to intercept Maxwell far more quickly than you.
I'm sure that's true. However, given the circumstances, I would prefer to make the initial contact myself. I'm sure you would, if the situation were reversed.
Captain, time is crucial. You have a dangerous man out there with a huge arsenal at his command. If he is intent on revenge against my people he must be stopped before he can do more damage.
Captain, so far we have an isolated incident. If I can reach him first, then perhaps diplomacy can prevail. But if one of your ships decides to retaliate, there is a danger we could lose control of the situation.
Then you will not give us the means to find his precise location?
No. I won't.
O'BRIEN:There you are. Potato casserole. A dish fit for kings.
O'BRIEN:The minstrel boy to the war has gone
What's that you're singing?
O'BRIEN:What? Oh, it's just an old song. A bunch of us used to sing it together on the Rutledge. I hadn't thought about it in years
What's it about?
O'BRIEN:Oh, it's about war and glory.  The minstrel boy to the war has gone. In the ranks of death you will find him. His father's sword he hath girded on. And his wild harp slung behind him. Captain Maxwell always liked that song. I guess it's all this business with him and the Cardassians brought it back to me. You know, sitting with the staff this morning, I could tell there were people in that room who still don't like the Cardassians.
I imagine that's to be expected.
O'BRIEN:You do?
Sure. The war lasted a long time. That takes its toll on people. What are these little dark things?
O'BRIEN:Capers. But the fighting is over now. Why should anyone still feel however they feel?
You fought the Cardassians, didn't you?
O'BRIEN:Well, there were some skirmishes, when I was with Captain Maxwell.
Well, how do you feel about them?
O'BRIEN:Me? I feel fine. I mean, the war's over now.
The pursuing ship is the Phoenix.
And the other?
It appears it be a Cardassian supply ship.
How would you know that?
We are able to make that determination.
You can read our transponder codes.
The important thing at the moment is that one of your ships may be in jeopardy. Mister Worf, has there been any answer to our communication?
No, Captain.
Put out a repeating message on all subspace channels, priority one communiqu. Break off your pursuit immediately.
Aye, sir.
Gul Macet, you see we are doing everything in our power to reach the Phoenix.
Yes, and accomplishing nothing, I'm sorry to say. Can you show me the location of our other ships?
Mister Data.
There, you see? We have a warship which could intercept the Phoenix before it's too late. If you will give us the transponder frequency. Or are you going to stand there while our ship is destroyed, Captain?
Mister Worf, has there been any response to our hails?
No, Captain.
Very well. Mister Worf, relay the prefix codes of the Phoenix to the Cardassian warship.
Sir, they will be able to dismantle its shields. The Phoenix will not have a chance.
I cannot allow Maxwell to ambush that supply ship. Mister Worf, now.
Yes, Captain.
Sir, the Cardassian warship is moving on the Phoenix.
Mister Data, overlay weapon ranges of the two ships.
The warship is three hundred thousand kilometres from the Phoenix. It is opening fire. The Phoenix has taken a direct hit. The Phoenix is beginning evasive manoeuvres. It has positioned itself outside the weapons range of the opposing ship. The Phoenix has powered up both phasers and photon torpedoes. The Phoenix is firing photon torpedoes.
He has destroyed our warship.
Does the supply ship have any weapons?
Very limited. Certainly not enough to defeat a Nebula class starship.
Sir, the Phoenix is firing on the
The warship carried a crew of six hundred, the supply ship, fifty.
Mister Data estimated time to intercept with the Phoenix.
At our present speed of warp four, sixteen hours, forty four minutes.
Ensign, increase to warp nine.
O'BRIEN:Captain.
Chief. I wanted to talk to you.
O'BRIEN:Anything I can do, sir, you know that.
Ben Maxwell. He must be quite a man.
O'BRIEN:He's a rare one, all right. I count myself lucky, sir. I've served with the two finest Captains in Starfleet.
From your knowledge of the man, what has gone wrong?
O'BRIEN:There's a reason for what he's doing. Those Cardassians were up to something, I'm sure of it.
When his family was killed, how did he take it?
O'BRIEN:I'd say he took it well. Oh, I know he was broken up inside, who wouldn't be? But you'd never know it to see him. He never missed a minute's duty, always had a smile, a joke.
I see.
O'BRIEN:He would never retaliate out of vengeance, no matter what that Cardassian says. They're up to something, sir. They're the ones you should be investigating, not Captain Maxwell.
You don't care for the Cardassians?
O'BRIEN:I like them fine. It's just, well, I know them. You learn to watch your back when you're around those people.
Ben Maxwell has just sent more than six hundred of them to their deaths.
O'BRIEN:I don't know what to say, sir, but he must have had his reasons.
I think when one has been angry for a very long time, one gets used to it. And it becomes comfortable, like old leather. And, finally, it becomes so familiar that one can't ever remember feeling any other way. Thank you, Chief.
Kanar.
O'BRIEN:Mind if I join you?
Do you want another? And an ale.
O'BRIEN:Kanar. I never could develop a taste for it.
It takes a bit of getting used to.
O'BRIEN:I wanted to say I owe you an apology. I shouldn't have popped off like that in the turbolift.
I think
Here's your ale, Mister O'Brien.
This has been hard on all of us. I know I'll be happy when I'm back on my own ship.
O'BRIEN:I guess that's true. I hadn't thought of it like that. I was on Setlik three with Captain Maxwell the morning after the massacre. We were too late, of course. Almost everyone was dead.
That was a terrible mistake. We were told the outpost was a launching place for a massive attack against us.
O'BRIEN:The only people left alive were in an outlying district of the settlement. I was sent there with a squad to reinforce them. Cardassians were advancing on us, moving through the streets, destroying, killing. I was with a group of women and children when two Cardassian soldiers burst in. I stunned one of them. The other jumped me. We struggled. One of the women threw me a phaser, and I fired. The phaser was set at maximum. The man just incinerated, there before my eyes. I'd never killed anything before. When I was a kid, I'd worry about swatting a mosquito. It's not you I hate, Cardassian. I hate what I became because of you.
I will protest this, Klingon!
Lieutenant?
He was found at a computer station on deck thirty five, attempting to access information on our weapon systems.
A lie, Gul Macet. I was studying the terminal interface systems. They're more efficient than ours. I have no idea what was in the files.
What business did you have going near one of their computers?
But, Gul Macet, I meant nothing. There was no harm done.
Go to your quarters. You are confined there for the duration of this expedition.
As you wish, sir.
Mister Worf, please accompany him.
Gladly, Captain.
Captain, may we speak in private?
You have the Bridge, Number One.
I deeply regret what my aide has done, Captain. You have my word he will be disciplined upon my return.
You may take whatever action against him you feel is appropriate. I consider the matter closed.
I'm not sure I would be so generous in your place, Captain. Thank you.
If there is to be a lasting peace, Gul Macet, neither you nor I must allow any one man to undermine our efforts.
There are those who crave war, who need it. I am not one of them, Captain, and I'm beginning to see that neither are you. We have had our full measure. The lasting peace begins here, with the two of us.
Bridge to Captain.
Picard here.
We have located the Phoenix, sir. We will intercept it in twenty two minutes.
Captain's log, stardate 44431.7. We have established communication with Captain Maxwell, and he has agreed to come on board.
Welcome aboard, sir. I'm Commander Riker, First Officer.
I know all about you, Commander. Fine work you did with the Borg. We all owe you on that one.
Thank you, sir.
O'Brien? Miles O'Brien?
O'BRIEN:Hello, Captain. Good to see you again.
How are you? I had no idea you were on the Enterprise. This was my Tactical Officer on the Rutledge. Best I ever had.
O'BRIEN:Thank you, sir.
O'Brien has the ability to size up a situation instantly, then come up with options to fit all contingencies. Remarkable.
O'BRIEN:Well, if that's true, I learned it from you, sir.
But you got that silver tongue by kissing the stone, right? Well, Commander, best I see your Captain straight away. We've got a lot to talk about.
Yes, sir.
Captain Jean-Luc Picard. Captain Benjamin Maxwell.
That'll be all, Commander.
Captain.
A pleasure, Captain.
Please, sit down.
You must think I've gone mad.
The thought had occurred.
Picard, I have to tell you I was grateful when I realised it was you Starfleet sent after me. Somebody who knows what it's really like out here.
I know of nothing out here that could possibly justify what you have done.
Then listen to this. The Cardassians are arming again. That so-called science station? Military supply port.
How do you know this?
Information comes my way.
From whom? Where is your documentation?
I know what they're doing. I can smell it. There's no good reason for a science station in the Cuellar System, but it's a hell of a strategic site for a military transport station. A jumping-off point into three Federation sectors. They're running supply ships back and forth and nobody's going to tell me it's for scientific research.
But whatever circumstances you encountered, why didn't you notify Starfleet?
And wait six months while the bureaucrats sit around reading reports, trying to figure out what to do? They don't know what's going on out here. But you should, Picard. You know what it's like to be under fire.
You weren't under fire.
Lives were at stake.
Whose lives?
We had to act now.
Why?
It smells musty in here. Like a bureaucrat's office.
You have killed nearly seven hundred people and you have taken us to the brink of war.
I have prevented war, or at the very least delayed it a good long time. The peace treaty was a ruse, to give them breathing room, time to regroup.
And so all alone you decided to dispose of the treaty.
I took the initiative. I did what had to be done.
What had to be done? For whom? Why does a man with a long and brilliant service abandon the fundamental principles that he has believed in, even fought for, all his life? I believe it is because of what they did to your wife and your children.
Not true. Not true.
To avenge their deaths.
You're a fool, Picard. History will look at you and say this man was a fool.
I'll accept the judgement of history.
When it becomes clear what the Cardassians have done, I will be vindicated.
What the Cardassians have or have not done is irrelevant.
Irrelevant? Come with me. Find one of their supply ships and we'll see how irrelevant it is.
We're not going after any more Cardassian ships. You're going to return to your bridge and set a course for Starbase two one one. The Phoenix and the Enterprise will return to Federation space together. Those are Starfleet's orders. I will permit you the dignity of retaining your command during the voyage. The only alternative is to put you in the brig and to tow your ship back to starbase in disgrace.
I will return to my ship.
You understand your orders?
Yes, Captain.
Mister Worf, report to my Ready room. My guest is departing.
Aye, sir.
Captain's log, supplemental. With the Phoenix in close formation, we are proceeding directly to Starbase two one one.
Mister Data, how long until we clear Cardassian space?
At our present speed, three hours, twenty minutes, sir.
Mister Worf, send a message to Admiral Haden at Starfleet. Inform him of our projected time of arrival.
Aye, sir.
Captain, the Phoenix has changed course.
What is he doing?
Ensign, change course to pursue. Mister Worf, will you hail Captain Maxwell?
No response, sir.
Data, project his new course.
Sir, the Phoenix is heading directly for a Cardassian vessel point one two light years from our location.
He'll attack that ship just as he did the others.
Continue the hail, Mister Worf. Priority one message. Do you know what that ship might be?
I imagine it's a supply ship, headed for the research station in the Kelrabi system.
The Phoenix still does not respond, sir.
Ensign, warp eight. Overtake him.
Captain, the Phoenix has accelerated to warp nine. We will not be able to reach him before he intercepts the Cardassian ship.
Ensign, warp nine.
Aye, sir.
Mister Worf, arm phasers. Continue the hail.
Aye, sir.
Captain, Chief O'Brien was Maxwell's Tactical officer.
Get him up here.
Sir, the Phoenix has dropped out of warp. They have reached the Cardassian vessel.
Slow to impulse.
Vessels are within visual range.
On screen.
Has the Phoenix activated its weapon systems?
Negative, sir. Their phaser banks are not armed.
What about the Cardassians?
Our sensors are unable to determine status of the Cardassian defensive systems. Their ship is running with a high powered subspace field.
Mister O'Brien, your former Commander, a Federation Captain, is about to place me in the position of firing on his ship. I need your knowledge of the man. How he thinks, what he's capable of doing.
O'BRIEN:Aye, sir.
Sir, Captain Maxwell is hailing us.
On screen.
All right, Picard. You need proof? You've got it now.
Captain Maxwell, you have disobeyed a direct order.
Board the ship, you'll see that everything I've been saying is true.
The Cardassian vessel will not be boarded. You will transport yourself aboard the Enterprise
Picard, if you don't board that ship, I'll destroy it.
And I will use whatever force is necessary to prevent you from taking that action, Captain.
O'BRIEN:Sir, Captain Maxwell, if he feels his back is to the wall, he'll strike.
Captain, the Phoenix is transferring power to its shields.
They're arming phasers and loading forward torpedo bays.
Red alert. It seems you were right, Mister O'Brien. Ready phasers, load torpedoes.
Phasers armed. Loading forward and aft torpedo bays.
O'BRIEN:Sir, let me beam over. Try to talk to him. We served together a long time. When you've been through what we have, you tend to get inside someone. He might listen.
He'd never drop his shields and allow you to transport on board.
O'BRIEN:The Phoenix is using a high energy sensor system. It cycles every five point five minutes. Between cycles there's a window of a fiftieth of a second. Trust me, I can get through.
Make it so.
Not now!
O'BRIEN:I'm not armed.
How the devil did you get over here?
O'BRIEN:I had the thought that if we could talk we could figure a way out of this mess.
The way out of this is clear. Talk to Picard. Get him to board the damned ship.
O'BRIEN:He won't do that, sir.
But he'd turn his weapons on a Federation Starship to protect the enemy? I don't believe it.
O'BRIEN:He will. Count on it.
What the hell has happened to this war?
O'BRIEN:Sir, there is no war. The war is over.
You're wrong. The Cardassians live to make war.
O'BRIEN:That's what everybody thinks about the enemy. That's probably what they think about us.
We're not the same at all. We do not start wars. We do not make surprise attacks on manned outposts. We do not butcher women and children in their homes. Children who never got the chance to grow up. You were with me on Setlick. You saw what they did.
O'BRIEN:Yes, sir.
What was the name of the fellow who always hung around you like a puppy?
O'BRIEN:Will Kayden. Stompie.
Stompie. As cool under fire as a mountain lake.
O'BRIEN:Yes, sir.
He died at Setlick, didn't he?
O'BRIEN:Yes, sir.
What was that song of his? The one he always sang, the one I liked?
O'BRIEN:The minstrel boy to the war has gone. In the ranks of death you will find him.
His father's sword he hath girded on and his wild harp slung behind him. Land of song, said the warrior bard, tho' all the world betrays thee. One sword at least thy rights shall guard.
O'BRIEN:One faithful harp shall praise thee.
I'm not going to win this one, am I. Chief?
O'BRIEN:No, sir.
Captain's log, supplemental. Captain Maxwell has turned his ship over to his First Officer and transported aboard the Enterprise. I have confined him to quarters for the return voyage.
Thank you, Chief.
O'BRIEN:I'd just like to say, sir, he was a good man. What he did was terribly wrong, I know that now, but I'm still proud to have served with him.
Thank you, Chief, and well done. That'll be all.
His loyalty is admirable, even if it is misplaced.
The loyalty you would so quickly dismiss does not come easily to my people, Gul Macet. You have much to learn about us. Benjamin Maxwell earned the loyalty of those who served with him. You know, in war, he was twice honoured with the Federation's highest citation for courage and valour. And if he could not find a role for himself in peace, we can pity him, but we shall not dismiss him.
You are welcome to your opinion, Captain. I, for one, am grateful he is under lock and key.
One more thing, Macet. Maxwell was right. Those ships were not carrying scientific equipment, were they? A research station within arm's reach of three Federation sectors? Cargo ships running with high energy subspace fields that jam sensors?
If you believed the transport ship was carrying weapons, Captain, why didn't you board it as Maxwell requested?
I was here to protect the peace. A peace that I firmly believe is in the interests of both our peoples. If I had attempted to board that ship I am quite certain that you and I would not be having this pleasant conversation, and that ships on both sides would now be arming for war.
Captain, I assure you.
Take this message to your leaders, Gul Macet. We'll be watching.
We are approaching Starbase one seven nine.
Half impulse, Mister Crusher.
Going to half impulse.
Captain, this is the Bridge. We have arrived at Starbase one seven nine.
Acknowledged, Number One.
Establish position zero nine zero mark three four five at twenty seven thousand kilometres. Hailing frequencies.
Open.
Starbase one seven nine, this is the Enterprise.
Enterprise, this is Starbase one seven nine. We are ready for transfer on your mark.
Thank you. Commander Data, you have the bridge. Ensign Crusher, you're with me.
Starbase one seven nine. We are ready to commence transfer.
Acknowledged, Enterprise. Begin transfer.
Welcome aboard the Enterprise. I'm Commander William Riker, your First Officer. Those of you who are here as replacements will step outside follow Lieutenant Lewis. He will assign you to your crew quarters.  Ensign, you're here on the exchange programme. If you'll just follow Mister Crusher.
Mordoc, what are you doing here? You couldn't have graduated from the Academy already.
I am not Mordoc. I am Mendon. Ensign Mendon from the planet Benzar.
Sorry. It's a friend of mine. You look just like him.
We are from the same geostructure. Naturally we look alike.
How do you tell each other apart?
We just do.
It's nice to have you here, Ensign. There will be a briefing and indoctrination session in fifteen minutes.
I want to tell you how happy I am to be assigned to the Enterprise. It wasn't just luck. I requested it. I know I can be of great help to the ship.
Yes, of course. If you'll just follow Mister Crusher.
Yes, sir.
Commander Riker, report to the Phaser Range, please
On the way.
I was wondering if you had any feelings about the Officer Exchange Programme initiated by Starfleet Command.
Just positive ones, sir. Actually, I just welcomed Ensign Mendon on board. He certainly seems eager to please.
Well, that's a Benzite trait. It's been suggested that an officer from the Enterprise might participate in the programme.
That's probably a good idea.
Well, there is a Klingon vessel in the area.
I don't recall hearing of a Federation officer serving ever on a Klingon vessel.
No, no, neither have I.
It might prove to be beneficial.
Having Worf on board certainly has been.
Yes, sir. Who did you intend to send, sir?
I thought of asking for a volunteer.
I might be interested, sir.
Damn. Sorry, Number One, what was that?
I said I wouldn't mind the assignment, sir.
Any particular reason?
Because nobody's ever done it before.
I'll notify Starbase of your acceptance They'll contact the Klingon vessel, make the arrangements.
Captain's log, stardate 42506.5. We have departed from Starbase one seven nine and are headed for a rendezvous with the Klingon vessel, Pagh. I have informed the staff of Commander Riker's temporary assignment.
I have studied and know everything about my heritage.
Then you're just the person I need to talk to, clear something up. It's my understanding that one of the duties of the First Officer of a Klingon ship is to assassinate his Captain?
Yes, sir.
Wouldn't that bring about chaos?
Of course not. When and if the Captain becomes weak and unable to perform, it is expected that his honourable retirement should be assisted by his First. Your Second Officer will assassinate you for the same reasons.
The method of attrition must take a little getting used to.
The Klingon system has operated successfully for centuries.
It is different.
Many things will be different.
Can I help you, sir?
That's a wonderful method of maintaining a constant control factor over defensive shields, but I'm sure there's a way to improve response time. Sorry. Didn't mean to interrupt you. Just thought I could be of some help. However, I am correct in what I said.
That is superb designing. Absolutely first rate.
Yes, it is. Would you care to be more specific?
The input sampling. It's simple yet efficient enough. Of course a minor change of the helm readout would be much more helpful in emergency situations.
We've never had any problems with it. Have you seen it work?
Not in a practical exercise, but in theory, my theory, it would be more than a marginal improvement. I'll have to mention this to the Captain. He is open to some astute observations, isn't he?
I've never known the Captain not to listen to one of his officers.
Outstanding. Soon we'll get things running perfectly.
What is that?
It's a Klingon delicacy. Pipius claw. This is heart of targ. This, of course, is gagh.
Gagh?
Yes, serpent worms. Would you like some?
No, thanks. I've never heard of a Klingon starving to death on his own vessels, but you might.
Not if I weaken first.
I know all about that. Their beliefs are rather brutal, but usually what kills us kills them.
That's certainly good to know. Would you like something to drink?
I'm abstaining in honour of your last hour on board.
Your sacrifice will not go unnoticed.
Well, I'm familiar with the practice of the feast before the transfer. I've done it dozens of times. However, I usually made more palatable choices.
These are the more palatable choices.
Thank you. We know so little about them. There really is so much to learn. This is a great opportunity. I envy you, Mister Riker.
Commander.
An emergency transponder?
Slightly altered to transmit an omnidirectional signal and an emergency call.
You suspect trouble?
Simply a security precaution. I want to insure your return to this ship.
Sentiment, Lieutenant Worf?
Efficiency, Commander.
I understand. Thank you.
We have a Klingon vessel approaching.
Hailing frequencies.
Open. They are returning our hail in proper language. It is the Pagh.
On viewscreen. I'm Captain Picard of the Enterprise.
This is Captain Kargan of the Klingon vessel, the Pagh. Beam your First Officer on board immediately.
We are preparing to do so. And, Captain, you're getting a fine officer.
Thank you for your opinion, but I will judge that for myself. Screen off.
Not very hospitable, are they?
That is not your concern. Observe your station, Ensign Mendon.
Didn't mean to offend you.
You didn't. Yet.
Transporter, prepare to beam Commander Riker aboard the Pagh.
O'BRIEN:Acknowledged, Captain.
Mister Data, you have the Bridge.
Aye, sir.
O'BRIEN:Good luck, Commander.
Thanks, O'Brien.
O'BRIEN:I wouldn't want to go.
Why?
O'BRIEN:You're not afraid, are you.
No, I'm not.
O'BRIEN:I would be. Ready, sir.
Thanks. Energise.
Resume course, Mister Crusher.
Aye sir.
Take over, Commander Data, I'll be in observation.
Thank you, sir.
Sir. I am Ensign Mendon. I just wanted to tell you how pleased I am to be aboard the Enterprise.
Yes, of course. Good to have you aboard.
If you have a few minutes, I've noted a few procedural items which might speed up operations on the Bridge. I pick things up very fast.
Yes, of course you do. You have an excellent record. However, here on the Enterprise we use the chain of command. You will report your observations to Lieutenant Worf.
I beg your pardon, Captain. I just wanted to impress upon you
No need to apologise, Ensign. We should have explained it better to you at your indoctrination.
Ensign Mendon. You may impress me.
Is something wrong?
No. It's just I have never seen anyone of your species before
I'm just an average, everyday human who happens to be a Commander. Now, what were your orders?
To escort you to the Captain.
Proceed.
Yes, Commander.
Commander William Riker of the Starship Enterprise.
That is incorrect.
I don't understand.
You are Commander William Riker, First Officer of the Klingon cruiser, the Pagh. Or do you intend to disobey Federation orders?
I have no such intention, sir.
Exactly where are your loyalties, Commander?
I'm afraid I still don't understand, sir.
This ship is equipped with our best weapons and our finest warriors. Although we are on a peaceful mission, we are ready to go into battle instantly. I know I can count on every Klingon warrior in this crew to serve and die in that battle. So I ask you again, Commander Riker. Where are your loyalties?
I have been assigned to serve this ship and to obey your orders. And I will do exactly that.
Will you take an oath to that effect?
I just did.
Do not believe him! He lies!
Speak in their language. This is your Second Officer, Lieutenant Klag.
Is there something you wanted to say to me, Lieutenant?
Yes sir. I do not believe you.
Then I take it you challenge my authority over you.
Correct.
And your position on this, Captain?
I would say it your first command decision.
My oath is between Captain Kargan and myself. Your only concern is with how you obey my orders. Or do you prefer the rank of prisoner to that of Lieutenant?
I will take your orders.
And you, Commander Riker, will obey my orders.
Of course, Captain Kargan.
Sir, automatic scan has registered an unknown substance on the aft quarter of the exterior skin of the dorsal section.
Target that location and define.
Aye, sir.
I've located it sir. The dorsal of the Engineering section.
Viewscreen on. Focus on area. Magnification factor ten. Increase magnification to fifty.
Analyse.
The substance appears to be a rare form of subatomic bacteria, capable of doubling itself in size every fifteen minutes. It seems to be reacting with two of the compounds present in the Enterprise structure.
Origin.
Captain. I noticed it when I did an intensive scan of the Pagh. The Klingon ship.
And whom did you inform?
No one. I have not yet completed my full analysis.
You are supposed to report whatever is out of the ordinary.
And I think that falls into this category.
But sir, as I said, I have not yet completed my full analysis. It would be improper to report it until then.
How did you come to that decision?
It is a Benzite regulation. No officer on the deck of one of our ships would report an occurrence like this until he had a full analysis and a resolution. I have simply followed proper procedures.
It is our procedure, Ensign, to notify command of any possibility of danger to the ship. The decision is not yours. Do you understand?
Yes, sir.
Now, you will continue with your analysis and determine the danger, not only to our ship, but the Klingon vessel also.
Yes, Captain. That will take a couple of hours.
Use whatever resources are necessary. It appears we may have encountered a new life form. I want to know everything about it as quickly as possible. Commander Data, supervise.
Aye, sir.
And then I will instruct you in Enterprise etiquette.
First Officer:First Officer's personal log. I have aboard the Pagh a short time, but long enough to be impressed with the abilities and single-mindedness of the Klingons.
Commander, you're not eating very much.
I'm not that hungry.
Is the food all right, Commander?
It's delicious. The pipius claw was excellent. I also enjoyed this Bregit lungs.
And the Rokeg blood pie?
Delicious.
Good. Then you'll also enjoy this.
Isn't that gagh?
Very good. You did some research on our nutritional choices.
Yes, but, it's still moving.
Gagh is always best when served live. Would you like something easier?
Easier?
Yes. If Klingon food is too strong for you, perhaps we could get one of the females to breast feed you.
You're not worried about my weakening, are you?
Look around you. There are no old warriors.
No, sir, I'm sure they all died with honour.
Exactly. You may live long enough to learn about us.
He is not very attractive, but I will have him.
They are inquisitive. They would like to know how you would endure.
Endure what?
Them.
One or both?
I may be back for you.
Is she serious?
Yes.
Commander, would you say you're a typical Federation officer?
I suppose so. Why?
Well, it's just you're not what I expected.
In what way?
You have a sense of humour.
I was thinking the same thing about you. In all my dealings with Klingons, including our Lieutenant Worf, the thought never occurred to me of Klingons laughing.
There is much about us you do not know.
That's why I'm here.
You should ask.
I may. After this tour, I may have some worthy questions.
Questions about what? About our future? Our future is honour. Our present is serving this ship.
Like you, I have a mother and a father. They look like me, I look like them.
Are they still alive?
My mother lives, My father was killed in battle at Tranome Sar.
And your father?
My father? My father was captured in battle by Romulans and not allowed to die. He eventually escaped.
Where is he now?
He is on our planet. He waits.
He waits for his death.
He will eventually fade of a natural illness and die, weakened and useless. Honourless. I will not see him.
He's your father.
A Klingon is his work, not his family. That is the way of things.
He's your father.
Klingons do not express feeling the way you do.
Perhaps you should.
We would not know how.
Yesterday, I did not know how to eat gagh.
It is confirmed that the organisms feed on some of the compounds that make up the hull of the Enterprise.
And the Klingon ship, the Pagh?
They are much more susceptible. Their hull contains more of the compounds.
Projection.
According to the rate of reproduction, there should be a twelve centimetre opening in the Klingon hull at this time.
Signal them at once. They could be unaware of the danger. They may need our help.
Aye, sir.
Change course to intercept.
Aye, sir.
It will take some time to locate them, sir. They are on undesignated manoeuvres in the Pheben system.
Find them.
Tell me, Commander Riker, what do you make of this?
I felt no collision. Were we hit by a small meteor?
No. No collision.
Corrosion, then?
No, not corrosion.
Science Station, analyse.
We already have, and fortunately the cavity opened onto a section that could withstand the change in pressure.
Then what is it?
A space organism eating away at our hull.
What are you talking about? What is it? I mean, you must have some way to repair it.
I'm afraid not.
Our estimate is that in less than eight hours we will have lost too much of our shell to remain intact.
The only vessel we've had contact with recently is the Enterprise.
There was no direct contact with the Enterprise.
Tactics Officer, report to Commander Riker.
The Enterprise did conduct an extensive scan of this vessel.
That's normal procedure.
What type of beam did the Enterprise use to cause this damage in our hull?
None. Why would they do that? We're allies.
But my logs indicate that the Enterprise directed an intense scanning beam at this specific area for a duration of two minutes.
Explain that.
I can't.
It could be a weapon.
It's no weapon. The Enterprise has no reason to do that, especially with me on board. It makes no sense. Why?
Why is no longer important. What is important is our response to this attack. Engage cloaking device. Change course to intercept the Enterprise.
What do you intend to do, Captain?
Intend? There is only one response. I intend to attack the Enterprise and destroy it.
You're making some progress. You've eliminated half the possibilities already.
Thank you, but I seem to have become efficient a little later than was needed. It was my responsibility to learn and adapt to the Enterprise's regulations, and I didn't do that.
Not really. You just made an error. Captain Picard may not like them, but he knows they turn up from time to time.
I failed, I had an opportunity to show the Captain my superior capabilities and I failed. I can never recover from that.
Mendon, it was a mistake. You didn't put the organism on the hull, you discovered it. You were trying to analyze it and messed up on protocol a little.
I realise you're trying to be nice to me, and I appreciate it. What I don't understand is why.
Why not? I thought you could use a friend.
Thank you. I only hope I can learn your ways before I mess up again. I imagine my methods must seem foolish to you.
They're different. But that's what this exchange programme is all about. You learn the way we do things and take that information back to your command. It's up to them to decide which is better.
You're right. I'll do it your way. I'll work even harder than I did before, and I'll succeed brilliantly.
What is the status?
Unchanged. The rate of increase continues.
Commander Riker, check the organism growth with Engineering.
Keep him under scrutiny.
Captain, I'm not convinced Riker knew of any plot against us. If he did, why would he have come on board?
Because he was ordered to.
To die?
It's the expectation of any officer to be ordered to die at any time.
For a Klingon perhaps, but Riker's people do not volunteer for death so easily. He may be a spy, but he's no coward.
That only proves that he is intelligent. And you might not be as strong as you used to be.
Captain, I've picked up the Enterprise.
So soon?
The Enterprise is on an intercept course with us.
You almost had me believing this was a misunderstanding.
But?
The Enterprise has changed course and is following us. Why?
Ask them.
The reason is obvious. Their intent is clear. How long before we make contact?
Less than fifteen minutes, sir.
Put the ship on full battle alert. Arm all photon torpedoes. Let them charge into their destruction.
Captain, our bearings show that we should be in contact with the Klingon vessel now.
Slow to impulse.
Aye, sir. Impulse speed.
Hailing frequencies are open. There is no response.
Continue transmitting.
The Pagh is either cloaked or destroyed, sir.
Conduct an intensive scan of the area.
The Enterprise has slowed to impulse speed and is making an intensive sweep.
Hold your position. Let them come to us.
They may be here to help you. Don't be a fool!
Do not forget my rank.
I haven't. I am simply trying to help you understand.
I understand fully. Now, you understand. I am still Captain of this vessel and you are still crew and sworn to obey me. You gave me your oath.
Yes, sir, I did.
Then fulfill that oath and serve this ship as you swore to. Tell me of the surest method of attack against the Enterprise.
I won't.
You must. It is a matter of honour and loyalty to your oath.
I will not surrender the secrets of the Enterprise to you.
If your word is no good, then how can we ever trust Starfleet?
I will not break any vow I have taken in the past. I have also taken an oath a loyalty to your ship. I will not break that.
They are in conflict!
No, sir, they are not! I will obey your orders. I will serve this ship as First Officer, and in an attack against the Enterprise I will die along with this crew. But I will not break my oath of loyalty to Starfleet.
If you had told those secrets about the Enterprise, I would have labeled you a traitor and killed you where you stood. But instead you will die with us. You'll die like a Klingon.
Sir, I have something to report to you immediately.
Yes, go ahead, Ensign.
I have managed to isolate the organisms on our hull. They are a sub-micron form capable of breaking nuclear bonds in the tritanium plating.
But can they be removed from the hull?
Yes. They are controllable and can be removed from the hulls of both ships by using a tunnelling neutrino beam.
Thank you, Ensign. Well done. Initiate that procedure . Lieutenant, add that information to hailing messages.
Aye, sir.
Lieutenant.
The Enterprise has changed hailing messages. They now include a promise of cleaning the organisms and helping in repairs.
I told you, they're here to help.
I do not believe them. Arm all weapons. Prepare to attack!
Captain's log, Stardate 42507.8. Although our search has been extensive, we are still unable to locate the Klingon ship or any evidence of it's destruction.
Considering the absence of debris, Captain, it is reasonable to assume the Klingon vessel is in the area and cloaked.
Agreed.
And since we do not know it's intent, I recommend we go to Red Alert.
Make it so, Lieutenant.
Aye, sir.
The Enterprise has raised its shields.
That's normal procedure when entering into a suspicious situation. It's not an act of aggression. The Enterprise will not fire first.
Then they are fools, for we will.
You'll get only one shot.
We'll only need one. Stand by on phasers and torpedoes. Prepare to fire them simultaneously.
I recommend you don't fire until you're within forty thousand kilometres.
Why?
It will cut down their response time.
You are honouring your promise to serve us?
Would you do less?
You will give the order to fire, Commander Riker. Call out distances. Any questions, Mister Riker?
There's one thing I'd like to say. I question your judgment. In my opinion, your reason for forcing this confrontation is not valid.
Are you finished?
Yes, sir.
Commence with attack as ordered.
Fifty five thousand kilometres and closing.
Is that a weapon, Commander?
No, sir.
Give it to me.
We are getting an emergency signal from a command transponder. Location zero three five mark three one three. Frequency and code designate it as Commander Riker.
Chief O'Brien, lock onto that transponder signal.
O'BRIEN:Yes, Captain. We're not yet in safe range for a transfer
O'BRIEN:And defensive shields are still in place.
We may have to stretch it.
We have to know what's going on
And Commander Riker is the only one who can tell us. Beam him directly here onto the Bridge
On my command.
O'BRIEN:Yes, sir. I'll wait till forty thousand.
Forty eight thousand. Forty four thousand.
Transporter Room, stand by.
You control the shields.
O'BRIEN:Ready, sir.
Forty thousand.
Forty thousand kilometres.
Prepare to drop cloaking shields, and fire when ready. Steady.
Transporter room, energise.
Hold where you are, Klag. I've relieved Captain Kargan. He was acting in an irrational manner. I'm your Captain now. Serve this ship as I have!
Where am I?
You're on board the starship Enterprise.
Riker has no honour. He tricked me!
He's only dazed, sir.
Well that's fine, but where's Commander Riker?
Cloaking shields off. Obey my orders.
We will be destroyed.
If we are, it will be in battle, and I will die with you. So I repeat, cloaking shields off!
It is the Pagh, sir.
It has all armament locked on us and ready to fire.
Hold this position. Hailing frequencies. Calling the Pagh. This is the Enterprise. We are here to assist. Do not fire.
They will not believe you.
Pagh, we're here to assist. Do you read me?
Enterprise, this is Captain William Riker of the Klingon vessel, Pagh. I order you to lower your shields and surrender.
Lower shields. Surrender, as ordered.
I demand to be beamed back aboard my vessel!
Transporter Chief, prepare to beam Captain Kargan back aboard the Pagh.
O'BRIEN:Aye, sir.
Captain Riker, we can carry out your repairs immediately.
Thank you, Captain Picard.
You should have killed me.
I don't want your command.
But you tricked me to get it.
Either way, you can have it back.
Then return to your station.
Get him off my ship!
Yes, Captain. You understand the Klingons better than I thought, Commander.
Thank you, my friend.
That might have been one of the shortest assignments in the history of Starfleet.
Wrong, Number One. It was almost the longest. Well done.
Thank you. Actually, I learned quite a bit.
Apparently, not when to duck.
When not to duck would be more accurate.
Welcome aboard, Number One. Now, Lieutenant, conduct the Commander to Sickbay.
Aye, sir. Commander?
Your little toy worked. Thanks.
I'm glad it did.
You come from a very brave and unique people. I'm glad you're with us on the Enterprise.
Thank you, Commander, and welcome home.
Thank you. Thank you very much. Thank you. Thank you very much. Any requests tonight?
Night Bird.
Any request?
Night Bird!
Ladies and gentlemen, Night Bird. One, two.
What was that all about?
Will's been trying to get this piece right for ten years now. He's never made it through the solo.
Here it comes.
Data to Commander Riker.
Go ahead.
Commander, you are needed on the Bridge.
On my way. Saved by the bell.
You wanted to see me, Mister Data?
Yes, sir. It appears we will be able to transport to the surface sooner than anticipated.
Is the planet's distortion field re-phasing sooner than we predicted?
No, sir. Using the Potemkin's transport logs from the original evacuation, Commander La Forge and I were able to modify the transporters.
So we can beam through a higher distortion field.
The transporters are considerably more efficient than those used on the Potemkin eight years ago.
That's a good thing. I almost didn't make it off the surface. When can we get started?
Ninety seven minutes, sir.
How long will the transport window be open?
Twenty six minutes. After that, the distortion field will re-phase.
That doesn't give us much time to retrieve the database.
The planet's proximity to its sun will create two additional transport windows in the next three days.
Let's hope that's enough.
It will have to be, sir. The next transport window will not occur for another eight years, when the planet's orbit will bring it close enough to the sun to de-phase the distortion field.
Okay, notify the away team that we're going in ahead of schedule. I'll tell the Captain.
Aye, sir.
This is different than I remember. The place was a mess when we left.
Commander.
Someone was here.
A ship could have been caught in the distortion field and crashed. The survivors may have taken refuge here.
Commander, someone is approaching. A humanoid. Forty metres due east and closing.
Who are you?
RIKER 2:Who are you?
I'm Commander William Riker from the Federation Starship Enterprise.
RIKER 2:That's not possible. I'm Will Riker.
May I ask how you got here?
RIKER 2:Eight years ago, I led a team to evacuate this station.
What ship were you on?
RIKER 2:The Potemkin.
Why did you not return to the Potemkin with the others?
RIKER 2:I was the last one out. The distortion field must have interfered with the transport. They lost their signal lock on me. When I tried to contact the ship, I couldn't get through the interference. If you check with Starfleet I'm sure they will have recorded that I was lost on that day.
That's not what happened. I was the last one out and I made it back to the Potemkin.
RIKER 2:You don't believe me?
It's not that we don't believe you. It's just hard to see how both stories could be true. Would you be willing have our Doctor check you out?
RIKER 2:Of course.
Mister Worf, take him directly to Sickbay, and notify the Captain once you're on board. Let's get to work.
Worf to Enterprise. Two to beam up.
Aye, sir. Stand by.
Looks like you fractured your arm a few years ago.
RIKER 2:I was doing some repairs under the station when an earthquake hit. I got caught in a rockslide. I had to set it myself.
Jean-Luc Picard.
RIKER 2:Lieutenant Will Riker.
I hope you understand our need to verify your claim.
RIKER 2:Yes, sir.
Genetically, he's indistinguishable from Commander Riker.
Could there be some sort of cloning involved here?
I don't think so. There's no genetic drift.
But it's not conclusive.
That's why I compared their brain scans. Brain organisation patterns are as unique as fingerprints. Except for minor, minor differences, theirs are identical.
But can't brain patterns be cloned?
No. They're determined by experience, mostly from early childhood.
How can two grown men share the same childhood experiences? It just doesn't make any sense.
RIKER 2:I am Will Riker. I don't know who or what made it back to the Potemkin that day, but it wasn't me.
Lieutenant, our Chief Engineer is checking the transport logs of the Potemkin. Perhaps that will shed some light on the matter. Don't worry, we will get to the bottom of this. And in the meantime, you will be taken to your quarters. Try and make yourself as comfortable as possible.
RIKER 2:I will. The replicators on the station haven't worked for a long time ago. It's been a while since I've had a decent meal. Doctor.
Apparently there was a massive energy surge in the distortion field around the planet just at the moment you tried to beam out. The Transporter Chief tried to compensate by initiating a second containment beam.
An interesting approach. He must have been planning to reintegrate the two patterns in the transport buffer.
Actually, it wasn't really necessary. Commander Riker's pattern maintained its integrity with just the one containment beam. He made it back to the ship just fine.
What happened to the second beam?
The Transporter Chief shut it down, but somehow it was reflected back to the surface.
And another William Riker materialised there.
How was the second pattern able to maintained its integrity?
The containment beam must have had the exact same phase differential as the distortion field.
Which one of them is real?
That's the thing. Both. You were both materialised from a complete pattern.
Up until that moment, you were the same person.
But of course, as you and Lieutenant Riker have lived very different lives for the past eight years, you are now very different people. I suppose it's a little like meeting someone's twin. But no matter how strange it may seem to us, we now have two Will Rikers on board. And as Lieutenant Riker will be with us for several days, I think we should do everything we can to make him comfortable and welcome.
We still have the problem of retrieving the database. The computer on the station is not completely operational.
Many of its components have been removed. Apparently Lieutenant Riker used them to keep the station's radiation shield operational.
Can it be repaired, at least enough to access the database?
Without knowing what he did, that'll be tough.
Perhaps he can help us.
He was alone down there for a long time. I'm hesitant to let him go back until he's been evaluated.
I'll talk to him.
Thank you, Counsellor.
RIKER 2:Come in.
Hello, Will.
RIKER 2:Imzadi.
Will.
RIKER 2:I never thought I'd see you again.
We need to talk.
RIKER 2:You're on board because of him.
No. Commander Riker and I are friends. Close friends, but nothing more. Why don't we sit down? Do you remember the last time we saw each other?
RIKER 2:Like yesterday. The Janaran Falls on Betazed.
It was the day before you started your tour on the Potemkin.
RIKER 2:And we were going to meet on Risa, six weeks later.
We never did.
RIKER 2:I know.
No, what I mean is, Commander Riker and I never did. You see, he earned a promotion very quickly.
RIKER 2:I know that too. 'For exceptional valour during the evacuation of the research station on Nervala Four'. I looked at his service record.
He chose to make his career a priority. There wasn't much time for anything else. We kept in touch but we didn't see each other again until we were both posted to the Enterprise two years later. By then our feelings for each other had changed. We've served together for six years. Things never went back to the way they used to be.
RIKER 2:I had a lot of time on my hands when I was down on that station. There were days I felt so alone I thought I might lose my mind. Do you know how I made it through? I thought if I hung on for more day, they'd rescue me. Maybe I'd see you again. I guess things don't always work out the way you expect them to.
I know this isn't what you were hoping for, but that doesn't mean you can't make a future for yourself.
RIKER 2:Thanks.
Captain Picard wanted me to find out if you'd be willing to help us retrieve the station's database.
RIKER 2:I reconfigured that computer so many times they probably can't make heads or tails of it. I'd be happy to help.
Do you feel up to it?
RIKER 2:Absolutely.
Good. I'll tell the Captain. Well, I have to go.
RIKER 2:Deanna. I know it's been a long time since we've been together, and I know your feelings have changed. Mine haven't. I can't just give up. I'd like to be with you again.
Goodnight, Will.
Phase distortion is dropping. The second transport window opens in forty two seconds.
How long will we have, Lieutenant?
Thirty six minutes, sir.
We are losing time. Lieutenant Riker should be here.
Computer, locate Lieutenant
Cancel inquiry.
You were supposed to report here at eight hundred hours.
RIKER 2:I'm sorry, I was
I guess it's been a while since you've had to punch a clock. Let's go. Energise.
RIKER 2:I've shut down most of the consoles to save power. I re-routed just about everything through here.
Check out the primary EPS system. See if you can get some power to the rest of these consoles.
RIKER 2:I shunted the database to the main core underneath the station.
Can we access it from here?
RIKER 2:There's been a lot of seismic activity over the years. If the servo-links were damaged we may not be able to. I'll try to tap into the command pathways. You see if you can access and disable the file server.
You know, I've been thinking we should probably let Dad know what happened.
RIKER 2:I'm sure he'll be thrilled to know there are two of us now.
Actually, he and I have been able to patch a few things up.
RIKER 2:I've been able to get by for a long time without seeing him. I'm not about to start now. What made you contact him?
I didn't. He came on board the Enterprise to brief me when I was offered the Aries.
RIKER 2:What did he say when you turned down your own command?
He couldn't understand why I did it.
RIKER 2:For once he and I agree on something.
The primary EPS coupling is fused. The entire unit will have to be replaced.
RIKER 2:I've accessed the command pathways. The interlink pathways are functioning now.
See if that did the trick. No, it's not working.
RIKER 2:The servo-link must be damaged. We're going to have to go under the station and access the core directly.
We have less than three minutes left.
RIKER 2:I'll stay here. I'll be finished by the time the third window opens.
It's too dangerous. Our scans show the caverns are unstable.
RIKER 2:I've been down there dozens of times. I know my way around.
We'll come back during the third window, We'll bring a new EPS coupling and try to access the core from another console up here. Riker to Enterprise.
La Forge here.
We're ready to beam out.
RIKER 2:You go ahead. I'll be finished by the time you get back.
Hold it! I gave you an order, Lieutenant.
Computer, valerian root tea, hot.
Meet me in Transporter room three at nineteen hundred hours. It's important.
It pulses unendingly all through the night. Seek out the crystal that powers our flight.
Can I help you, Counsellor?
No, thank you.
What the future holds no one can know, But forward we look and forward we go.
RIKER 2:The Janaran falls.
I remember. Where did you get this?
RIKER 2:I made it a couple of years ago down on the station.
You made this?
RIKER 2:You should have seen the first two. It took a while to get a fine enough beam out of the phaser.
It's lovely. Thank you.
RIKER 2:Can you stay and talk? I wanted to remember our last night together.
So, how does it feel being with people again?
RIKER 2:Great. Strange. For a long time I did whatever I wanted, whenever I wanted. It's been hard taking orders again.
I can imagine.
RIKER 2:But I guess I'll have to get used to it if I want to get my career going again.
Is that what you've decided to do?
RIKER 2:Remember, I'm the one who wanted to make Captain by the time I was thirty five. I'm a little behind schedule, I'll admit that.
It's good you don't feel set back.
RIKER 2:I do. Things are a little more complicated than I had planned, but there's nothing going to stand in the way of my getting what I want.
There you go.
RIKER 2:Thanks. You don't know how many times I thought about you, about us. For weeks after the evacuation, I kept thinking they'd find a way through the distortion field and come back for me. I even thought we'd meet on Risa like we planned. But days went by and nobody came. Then I realised why. They thought that I had been killed in the beam out. No one came down because they thought there was no one to come down for. So I figured that they'd had a memorial service for me. Somehow that made me feel better.
I can understand that.
RIKER 2:You were there, all dressed in black. Very flattering on you, by the way.
I'm sure I looked terrible with my eyes all red and swollen from crying.
RIKER 2:Sometimes I would look up into the sky and I'd think, if I tried hard enough, I could make you feel my presence. That if I could let you know that I was alive, maybe you'd wait for me. I know it sounds crazy, but there were times when I could've sworn. What am I talking about?
The other day, when I told you about how Commander Riker and I didn't meet on Risa, what I didn't say was how disappointed I was.
RIKER 2:You didn't have to. I knew.
I started to hear from him less and less. I knew his career was taking him away from me but I didn't want to believe it was over. I spent a lot of time thinking about him. Wondering where he was, what he was doing. Sometimes I'd look into the sky and imagine that he knew, and that somehow he could sense me thinking about him. So, who knows? Maybe one night we were looking up at the same star, and you were thinking about me, and in a way, I was thinking about you.
Come.
You wanted to see me, sir?
Yes, Number One. Come in.
Lieutenant Riker has been to see me to talk about the away mission. He believes that the only way to retrieve the database is by directly accessing the main core underneath the station.
The seismic activity makes those caverns very unstable. In my opinion, it's too risky.
He said that he was down there recently. He seemed confident that it could be done safely.
There's a good chance we will be able to retrieve the database from one of the consoles inside the station.
But if it doesn't work, we won't have another chance for eight years.
Lieutenant Riker's plan is more dangerous, but it does have a better chance of succeeding.
Given the importance of the data, I think that it's worth the risk.
I'll look over the schematics and I'll draw up a mission plan.
I'm sure that Lieutenant Riker will be happy to help you with that.
I'll talk to him.
Sir.
Lieutenant.
RIKER 2:Sir.
I just met with the Captain about your mission recommendation. I would appreciate it if next time you came to me first.
RIKER 2:I tried talking to you yesterday on the station. You wouldn't hear me out.
I heard you, Lieutenant. I rejected your plan.
RIKER 2:May I ask what the Captain decided?
The Captain has decided to go with your recommendation, but that's not the point.
RIKER 2:Isn't it?
If you think I'm coming down on you because the Captain overruled me, think again. I happen to disagree with his decision, but he is my commanding officer and I follow his orders. Just so there's no confusion, I am your commanding officer and I expect you to do the same. If you can't, there's no place for you on my away team.
RIKER 2:Yes, sir.
There will be a meeting in the Observation lounge at fourteen hundred hours to draw up a mission plan.
We stayed in Ten Forward talking for hours.
Then what happened?
He walked me to my quarters.
Then what happened?
Beverly!
I'm just asking.
You know it's been over between Will and me for a long time.
He's not Will. He is Will but, you know what I mean.
It's really hard for me to separate my feelings for them.
Deanna, just because things turned out the way they did between you and Commander Riker, doesn't mean you shouldn't let things between you and Lieutenant Riker take their own course.
I knew you'd encourage me.
I thought that's that why you brought it up.
Well, I think I'll call it a day.
Beverly.
Bye.
RIKER 2:Some form of tai chi chuan?
Klingon exercises, actually. Lieutenant Worf teaches a class.
RIKER 2:The forms are very similar. Do that move again.
You just did the KoH-man-ara.
RIKER 2:Tai chi chuan. It's called the crane block. Now let's try something else.
RIKER 2:What was that called? Mister Worf's a very good teacher.
Hello, Will.
If you want to be with him, you don't have to ask my permission. It's the look in your eyes. I recognise it. You used to have it for me.
We've both had relationships with other people. This is different. I didn't know how you'd feel about it.
Flattered, sort of.
This must be very strange for you.
Ever since he came on board, I find myself thinking about the choice you and I made.
Me too.
Do me a favour. Be careful.
Will, I know you and he have had some problems.
That's not what I'm talking about. If he had gotten off the planet instead of me, don't you think he would have made the same choices that I made? I just don't want you to be hurt again.
Two pair.
Full boat, kings over. I'd like to thank you both for your very generous contributions.
Come in.
RIKER 2:I thought you'd be alone. Excuse me.
Why don't you join us?
The game is five card draw, no limit. Ante, please.
Lieutenant?
RIKER 2:Three. please.
Mister Worf?
Four.
Commander.
I'll play these.
Dealer takes two. You control the bet, Lieutenant.
RIKER 2:Fifty.
Fold.
Here's your fifty. And ten more.
RIKER 2:You didn't take any cards. You must be holding something. Why not make it a little sweeter?
No, thanks.
RIKER 2:Playing it safe?
You in?
I will call.
RIKER 2:Here's your ten, and it will cost you another one hundred.
I've practised in the mirror too long to be fooled by that face. You're bluffing. Here's your hundred and twenty more.
Dealer folds.
RIKER 2:I thought if one thing were clear by now, it's that you and I play things a little differently.
Why don't we wait and see who comes out on top.
RIKER 2:I thought you were willing to settle for second. Commander.
I've never settled for anything in my life. I know what I want, I know what I've got, and you'd be lucky to do as well. Lieutenant.
RIKER 2:Here's your twenty. Three hundred more.
Now I know you're bluffing.
RIKER 2:Are you in or not?
Why don't we get this over with? I'll call your three, and I'll raise you anything you've got left. Well?
RIKER 2:Take it. You always had the better hand, in everything.
Come in.
RIKER 2:Hi. I'm sorry to just stop by like this but there's something I'd like to talk to you about.
RIKER 2:Captain Picard made has some inquiries. He managed to get me a posting on the Gandhi. And considering how long I've been out of commission, it's an amazing opportunity.
When would you leave?
RIKER 2:In about a week.
I see.
RIKER 2:Deanna. After I've served for six months, I'm eligible to bring family aboard. If we got married
You said those exact words to me before you went to serve on the Potemkin.
RIKER 2:I know. I was just held up for a while.
But if you hadn't been, what would have happened between us?
RIKER 2:I wouldn't've made the mistake of leaving you. I know that much.
I don't know if I can believe that. It took me a long time to get over what happened between Commander Riker and me. I don't know that I want to put myself in that position again.
RIKER 2:I would never hurt you, Deanna.
It's not just that. I've worked hard to make a life for myself on the Enterprise. I'm happy here.
RIKER 2:If the situation were different, I'd stay. But I can't. Not while he's aboard.
I know.
RIKER 2:Are you saying it's over?
No. No. I just don't know if I'm ready to give up my life here. Maybe we both need some time.
RIKER 2:Goodnight.
Captain's log, supplemental. The third transport window has opened and the away team is making their final attempt at retrieving the database.
RIKER 2:Once we restore the servo link, you can shunt the database up to this console. Are you ready, Commander Data?
You're with me, Lieutenant.
RIKER 2:I thought Commander Data's expertise.
It doesn't take that much expertise to repair a servo link. You and I can handle it.
Lieutenant, I am curious about something. If you met a double of yourself, would you have difficulty interacting with him?
I think so.
Why?
I am not easy to get along with.
But Commander Riker and Lieutenant Riker are. Yet they seem to have trouble getting along with each another. I have found that humans value their uniqueness, that sense that they are different from every one else. The existence of a double would preclude that feeling. Could that be the source of the friction?
Or perhaps it is more a matter of seeing something in your double. Something you do not like in yourself.
RIKER 2:This is it. There's the core, over there.
You waiting for something?
RIKER 2:Your orders, sir. How would you like me to get over there, sir?
You've been down here dozens of times. I'm sure you know the best way.
RIKER 2:Yes, sir. I do.
RIKER 2:It's leaking ion radiation.
Why didn't you report this?
RIKER 2:It wasn't here before. This must have just happened recently. If we have to repair this conduit, we won't have time to access that computer core.
Scan it now.
RIKER 2:It's working. The radiation levels are dropping to normal.
Next time, don't give up so easily.
Hang on! Come on, grab on. Come on! Come on, climb! Come on!  I'm being pulled in.
RIKER 2:Let go! One of us has to get out of here.
Climb! Come on! Climb! Climb!
They have restored the servo link to the core. We can begin downloading the database.
Initiating data transfer.
Captain's log, stardate 46920.1. We have retrieved the database from Nervala station and are headed for our rendezvous with the Gandhi.
RIKER 2:Come in.
I hear the Gandhi's going on a terraforming mission to the Lagana Sector.
RIKER 2:That's right. It'll take us four months just to get there.
I won't be joining you.
RIKER 2:I guess I'm not surprised to hear that.
I'm just not ready to give up my life here. Not yet.
RIKER 2:Come in.
I'm sorry.
RIKER 2:It's all right.
I wanted to give you something.
My quarters are full of things that I suppose belong to both of us. The least I could do is give you this.
RIKER 2:Thanks.
Good luck, Will.
RIKER 2:I actually thought I might go with the name Thomas.
Your middle name.
I guess we really are different. I never really cared for that name.
RIKER 2:Well, I sort of like it. I guess I'd better get going.
RIKER 2:I waited a long time. I guess I can wait a little longer.  Take care of her.
Come on in.
Excellent. Exactly what I need. Ah, Mister Worf. And the good Doctor, bearing gifts.
Ale from Ennan Six. Your omelettes deserve no less.
This is not an efficient method for the preparation of sustenance.
No, you're right, Data. The ship's computer would be more efficient, but it wouldn't allow for the subtlety needed for great cooking. It would give you all of the ingredients in pre-determined measurements, but wouldn't allow for flair or individuality. And Data, as we both know, flair is what marks the difference between artistry and mere competence.
For much of the history of mankind, the breaking of bread was a symbol of friendship and community. Something we have gotten away from in the twenty-fourth century.
Ah, you have a practiced hand, Commander.
Yes, I have my father to thank.
Your father liked to cook?
No, he hated it. That's why he left the chore to me.
It is my understanding that in most human families, the woman shares in the cooking.
There were only the two of us. I never knew my mother. She died when I was very young.
Where did you get these eggs?
On our last stop.
At Starbase Seventy Three?
Yes.
What kind of eggs did you say these were?
Owon. For you, Data, something special. Don't be afraid. They won't bite you. And for you, Mister Worf.
A cook's only as good as his ingredients.
Delicious.
Number One.
Go ahead.
I would appreciate you joining me on the Bridge.
Right away, sir.
Number One, we've picked up an automated signal from a Federation shuttlecraft.
A shuttlecraft? How's that possible? I thought we were the only manned Federation vessel out here.
Apparently not.
What's a shuttlecraft doing out this far? Where's its mother ship?
Sensors indicate there is at least one life form on board the shuttle, sir. Humanoid.
Perhaps someone to answer your questions, Number One. Open hailing frequencies.
Communication is not possible, sir. The shuttle is without power.
Set course to intercept.
Estimate intercept in three minutes.
Captain's log, stardate 42679.2. While en route to the Endicor system, we have encountered a Federation shuttlecraft, which seems to have appeared out of nowhere. There are no indications of where it came from or how it got out here.
We are closing on shuttlecraft, sir.
Thank you, Lieutenant. On screen.
Magnify.
Prepare to lock on tractor beam.
Target vehicle. We will be within tractor beam range in two seconds.
Set automatic locking device. Alert Shuttlebay two.
Shuttlebay two, prepare for retrieval procedure.
Locking tractor beam.
Number One.
You're with me, Mister Worf.
Doctor Pulaski, you are needed in Shuttlebay two.
I've been monitoring. I'm on my way.
Engage secondary tractor beam.
It's a Federation shuttlecraft, all right.
Yet there are no Federation bases or vessels in this area.
NCC one seven zero one D USS Enterprise, shuttlecraft five.
NCC one seven zero one D USS Enterprise shuttlecraft five.
How is this possible?
Commander, come here!
Captain?
Yes, Number One.
Are you on the Bridge?
Where else would I be?
Well. right now I think you should be in Shuttlebay two.
Why? What is it?
This I think you should see for yourself. Bring Commander Data.
Condition?
The life signs are very confusing. His heartbeat is strong, but the pulse is off.
Is he injured?
There's no signs of trauma.
Why is he unconscious? What happened to him?
I can't say. The readings of his brain waves are very strange.
Strange? In what way? Non-human? Artificial?
No, neither. They're just out of phase.
Can you revive him?
I wouldn't even attempt it till we get him into Sickbay. Come on, let's get him back.
Counsellor?
I have never felt anything quite like this before, so it's difficult to put into words. That person is you.
No.
He is as much Jean-Luc Picard as the person I am standing next to. Beyond that, there is very little I can be sure of. I will have to wait until he regains consciousness before knowing more.
Data, I need to know what's on the shuttle's logs.
Yes, sir.
Captain, both primary and reserve power has been drained from the shuttle. I am going to have to connect to the Enterprise in order to activate the shuttle's systems.
Geordi
Report to Shuttlebay two immediately.
I'm on my way.
I'll be in Sickbay. Keep me informed.
Captain, seen this?
Looks like the damage caused by an antimatter explosion.
It must have been just out of range of the shuttlecraft.
Data, I need those logs. Counsellor.
We'll be on the Bridge. Lieutenant.
Resume course and speed. Scanners at maximum range.
Maximum range.
There you go. You should have power now.
What happened?
The polarity is not compatible.
That's not possible. The connection's idiot proof.
The power requirements of the shuttle do not match those of the Enterprise. We will need a variable phase inverter, to align the power from the Enterprise to the circuits of the shuttle.
Data, what do you think is going on here? I don't mean just with the shuttle, I mean everything.
I do not have enough information.
I'm just starting a complete medical work-up. His vital signs are distorted. Some of the indicators are totally depressed, others are fluctuating wildly. I can't explain any of it. But he is alive. The restraints are for his own protection.
Have you been able to determine why he's still unconscious?
No. but I have been able to rule out any head injury.
Wake him.
What happened?
Apparently, the normal stimulant had the opposite effect. I'll have to try something else.
All right, Data. I think I've got it now. That ought to give you something. Making this power adjustment is very tricky. By all rights, this connection should blow all the shuttle's circuits.
Perhaps you had better step out of the way.
All right, but remember, you're not indestructible yourself, you know.
Increase the power.
Powering up.
Adjust the invert two percent positive.
Two percent positive. It's the right decision, but it's having the opposite effect.
Yes.
I don't understand. I can't think of anything that would cause the circuit to change so radically.
Adjust the invert two percent negative.
Okay. Two percent negative. That's it. It shouldn't work, but it does. Hey, Data. Take a look at the stardate. 42679.5. Captain.
Go ahead.
Captain, we've been able to reactivate the shuttle, and the on-board clock indicates that the shuttle is
Six hours in front of us. Captain, do you read me? If the shuttle's from six hours into the future, then so is the other Captain Picard.
Captain's log, supplemental. Part of the mystery has been solved. The reason there are two number five shuttlecrafts is because one of them is from the future. Six hours, to be exact. And so, presumably, is the facsimile of me.
Try to wake him, again.
No!
It's a only a sedative.
I know what it is. Don't sedate him. Let him be. Please. Let him to remain conscious.
I have never seen anything like this. Are you all right?
I'm fine, Doctor. Save your ministrations for your patient. I want a staff meeting in five minutes. Doctor, I assume you will want to remain here.
Yes, I will monitor the conference from here.
Keep me informed of any changes, no matter how small.
Captain's log, supplemental. I've been informed that Mister Data has recovered the logs from the duplicate shuttlecraft. I am more than apprehensive to play back a log which will not be recorded for several hours.
Captain, we've retrieved all we are going to get from the shuttle logs, including the last visual records. Everything before that is just a jumble.
Show me.
The distortion is because we had to use a phase inverter to retrieve the logs. The quality will improve slightly.
According to the shuttle log, the Enterprise was destroyed three hours nineteen minutes from now.
Captain, we have a portion of the last log entry. It's audio only.
Captain's personal log, supplemental. I have just witnessed the total destruction of the USS Enterprise with a loss of all hands, save one. Me.
All attempts to obtain further information from the shuttle have failed.
Well, at least now we have something to go on.
I just don't understand how you could have ended up in a shuttlecraft while the Enterprise was being destroyed.
Nor I. The last thing you would do is leave the Bridge of the Enterprise during an emergency.
Yes. All right, let's proceed on the premise that what we have just seen happened, and that in less than four hours from now, the Enterprise will be destroyed, and somehow, although this is unfathomable, I and I alone escape. Discussion.
Our destination is the Endicor system. We're due to arrive in three days. The charts show nothing of consequence, certainly nothing to threaten the Enterprise, between here and there.
Sensors indicated no other vessels, Federation or otherwise, in this area.
Data?
I have nothing to offer. There is not enough information upon which to base a hypothesis.
Well, the shuttle apparently came from somewhere up ahead, so Rather than continuing on this course, maybe we should stop here and let whatever is out there come to us.
We may already be too late.
What are you saying? That stopping, turning right or left, or even reversing our course, would be pointless?
When we brought the shuttle and the other Picard on board, we committed to a sequence of events which may be unalterable.
Yes, this is not a rock on the trail which once seen can easily be avoided. This is much more complex.
There is the theory of the moebius. A twist in the fabric of space where time becomes a loop from which there is no escape.
So, when we reach that point, whatever happened will happen again. The Enterprise will be destroyed, the other Picard will be sent back to meet with us and we do it all over again. Sounds like someone's idea of hell to me.
Well, I know this much. We can't avoid the future.
Agreed. So let's continue on course. Somewhere out there something will happen. A decision will be made during the course of which, I will be separated from the Enterprise. At the time, the decision will seem to be correct, but it won't be. We have to anticipate and not make, not make the same mistake once. Something is waiting for us out there. Let's try and determine what it is, as quickly as possible.
Doctor?
I'm just beginning to realise just how much of the body is held together by its own internal clock. He was thrown out of time, which caused his body systems to change their rhythm. Now, slowly, as we get closer to the time he left, his internal body clock is realigning.
You're saying that when our time intersects with the time he left, in that instant he will function normally and, and there will be two of us.
Right now, that is my guess.
Doctor, I don't think that's possible.
I'm able to feel much more from him now, Captain. His emotions are still a jumble, but
Counsellor?
He desperately wants to leave this ship.
Captain's log, supplemental. We continue on course to Endicor. We are now less than two hours away from our rendezvous with ourselves.
Worf.
Maximum scan. Nothing unusual to report.
If this timetable is correct, we could get an indication of something very soon.
Bridge, this is Sickbay.
Yes, Doctor.
Captain, my patient is more coherent.
I'm on my way. You have the Bridge, Number One.
How is he?
His vital signs are more normal. Which is to say, more like ours. He is calmer.
He's aware of me.
Perhaps, in some fashion.
But he knows where he is, who's here with him.
I doubt it.
What went wrong? You know, don't you? What did you do? What happened? Why did you leave the ship? Don't turn away. Look at me. Picard! Look at me!
Captain, he doesn't understand you.
He knows I'm here.
Yes, but in a nightmare of disjointed images and half-heard voices. He's in another dimension, looking at us across a great chasm. And he's feeling remorse at what he has witnessed. He's afraid.
What is he afraid of? Damn you. Help me! Why did you leave the ship?
It's no use, Captain. He can't answer you.
When we get closer to his time, he may be able to.
Are you still convinced he's me?
Yes, but you're not convinced.
Not in the slightest. Except for his features, there is nothing about him that I find familiar. Counsellor, I want you to stay with him. He will be able to communicate with you before any on else.
I don't know how long anyone could take this kind of anxiety state. There has to be a breaking point.
I think he's handling it very well.
He has a lot of anger.
Yes, because of what he represents.
And what is that?
Doubt. He's afraid that seeing him here and knowing what happened to the Enterprise will make him timid, or worse, make him to hesitate.
Part of my job is to anticipate problems. My duty is to the Captain, but first to the ship and its crew.
Doctor, the Captain is quite capable of command decisions.
Yes, for now. But this situation has put him under extreme pressure of a unique and very personal kind. We both know that pressure will only increase. You said yourself that he already has doubt.
Which is understandable, and healthy.
And could be potentially paralysing. If we begin to see signs that he's acting in an irrational manner, I have the authority and the duty to relieve him.
I don't think that will be necessary.
I hope you're right.
What force or phenomenon could cause the shuttle to be thrown back in time?
None that we've encountered. In theory, accelerating beyond warp ten.
Using the gravitational pull of a star to slingshot back in time. Is that what happened here?
The shuttle doesn't have warp capability.
No. So some external force was needed.
We've never encountered a natural force that powerful. Why only six hours? Why not a day? Or a year?
Are you saying there was some conscious mind at work here?
There's no evidence either way.
The Traveller moved through time using the power of his mind.
I don't think that's the case here.
No. And Manheim's experiments with gravity and time were rudimentary, and uncontrollable.
Captain, I think this is one instance where you should suppress your natural tendencies.
Oh, really?
One of your strengths is your ability to evaluate the dynamics of a situation, and then take a definitive pre-emptive step, take charge. Now, you're frustrated because you not only can't see the solution, you can't even define the problem.
Go on.
What we're facing is neither a person nor a place. At least not yet. It's time.
You're saying I should just sit down, shut up and wait.
I wouldn't have put it exactly like that.
Not something I do easily.
Your Persian flaw.
Yes, perhaps it is.
Captain to the Bridge.
Report.
This energy vortex has just appeared beneath us. There was no warning.
Well, at least the waiting's over.
Captain's log, supplemental. We have apparently intersected with something.
It is similar to our tractor beam, sir, only much more powerful.
Bridge, this is Lieutenant La Forge.
Bridge.
The pull on the Enterprise is steady. I'm having to hold the warp engines at thirty percent in order to maintain our present position.
Transfer Engine control to the Bridge.
On my way, Captain.
Captain, there is a consciousness here. Not thought, more like instinct.
What do you think, Number One?
I think we're being probed.
The beam is coming from the centre of the vortex. Sensors show it to be only a mass of energy.
What is it trying to learn?
I think it's trying to determine if we are a life force.
We'll stay and investigate.
Agreed.
Unless that was the mistake. Staying too long.
Possibly.
We should go now.
Well
That would be the prudent move. I never thought I'd hear myself saying something like that.
Under the circumstances, sir, I think you're right.
But you would rather stay and find out what it is? What is its intent?
Engineering, transfer to Bridge.
Mister La Forge.
Sir.
Try and take us out of here. Maximum warp.
Aye, sir. I've set the velocity at warp nine.
Engage.
Warp engines are at ninety one percent.
Put it to the wall, Mister La Forge.
Aye, sir.
I can't hold it.
Captain, the engines can't handle the strain.
All stop.
Mister La Forge.
I'm re-engaging warp engines, Captain.
Status?
All decks have reported. No damage. No injuries.
Captain, the hold on the Enterprise is still very strong. I'm having to hold at warp seven just to maintain our position.
Everything we do tightens its grip. Let's see what we can learn. Launch a Class one probe.
Aye, sir.
Mister Worf
That was personal.
Captain, the power drain needed to hold this position is enormous.
How long can you maintain it?
Just a few minutes and then we're going to have to shut down again.
Captain some kind of energy
Just surrounded my patient.
Is he still alive?
Yes
Arm the photons, Mister Worf. Lock on the centre of the vortex.
Photon torpedoes locked on target.
Hold for my order.
Like a rag in a dog's mouth.
I am now at maximum warp.
It's you, Captain. It was the entire ship, but now it has focused its attention entirely on you.
Captain, I can't hold it any longer. If we don't shut down right now, we are going
Hold this position. Counsellor, if I were to leave the Enterprise, would its attention still be focused on me?
Yes. I think it would.
You'd never survive.
But in those few seconds, the Enterprise might break free. That's what he, that's what the other Picard must have thought.
Captain, where are you going?
You have the Bridge, Number One.
You're leaving the ship?
We may be on a road that has no turns.
He's very agitated.
P2:I must get to the shuttle.
I know. Do you know where you are?
P2:The Enterprise.
Yes, but you're only vaguely aware of it. And me? Do you know who I am? No, you don't, do you.
P2:I must go.
Release him.
Do you know what you are doing?
No. Release him.
Security to Sickbay.
No. Security, disregard that order, and clear all personnel, repeat, all personnel, from Shuttlebay two.
I don't want any distractions. You, stay here.
You made a decision to leave the ship?
P2:I must.
Why?
P2:The energy in the vortex wants me.
You're certain.
P2:Yes. It's an entity, a life form, which recognises the Enterprise as an entity with me as its brain. And it wants me.
P2:Shuttlebay two.
What's your other option?
P2:This is our only chance. If I leave, it may be distracted long enough for the Enterprise to escape.
You're wrong. If you leave, the Enterprise will be destroyed. Don't you remember? You saw it happen.
P2:If I don't leave the ship, then the Enterprise will be destroyed.
If that's true, then help me. We want the same thing. We both want the Enterprise to be safe. But there is a piece of information I don't have. What is it?
P2:It's me.
You?
Captain.
Yes.
We are about to lose warp drive.
Understood.
P2:Understood.
When you say it wants you, do you mean it's still you, only you, and not me.
P2:You're confusing me. We're almost out of time. I must get to the shuttle.
Wait. You can. I'll let you. But first, tell me. What is, what was your other choice?
P2:Stand aside.
You must tell me. What was it? You don't know what I'm talking about. You're locked into a single intent unable to change. Unable to alter any part of your previous actions.
P2:I have to leave. There's no other way.
There must be.
P2:One. But it would never work.
What is it? What would never work?
P2:I have to leave.
What was the other choice? We can't fight, we can't escape, we can't go forward.
P2:No. No, we can't go forward. That would destroy the Enterprise.
Was that it? Is that the other choice?
P2:I must leave.
No.  Captain Picard. I can not allow you to leave. Before we can go forward, the cycle must end.
Doctor Pulaski, report to Shuttlebay two.
Bridge.
Number One, we're wasting our energy trying to escape. It only weakens us. Helm, set a course for the center of the vortex. Mister La Forge, on my command, I want all the power you can muster.
Yes, sir.
We're going in?
Yes.
Course set, sir.
Now everyone hold their position. No matter what. Engage.
O'BRIEN:Captain Picard.
O'BRIEN:This is Shuttlebay two. The other Picard and the shuttle are gone.
Explain.
O'BRIEN:They just vanished.
What's our position?
We are back on course to Endicor.
Stand down from Red Alert.
All decks have reported in. No damage, no casualties.
You have the Bridge, Number One.
A lot of questions, Number One. Damn few answers.
Maybe none of it was real. Perhaps we were all part of a shared illusion.
Or maybe he was thrown back in time, so that we would be able to take another road. Make a different choice. Well, they say if you travel far enough you will eventually meet yourself. Having experienced that, Number One, it's not something I would care to repeat.
I'll be on the Bridge, sir.
Entering standard orbit now.
It takes very special people to live in such desolation.
Visionaries who don't see this planet as it is, but as it will be.
I've always wanted to see terraforming in operation.
Lieutenant Yar, hailing frequencies.
Hailing frequencies open, sir.
Velara Three base, this is Captain Picard of the starship Enterprise.
No malfunctioning equipment on either side, sir. They are receiving us.
Velara Three base, this is the Enterprise. Come in please. Over.
Maybe no one's home.
We are sensing life-forms, sir.
Velara Three base, do you copy?
Velara base to Enterprise. Yes, Captain, I'm Director Mandl. I'm sorry about the delay, but we weren't expecting visitors.
Terraform Command has asked us to see how you were getting along.
We were a little behind, but we're back on schedule. I'd like to hope we'd be allowed to maintain that schedule.
We alarm him for some reason.
Your staff is all well, I presume, Director?
Understandably tired. We're working very hard, Captain.
If there anything we can do to help? You and your staff are welcome aboard for a change of scene, rest.
We have some holodecks which you might enjoy.
No disrespect, sir, but we cannot afford the time.
Channel closed.
His fear is escalating.
If you will excuse me, sir, I really must get back to work.
I sense deliberate concealment, sir.
Of what?
I don't know, but it's intense.
Director Mandl, we've heard of your remarkable achievements in terraforming. My crew would very much appreciate looking around.
This is not really the best time. We are at a very critical phase just now.
We would require no special attention.
I'm trying not to be rude, sir, but this is really very inconvenient.
He is concealing something. It's more than just being too busy. Your announcement about coming down has sent him almost to a point of panic.
Well, whether he wants us or not.  Director Mandl, unless you're absolutely refusing permission for us to land at your station, prepare to receive our away team.
As you wish.
Counsellor, perhaps you'd better go along as well.
Aye, sir.
Someone that tense could be very unpredictable. Stay on your toes, Number One.
Welcome to Velara Three. Please. I want you to remember it as it is now, because in a couple of decades you won't recognise it. Luisa Kim. Gardener of Edens.
Commander William Riker, USS Enterprise. This is Counsellor Troi, Lieutenant Yar, Lieutenant La Forge, Lieutenant Commander Data.
Arthur Malencon, hydraulics specialist,  and Bjorn Benson, Chief Engineer.
An android?
And third in command of the Enterprise.
Where were you manufactured? Are there others like you?
Both matters are subjects of protracted discussion.
Remarkable. Excuse me.
We don't get many visitors. It's exciting to have you here.
We weren't sure how we would be received. Director Mandl was less than enthusiastic about our interest.
I should apologise for him. We are at a critical phase. Usually he's quite charming.
We'll try to stay out of the way. We've never seen a terraforming station, and we appreciate the opportunity.
How much do you know about the process?
Theories, reports, but nothing first-hand.
Oh, wonderful. Let me show you what we do. Newcomers find this
The other two are secretive, but she is as open as she appears.
What we're doing is so exciting, so inspiring. We take a lifeless planet and little by little transform it into an M class environment, capable of supporting life. Terraforming makes you feel a little god-like. The first phase involves selecting the planet. That's very important. It must have the right mass and gravity, the correct rate of rotation, and a balanced day and night. The planet must also be without life or the prospect of life developing naturally. The Federation determines if that's so. Then, we take over. This station is phase two. Phase Three involves water. Usually we create basins using hydraulic landscaping, but the water on this planet is subsurface, and extremely high in salt content. We are just about to begin pumping and filtering the water, removing the salt, oxygenating and replacing. Next, we introduce micro-organisms, and when the process is complete eventually, we'll have a lush, arable, biosphere.
You make it sound poetic.
I think it's the best job in the universe.
The efficiency of your hydraulic landscaping is quite elegant.
It isn't yet, but it will be. Right now I'm disturbed by erratic power surges in several of the servo-mechanisms that control the hydraulic probes.
Could it be the increased conductivity caused by the high saline content?
That was my first thought, but I
Arthur. The factors do not support that conclusion.
I'm Director Mandl, and I'm sorry about having been so abrupt during our initial contact. Being isolated, one tends to forget the social graces. Are you seeing everything that you want?
What you're doing here is miraculous.
What we are doing here is working a difficult and demanding timetable, and there will be no miracle unless Malencon here gets the hydraulic probes back on line. We are set to step up to full conversion immediately. Shouldn't you be in the hydraulic chamber, Arthur?
Now?
Yes.
All right, Kurt.
Geordi, this appears to be the master subsurface pump.
You're right. Very impressive.
This is interesting. The water table is a thin ribbon between the sandy surface layer and the rocks below.
And those two surfaces follow that contour so precisely, the water maintains a consistent depth between them.
Which would require extreme precision from the probe controls.
Here we have something which may be of interest to you. A vegetation graph. It is really the key centre for successful terraforming.
Incredible. It's planned month by month, decade by decade?
Every single thing is specific and exact. You see grand, romantic concepts. I see unyielding rock under an ocean of sand.
Commander!
What is it, Deanna?
Malencon. He's in trouble!
Help! Help! Argh!
Can you open it?
It's jammed.
First Officer:First Officer's log, stardate 41464.3. What began as a routine visit to a terraforming site has turned into something far more serious. Arthur Malencon, the hydraulics engineer, has been critically injured by a laser drill which appears to have malfunctioned.
Situation report, Number One.
For safety reasons, we're shutting off all power to the Hydraulics room before entering to recover the body. Then we'll beam him up to Sickbay, but from the look of his wounds, it's probably hopeless.
Keep me informed.
Data ?
Go ahead, Geordi.
All set.
Data, we have your section completely powered down now. Bensen has just locked the master servomotor drive system.
LAFORGE  So it should be safe in there now.
I'm going in.
I will go with you.
Transporter Room, this is Lieutenant Yar. Two to beam up to Sickbay.
I want to go. We should be with him. Kurt, please come too.
Transporter Room, this is Commander Riker. Beam up four at my co-ordinates.
Geordi, this is intriguing. I have seen malfunctions
But this is almost as if the laser drill seemed to operate itself with a will
Separate from it's control console.
I can't explain it.
The laser blasts seemed to end when the yelling stopped.
Maybe Arthur stopped it, only not in time.
Not possible.
Then what are you suggesting?
Uncertain. Geordi, please return power to the control console in this room. I wish to reactivate the programme.
You got it.
I am running the base drilling programme.
Geordi, servos off.
They are off.
Data, what's happening?
Too much to explain.
Can you open that? La Forge to Enterprise. We have a problem.
Be specific.
Data's in the hydraulics room alone, and we're hearing laser blasts.
Get him out of there!
It's not working again.
We've got to get this door open. Data! We can't get in! Data! Data! Data!
Away team, now. What is happening?
I'm going to beam him out of there.
Bridge, this is Lieutenant Commander Data. No need to beam me up, sir. The situation is under control.
Are you all right?
Yes.
What happened? Did you do anything which might have set it off?
No, but the firing programme was dynamic.
The firing programme? In what way?
It adjusted to my tactics. It tracked with me, anticipating. A fixed programme could not have done that.
Are you suggesting that someone was controlling the aiming and firing sequence?
That is exactly how it appeared. There was a mind working against me.
What did you do to this laser drill? A year's work destroyed!
I had no choice.
We were attempting to trace the source of the malfunction when it attacked me.
How much more of this useless fantasy must I listen to?
None at all, Mister Mandl. Until this is sorted out, I've provided temporary quarters for you and your staff. Perhaps you'd like to make use of them.
You're overstepping your authority, Picard. You have no right to interfere.
Mister Mandl, an attack on one of my crew gives me the right.
I have a schedule to meet.
Your schedule is on hold, until I have a satisfactory explanation of this. Director Mandl. Lieutenant Yar, would you escort the Director to his quarters.
Aye, sir.
Go on with your report.
It would appear the laser's drilling system was reprogrammed, sir. As soon as its memory bank received power, it turned itself on and went after me. Fortunately, I was able to cope with it.
And not by much, from what I saw.
I believe it was programmed to destroy any person moving in that room, sir.
Certainty? Or speculation?
Certainty.
That would have required the talents of a master programmer.
But it was done.
And so the question becomes not who, since it clearly was one of the three remaining terraformers. The question becomes why? What are they hiding? What could be so important that one or all of them, could be desperate enough to kill?
Shall I have them brought in, sir?
Not yet.
Malencon?
I couldn't save him. The injuries were too severe, the damage too extensive.
The entire Velara Three facility has been powered down, Captain.
We've just completed a remote power feed to the life support systems.
Good. Data, I want you and Geordi to return for more careful inspection.
What are we to look for, sir?
Evidence of tampering, negligence, sabotage, whatever. The answer's there, on the planet. Tasha, I want you to provide Counsellor Troi and me with complete personnel records on our three guests. Psych profiles, training, everything. I'm looking for motive, intent, the psychological capacity to commit one murder and to attempt another.
Aye, sir.
It seems we are becoming detectives, Number One.
Not much left of this drill.
Geordi, I need some visual assistance.
Whoa. What is it? Nothing but basic elements. Inorganic. No carbon. Sandy texture. Those flashes are almost musical. I see colour variations and rhythms in complex harmonies.
Speculation. Could it be alive?
How could it be alive? It's inorganic.
Whatever it is, it could be what they are covering up, and the reason someone killed Malencon.
Captain's log, supplemental. On my order, Data's startling discovery of a possible life form has been beamed aboard so that its true nature might be uncovered. But unlike life on Earth and elsewhere, it appears to be completely inorganic.
A test for inorganic life.
It's never been done, Doctor.
There are basic definitions for organic life. Must have the ability to assimilate, respirate, reproduce, grow and develop, move, secrete and excrete.
Would any of those apply here?
Perhaps growth and development.
Reproduction?
Yes. Those two may be basic for any definition of life, organic or inorganic.
Well, Doctor, you're charging unknown seas. How do we proceed?
As we're dealing with a fundamental question, let's use the basic scientific method. Observe, theorise and attempt to prove it. Activate. Let's be sure of what we're dealing with. Is the sample organic?
Negative carbon. Negative known life components. Substance inorganic.
Recheck analysis, please.
Rechecking. Analysis verified. Not organic.
Magnify to screen. Factor five. Hold surface. Factor ten.
What are we looking at?
It's really beautiful, whatever it is.
What's that hum?
It started after Doctor Crusher ordered the scanner to magnify.
Computer, de-magnify. Resume normal scan.
Everyone stand back.
It's us.
Yes, we're causing it. Why?
Unknown. But it is definitely reacting to our presence. Perhaps it is picking up the electrical impulse of our systems.
The flashes haven't changed. Could the hum be connected to the flashing?
Computer, magnify. What is the magnification?
Twenty five hundred diameters.
Analyse the pattern of the flashes.
Not repetitive or sequential. Pattern not recognised.
What is the source of the flashes?
Unable to specify. Theoretically not possible from this substance.
Disregard incongruity and theorise as to source.
Life.
What do you mean a life form?! What life form?! A Federation recon expedition certified Velara Three lifeless.
Understandable, given this particular life form's novel nature.
What is that nature?
Doctor Crusher is still making her determination. Mister Mandl, you know the Prime Directive.
Are you saying that I knowingly defied it?
That's what I have to find out. You're a man obsessed with what you do. Who knows what an obsessed man will do to keep going? Kill, perhaps?
I create life. I don't take it.
You hit him pretty hard, Captain.
What do you think, Counsellor?
It was useful. I felt two levels. He did know about the life form, but the idea of murder seemed to shock him. Whether it was the whole idea, or just being accused of it, I can't tell.
What about his file, Lieutenant Yar? Could he have accomplished the reprogramming that Data says took place?
Mandl holds advanced degrees in computer science as well as artificial intelligence. It's possible.
What about the others? Including the victim.
Only the victim had the required expertise. Malencon did work where the whatever it is was found. Trying to suppress that knowledge would be motive for murder, if Mandl were obsessed enough.
Terraformers are often obsessive. It frequently goes with the career profile.
How do you read the designer?
She's possessed of highly abstracted reality. Lovely visions, little data. You might do better than I.
It's not locked.
Mind a visitor?
Is it true? Did you really find a life form?
The debate is still going on in some quarters, but I think so, yes.
What's it like?
We have nothing we can compare it with. It's microscopic. It seems colonial, simple. But it's inorganic. Which is why the recon scouts missed it. It was not your mistake.
Everything I've worked so hard for is falling apart.
Luisa, it's very beautiful. I could arrange for you to see it if you like.
Perhaps later.
Captain, this is Doctor Crusher. I think you'd better come to the Medical Lab.
What is it?
Geordi observed movement.
Not movement exactly, but a definite shift in the energy pattern.
Without external influence.
The hum has gone too. Why?
Unknown, sir. Perhaps it is scanning us.
Scanning us? Why? What could it hope to learn?
Unknown at this time, sir.
It's changing.
I don't see anything.
The infrared range is increasing.
Warning. Input overload.
The hum is back.
It is projecting an energy field.
And it's intensifying!
Magnification deactivated.
Two of them!
Only life can replicate itself, Doctor. Inorganic or not, it is alive.
Activate quarantine field.  Quarantine field full. Full shield backup!
Evacuating lab.
Translation request being patched.
Translation? From whom?
Evacuate.
What's wrong on with the translator circuit?
Bridge, this is the Captain. Request emergency power to initiate lab quarantine seal.
Do it, Mister Worf.
Aye, sir.
What's the nature of the problem, Captain? We've lost visual.
We have confirmed that Data's discovery is life. But more than that, it is intelligent life.
How do you know, sir?
It's trying to communicate with us.
Captain's log, supplemental. The inorganic life form from Velara Three has apparently taken over our Medical Lab.
It generates enough energy to interfere with the surrounding systems.
Mister La Forge, can we see into the lab yet?
Negative, Captain. Reducing the backup to the quarantine seal might help.
Doctor?
I wouldn't.
Continue quarantine.
Aye, sir.
Director Mandl and the others are in the Observation Lounge as you requested.
Counsellor, I shall need you. You have the Bridge, Number One.
Director Mandl, I put it to you again. What do you know about these life forms?
Not a thing.
Enough! Sit down, Lieutenant. You are deliberately evasive and it must stop. You have kept information from me since our first communication. An alien life form has taken possession of my Medical Lab. You knew of its existence.
Yes.
Is this true? You knew there was life on Velara Three?
I knew that there were random energy patterns, yes, I knew that. But not life. Not by any definition I have ever heard.
But you tried to keep that knowledge from us.
No! They are meaningless silicon crystals, which rebroadcast sunlight.
It is a life form and it has intelligence.
Why do you say that?
It's trying to communicate with us.
Communicate with you?
When did you first become aware of them?
Tell them about the pattern in the sand.
Oh, yes. Do tell us.
When we first arrived, we noticed that in certain areas the sand had a sparkling effect, like sunlight bouncing off new fallen snow.
What did you think it was?
Honestly, we did not give it any thought.
Picard, I must point out again that we were assured, not once but many times, by the best scientific minds in the Federation, that this planet has no life. No life! And we were not looking, and therefore we did not see.
All right. At first you dismissed it. But then you began to understand that there was something that was different about them.
You can't know that.
Your apprehension suggested it, when we first arrived. Tell me about these patterns.
At first we thought it was just a natural phenomenon unique to Velara Three.
Refraction and a thin atmosphere is interesting, but certainly not life.
Why was I never told about this?
Because it's not particularly important.
As the building of the terraforming station went forward, the patterns in the sand ceased being random and became very specific. Geometric shapes suddenly appearing, disappearing, changing location, changing size.
Did you ever feel that these patterns were attempting to communicate?
No, never.
Bensen?
I don't know. At the time, I didn't think so. But now, after hearing what you just said. Now, I don't know.
Captain, we've regained magnification of the life form. It's divided again.
Patch visual to Observation lounge.
There was no indication of any of this on Velara Three.
Absolutely none.
I cannot understand the patterns.
Neither can I.
Please show me the spectral analysis magnification twelve K.
Silicon. Germanium.
Transistor material.
Gallium arsenide.
Emits light when charged.
Cadmium selenide sulfide.
Emits charge when lit.
Water, impurities, sodium salts.
Conductor. But is it alive?!
Probability positive.
I wasn't asking you.
Engineering to Bridge.
This is Commander Riker, go ahead.
The backup on the lab seal is fluctuating, sir. I think you should come down here.
On my way. Data, you've got the Bridge. Inform the Captain.
Status, Ensign?
The quarantine seal is getting weaker. Every time I try to redirect backup it goes somewhere else. I think I've. No, it's locked three people in a turbolift and two more in the programmers' rest room.
If that reading is right, there is no seal. Give me lab interior image.
Yes, sir.
Magnify.
Picard, this is Riker.
We see it too, Number One.
Get that seal back up.
Sir, no matter what I do, the energy goes somewhere else. What if it hits the Sickbay, or nursery?
Hold off. Impossible, Captain.
We haven't got the power.
Captain's log, supplemental. The life form, which has significantly increased in size, is again attempting to communicate with us.
The Universal Translator is coming on line, sir.
Ugly, ugly giants bags of mostly water
Bags of mostly water?
An accurate description of humans, sir. You are over ninety per cent water surrounded by a flexible container.
Life force, do you understand us?
We understand. We ask you that you be gone. We call. We talk. You not listen.
We didn't hear you. We come in peace.
Ugly bags of mostly water, we try at peace. You still do not listen. Bags who drill in sands of home have to die.
It killed Malencon.
We see and hear you now. We didn't know you were there. You are beautiful to us. All life is beautiful.
Bag in dome did know. Caused much death. Made us kill. War is now with you.
The translator is now offline, sir.
Can you hear us now?  Mister La Forge?
Restabilising, Captain.
Sir, that chaos when we were studying it in the lab must have been the energy surge of a reproductive cycle. It is now a colony of single cells which organize as a computer. And like any computer
More is stronger.
Captain's log, supplemental. We have regained visual contact with the lab, but our attempts to restore communication with this microbrain, as we have come to call it, has been unsuccessful. One thing that is certain, however. This life form has declared war on us.
Their range of influence appears to be concentrated in the Medical Lab, Captain.
All non-essential personnel have been moved to the most distant areas of the ship, sir.
Data, any analysis of those bolts of light it emits?
That seems to be it's method of reprogramming, Captain. Each bolt of light consists of negatively and positively charged ions. A series of programme instructions, as it were. It seems to have a quicker rapport with our computers than we have.
What do you expect? It is computer.
Have we disabled the Medical Lab computer console?
Aye, sir. As soon as Data determined the microbrain's method of operation.
Captain, picking up a decrease in infra-red intensity.
Maybe the life-form has reached its energy level.
Or maybe that's not the end of it. With single-celled life forms, at least organic ones, cell division is preceded by a resting state.
The calm before the storm?
Medical Lab on main viewer. Let's use this calm.
It does seem dormant, Captain.
Tasha, set coordinates to beam it back where it came from.
Coordinates set, sir.
Energise.
Transporter power being redirected, sir. We are unable to affect it.
Life form or not, intelligent or not , the safety of this ship and everyone aboard her is my primary responsibility. Data, evacuate all the air from the Medical Lab. I want a vacuum there.
Environmental systems fail to respond to command, Captain. It appears the microbrain has successfully interfaced with our computers.
Picard, if it did try to communicate with us, we didn't understand that.
It has declared a state of war and we are on the defensive. We have no control over our Medical Lab nor our computer. At this moment it has the power to destroy this ship and everybody on it. I need your help.
Unbelievable.
It said you killed some of them. I need to know how.
I don't know.
What was Malencon doing when he was killed?
There is a very thin layer of highly saline water under the sandy top soil. He was siphoning that off.
Perhaps somehow that saline water sustained them.
It connected them.
I don't understand.
The microbrains may be like our own brain cells. Individually, a cell has life but not intelligence. Yet when interconnected, their combined intelligence is formidable.
The saline fluid is their circuitry, and to prevent its loss, they killed Malencon.
If we had continued to remove that water, we would have destroyed them all.
Reason enough for anyone to go to war.
Captain, it's happening again. I think you'd better get in here.
If this keeps up, it will tear up the Enterprise.
What can you determine, Mister La Forge?
Captain, our sensors indicate that the microbrain expends a tremendous amount of energy during its reproductive cycle. Yet there is no discernible power drain on our own systems.
Then what is feeding the damn thing?
We found traces of cadmium salts. Now, cadmium is a conduit for converting infra-red into electricity.
Meaning?
Meaning the microbrains might be photoelectric.
Kill the lights in the medical lab, Mister La Forge. Let's see if darkness will neutralise it.
Sorry, sir, it still has control of the computer. We can't do it by remote.
Number One, light.
The life form must have evolved at that narrow layer where the light got through the sand to the water. Drop the water a centimetre below the light penetration level, and they starve.
Killing lab lights now.
It's slowing down.
It's getting dimmer, too.
More light please.
Only if you will talk to us.
We die. Bags of water kill us. You are like others.
We have no wish to kill you. We never have.
You do not say truth.
We will end this war, if you will end the war.
Darkness. Death. Terrible. Must go home to wet sand. War over.
Agreed. We will send you home to your wet sand. Picard to Riker. Bring up the lights in the lab, just a bit.  Are you better?
Better.
We mean you no harm. Do you believe me?
Yes.
Good. It is important that you trust us.
Not yet. You are still too arrogant. Too primitive. Come back three centuries. Perhaps then we trust.
We understand what you are saying. We will leave you. We will send you home.
Riker to Transporter Chief. Pick up the coordinates of the bell jar in the Medical Lab for return to Velara Three.
Coordinates entered, sir.
Riker to Bridge. Captain, we're ready to beam it back to the planet.
I wish we were able to learn more about them, sir.
In time, Mister Data. When we're better prepared.
I wanted to create a place where living things could thrive, and all the while I was about to destroy the life that is there.
Our apologies.
And respects. Lieutenant Yar.
Co-ordinates set, sir.
Energise.
Captain's log, stardate 41464.8. I have declared an indefinite quarantine for Velara Three, and we are now returning to Starbase with the three surviving terraformers. Perhaps the lesson we have learned from this near tragedy will prevent it from happening elsewhere.
Report.
There's an object of some kind closing in on our position.
On screen.
It appears to be an unmanned probe approximately one half metre in diameter. There are no identifiable armaments.
Captain, we are being, You are being hailed, by name.
Open a channel. This is Captain Jean-Luc Picard
Captain, I am reading a power surge.
Shields up.
The beam appears to contain holographic imaging information.
It's trying to project something.
Isolate the bandwidth. Let the signal through the shields.
Bok!
I trust you remember me, Picard, because I haven't forgotten you or how you murdered my son. For fifteen years now I've thought about how to avenge his death but nothing I could do to you could equal what you did to me, until now. You thought you could hide him from me, didn't you? But I found out about him. Jason Vigo is as good as dead. I'm going to kill your son, Picard, just like you killed mine.
Mister Worf, put a tractor beam on that probe. Determine if it's safe to beam it aboard. I want to know where it came from. Mister Data, see if there is any mention of a Jason Vigo in Federation records. You might start with Miranda Vigo. She was born on New Gaul about fifty years ago.
Aye, sir.
Number One, contact the Ferengi Government. Find out all you can about Bok. He was wearing a DaiMon's uniform. If he's regained his rank, I want to know why.
Come.
The Ferengi Government is debating an amendment to the Rules of Acquisition. It could be a while before we hear from them. Data found out that the woman you mentioned has a son named Jason. This is the most recent picture we could find.
How old is the boy now?
Twenty three. He and his mother left Earth twelve years ago. They settled on Camor Five. That's all we know. The planet's records are virtually non-existent.
Picard to Bridge. Set a course for the Camor system, warp five.
Aye, sir.
Will, I do appreciate your not asking, but I do think that you have a right to know. There is a possibility that the boy is my son. I was involved with his mother for a short time about twenty four years ago. We met through a friend when I was on shore leave on Earth. It was all very romantic, very intense, probably because we both knew I would be leaving in two weeks. And we kept in touch for a while, but we never managed to get together again.
She never said anything to you about being pregnant?
No, so either Bok is wrong and I'm not the father, or Miranda decided to raise the child alone, which quite frankly wouldn't surprise me. She was very independent, very strong willed.
She would have to be to get by on Camor Five.
But whether he's my son or not, he's in danger. Bok tried to kill me six years ago, and I don't doubt he will try to make good his threat against the boy.
Anything?
There are no Ferengi vessels within range of our scanners.
Captain, I am unable to find any information on Jason Vigo's current whereabouts.
What about his mother?
No, sir.
Miranda was trained as a botanist. She always used to talk about running a farm one day. Maybe we should concentrate on the agricultural areas.
That would significantly narrow our search. The only cultivated land is on the southern continent, and there are relatively few people engaged in agricultural activities.
There cannot be many non-Camorites among them. Scan for human life signs.
I am detecting eight humans. Three are female. However, they are all too young to be Miranda Vigo.
What about males?
One is an infant. Another is elderly. Two are middle aged.
That's seven. You said there were eight.
I am having difficulty getting a clear reading on the eighth. The individual appears to be approximately two kilometres beneath the planet's surface.
Male or female?
Male, between twenty and thirty years old.
No one in their right mind would go that far underground alone.
Unless he were forced to.
Captain, I am reading seismic instability in the area. He is in danger.
Relay his coordinates to the transporter room. Have them beam him aboard.
Aye, sir.
What the? This is a Federation ship.
That's right. I'm Captain Picard. Jean-Luc Picard.
I realise I wasn't supposed to be spelunking that cave, but don't you have something better to do?
We thought you were at risk.
Oh. Well, I wasn't, so maybe you should just beam me back where I was?
Are you Jason Vigo?
I, er, I know him. Is he in trouble?
In a manner of speaking. Someone has made a threat against his life. Jason, I'm an old friend of your mother's. I'm here because you're in danger.
Why would anybody want to kill me?
The person who has made the threat is under the impression that you are my son.
Am I?
I don't know.
My mother never told me who my father was. Just that he was in Starfleet.
Maybe we should contact her.
She died a few years ago.
Oh, I'm sorry. Jason, I think it's important that we find out one way or another. Would you be willing to permit a genetic test?
If I'm not your son, is this person still going to want to kill me?
I doubt it.
In that case, you won't mind my saying that I hope you're not my father.
What were you doing in the caves, Jason? Are you a seismologist?
No, I just enjoy climbing.
Without an antigrav harness?
No, they get in the way.
So, what do you do?
I'm between jobs right now.
I see.
Excuse me, gentlemen, the test results are ready if you'd like to hear them. Your genetic code is a cross between the DNA of your mother, Miranda Vigo, and your father Jean-Luc Picard.
What's all this?
Oh, theses are archaeological fragments that I've collected over the years. This is a Silvan glyph stone. And this, this is a Gorlan prayer stick. It's really quite rare.
Is it valuable?
Not really. Only to students of archaeology such as myself. Though I did have to hand over a bottle of very old Saurian brandy for it.
I'd say you got taken.
Perhaps, but it's of value to me nonetheless.
On Camor, something has value if you can eat it or sell it. Everything else is luxury.
Would you like some tea?
No. Thanks.
Something else?
No.
Tea, Earl Grey, hot. I'm sure this whole thing is as much a surprise to you as it is to me. I really want to be honest with you, Jason. I only knew your mother for a very short time. I would have liked to have known her better. It just didn't work out that way. You look a lot like her, you know. It's the eyes, I think. I would like to make one thing clear, Jason. Your mother never told me about you. If she had, I would have been part of your life.
Maybe that's not what she wanted. I think I'd like to go back to the surface now.
I think it would be better if you stayed on board the Enterprise until we have resolved this situation with Bok.
What is the situation with Bok, anyway? Why does he want me dead?
Years ago, I was forced to destroy a starship commanded by his son. Bok apparently feels that it would be fitting vengeance to kill my son.
I can't hide forever.
Of course not. We are trying to locate Bok now. I want to confront him, settle this matter.
How long is this going to take?
I assure you there is no one more eager to put this behind us than I am.
Where do I stay?
We'll get you some quarters.
Okay. Let's go.
Jason. Your being here? I hope it will give us the chance to get to know each other.
We managed to shut down the probe's power systems so we could beam it aboard. It's not going to be easy to figure out where this thing came from.
Bok took the precaution of encrypting the probe's navigational systems so that we would be unable to decipher its flight path.
We ran an analysis of the probe's hull. From the energy signatures and particle deposits we found, it looks like it travelled through a dichromic nebula, was exposed to an intensive gravimetric distortion, and passed within one light year of a class four pulsar.
Those phenomena are relatively common. We would need to identify at least one of them specifically in order to postulate a flight path.
Understood.
Captain, incoming message from DaiMon Birta.
Put it on screen. Thank you for taking the time to talk to us, DaiMon.
I understand you have a problem.
Yes, it concerns DaiMon Bok.
Bok is no DaiMon. He was relieved of command six years ago. He was unstable, dangerous. We had to confine him to Rog Prison.
But he's no longer there?
He was able to buy himself out about two years ago.
I see. Do you know his whereabouts now?
I understand he was seen in the Dorias cluster not too long ago.
But that cluster consists of more than twenty star systems.
You don't have to thank me, Captain.
Believe it or not, Captain, that might've given us the fix we needed. There's a nebula in the Dorias cluster that matches the same particle signature we found on the probe.
There is a class four pulsar three light years from the nebula. My calculations indicate the probe was launched in the Xendi Kabu system.
Plot a course. Take us out of orbit.
Jean-Luc, come in.
I think I need to talk to a parent.
So, what's he like?
I'm not sure that I can tell you. He puts up so many barriers I have no idea what's underneath.
Keep in mind he's had twenty years to be angry that his father wasn't there. It's going to take some time to get over those feelings. But I do think it's possible.
Perhaps. But surely it would be wrong to force the issue. My sense is that he's a very independent young man. Perhaps it would be best if I left him alone. Let him come to me if he wants to.
Maybe you're right. But I think you should consider this. Are you doing the best thing for Jason or what's easiest for you?
Yeah?
Hello, Jason. I'm Deanna Troi, Ship's Counsellor.
Come in. Did Captain Picard ask you to come talk to me?
No, I just thought I'd come and see how you were doing. A lot's happened in the last few hours. I thought you might like to talk about it.
I'll be all right. People have wanted to kill me before.
But you've never met your father before.
And I have to admit I never thought I would.
It must be somewhat overwhelming.
I'm a little shaky.
Well, that's only natural.
But you know what? I feel better already just talking to you.
So, how did you feel about the Captain, about your father?
He's okay. A little stiff. But where are you from?
I was born on Betazed.
Do all the women there have eyes like yours?
Look Jason, I came here to talk to you because I'm the Ship's Counsellor. If you don't want to talk to me in that way, then I think I should go.
Fine.
You're welcome to make an appointment to come by my office.
Maybe I'll do just that.
Picard, can you hear me?
I will kill him, Picard. And there's nothing you can do about it.
Security to Captain's quarters immediately.
Our shields were up. How could he have beamed through them?
I'm not sure he did. Sensors don't show any sign of an intruder.
Could it have been another hologram?
I don't think so, Captain. Something has to generate a hologram. We would have detected it.
Bok once used a mind control device to make me hallucinate.
That device emitted a very specific energy signature. I'm not reading anything like that.
Could he have modified the device so he could use it without being detected?
It's possible. I'll recalibrate the sensors to scan for low intensity transmissions. Just to be sure, I'll sweep your quarters with a resonance scanner.
Good. Keep me posted.
Mister Worf, I want you to assign a security detail to Jason.
And what about yourself?
I am not the target of Bok's threats. Jason is.
Captain, I have compiled all available records pertaining to Jason Vigo's criminal record, and
Criminal record?
Yes, sir. He has been charged three times with petty theft, twice for disorderly conduct, and several dozen times for trespassing.
Trespassing?
I believe the charges relate to his climbing activities in the caves underneath the planet's surface. This is the information you requested, is it not?
Thank you, Mister Data.
What was your name again?
Lieutenant Rhodes.
Actually, I meant your first name.
Sandra.
Well, Sandra, do you think you could give me some room?
We're supposed to be keeping an eye on you.
Can't you can keep an eye on me from over there?
Good morning.
I thought you said your ship was the safest place I could be. Why the guards?
Because Bok appeared in my quarters last night. Now, it might not have been him. It may have been an image. We're investigating.
Look, why don't you just drop me off somewhere. I can watch out for myself.
That wouldn't be wise.
I've been doing it since I was fifteen.
I'm sure you have, but Bok is a dangerous creature. He has a starship, he has technology.
All right, all right. I'll stay here.
You seem to like rock climbing. The holodeck can create some very challenging climbs. We could go down together and I could show you how to use the programme.
Thanks, but I think I can figure it out myself.
Perhaps we could climb together. I'm probably not as skilled as you, but I'm not inexperienced.
Look, I'm sorry. I appreciate what you're trying to do. But Captain. Captain, father, Jean-Luc, I don't know what I'm supposed to call you. As soon as this thing with Bok is over, I'm leaving. So don't you see? There really isn't any point in our getting acquainted. Let me know as soon as you catch him, all right?
Captain's log, stardate 47829.1. We've been in the Xendi Kabu system for over three hours, and still no sign of Bok.
Captain, I am detecting an object five thousand kilometres off our starboard bow. It is another probe.
Why didn't we detect it before?
It must have been cloaked, sir. It came out of nowhere.
On screen. Is it another holographic device?
I do not believe so, sir.
Captain, the probe's systems are overloading.
Red alert. Shields up!
Damage report.
No damage, sir.
Captain, I do not believe it was meant as an attack, but rather as a message.
A message?
Yes, sir, in B'zal, a Ferengi code which uses an alternating pattern of light and darkness.
Can you translate it?
I am attempting to do so. The message reads, my revenge is at hand.
He's proved that he can get to us whenever he wants. Why doesn't he do something?
Tea, Earl Grey, hot.
If you want me to stay and talk, you'd better not call for security this time. How do you like your boy, Captain? Is he everything you'd always hoped for?
It's a risky game you're playing, coming here. Next time we'll be ready for you. Why don't we settle this now?
Oh, and how do you propose to do that, Picard? You murdered my son.
It was self-defence. He fired on my ship.
You were in Ferengi space!
I didn't know that. If he'd told me I would have withdrawn. I'm sorry, but there's nothing I can do to bring him back.
How touching. Your apology is worthless to me. I demand that you repay me for my loss.
You cannot put a price on a life.
Oh, but you can, Picard. You can pay me with your son's life.
No.
You don't have any choice. I insist on being paid.
That should do it. Let's run a level three bioscan just to be sure.
Rhodes to Sickbay, Medical emergency, deck nine, section four.
Let's go.
Have you had any other seizures like this before?
No, not really. Sometimes my hand shakes, but never this bad.
When did it first start to happen?
About few months ago. Do you have any idea what's wrong with me?
You have a condition called the Forrester Trent syndrome. It's a degenerative neurological disorder. Very rare.
What do you mean degenerative?
If it goes untreated, it could result in paralysis, even death. I'm going to start you on a neuro-stabilisation regimen. If we're lucky, it will halt the degeneration, and maybe reverse its effects. The disease is hereditary. I know your father doesn't have it. Was your mother prone to these seizures?
Not that I know of.
There have been some cases reported where the disease was instigated by a random mutation. I'll run a microcellular scan and see if that's what happened. In the meantime, I want you to try to take it easy and get some rest.
Is he going to be all right?
I wish I could say for certain, but I'm not sure how he'll respond to treatments.
I've been thinking about what you said the other day, and you know, I think you were right. I had convinced myself that Jason didn't want me to reach out to him.
You know, I don't think anyone is born knowing how to be a parent. You just sort of figure it out as you go. But the one quality that tends to be a requirement for parenthood is patience.
Well, I'm not sure that that is going to be enough. I've found out that Jason has a criminal record. It's nothing very serious, it's only petty theft and so forth, but I can't help feeling that if I had been part of his life then he wouldn't be so troubled now.
Maybe, but why waste time blaming yourself for not having been there? Just be here for him now.
And be patient.
And be patient.
We think we've found something, Captain.
Bok was in direct contact with this chair for an extended period. It is showing a distinctive subspace signature as a result.
We think he's using some sort of subspace transporter to beam aboard the Enterprise.
My understanding is that such devices were impractical.
The Federation abandoned its research in the field because the technology was found to be unreliable, as well as energy intensive.
In order to transport matter through subspace, you have to put it into a state of quantum flux. It's very unstable.
What range would that kind of transporter have?
In theory it could operate over several light years.
That means that the probe that exploded could have been beamed into position from some point outside sensor range.
If Bok uses his transporter again, we might be able to trace the subspace signature and locate his ship.
Is there any way we can keep Bok from beaming aboard the Enterprise again?
I don't think there is.
If he has the ability to beam aboard, he may be able to beam someone away.
It is a possibility.
I'm concerned that he may try to take Jason. Is there any way we can protect him?
You know, we might be able to keep a signal lock on him at all times. If Bok tries to beam him away, we might be able to hold him here.
In order to do so, we would need to tie the ship's subspace field coils into the transporter system.
Make it so. Computer, where is Jason Vigo?
Jason Vigo is in holodeck four.
Would you wait outside?
Not bad.
I like climbing. There's something about actually having your fate in your own hands.
Yeah, I know.
It looks as though we may have found out how to locate Bok's ship. This could all soon be over.
You came all the way up here just to tell me that?
I thought it would make you feel better.
Thanks. That was nice of you.
Jason, when your mother and I parted, I lost track of her completely. But I would like to know more about what happened to her, if you wouldn't mind telling me.
Like what?
Well, how did you end up on Camor? It's an unlikely place for a woman and child.
Well, you know how she was. See a stray cat, take it in. See somebody cold, give them your coat.
Yes, that was Miranda, all right.
She heard about the all children on Camor who'd been orphaned from the Cardassian war.
Oh. I see.
I was only ten when we went there. I remember her telling me all about the boys and girls who didn't have anybody to take care of them. So she got this big house, practically falling apart, then she started rounding up children. Eventually, there were over forty of us there. She called it a school. You know, she got up before dawn every day and went to bed well after midnight. In between she never stopped working. She taught us all how to read. And she grew vegetables in hardpan to feed us. And she made sure we knew how to sing. It's important in a place like Camor. And then one day she was attacked by two men in the street in broad daylight for the food she was carrying. If she'd just given it to them, they probably wouldn't have hurt her. But she knew how important the food was to us. So they killed her.
I'm so sorry.
Don't be sorry for me. My mother made sure that we were all tough enough to make it.
Jason, isn't there some way that I can be a father to you? My own father and I were estranged. He wanted me to stay home and tend the vineyards and I wanted to join Starfleet. And he died before we could come to terms with that. And I've regretted that all of my life. I don't want the same thing to happen to you and me.
You don't understand. I'm not anybody you'd want for a son. Trust me, if you knew anything about me, you wouldn't be trying so hard.
You're so wrong.
Oh, really? Let me spell it out for you. I've been in trouble since I was a teenager. I lie, I steal, I use people. I'm a criminal. That's what your son is.
I know.
You do?
Oh, yes, I know all about your troubles with the Camor authorities.
You do.
It doesn't make any difference, Jason. You're still my son. And, like it or not, I'm your father. I don't know what that means, but it means something. There's some connection.
Yeah.
But one thing is clear. You'll never look at your hairline again in the same way.
You wanted to see me.
Yes. It's about Jason. I've finished the microcellular scan I was running. There's something you need to know,
Sir, sensors are detecting a subspace carrier wave headed for the ship. Its signature is consistent with Bok's transporter.
See if you can trace and locate Bok's ship. Geordi, are you ready down there?
I've got a signal lock on Jason.
Riker to Picard.
Picard here.
Bok is trying to use his transporter.
The transporter beam is focusing on deck nine, section four.
Jason's quarters.
I'm on it, Commander.
Security to Bridge. Bok is
Beaming Jason off the ship.
Initiating transport now. I'm losing his signal.
Bok is re-establishing his lock on him.
Have you been able to locate Bok's ship?
No, sir. The subspace signature left by his transporter is decaying more rapidly than predicted. It may not be possible to trace it.
Captain, another probe has materialised five hundred kilometres to starboard. It is sending a transmission.
Put it on screen.
This is a very special day, Picard. Fifteen years ago you took my son away from me. Today, I will take your son away from you. It will be our anniversary. I wanted you to see him one last time.
I am tracing the transporter beam Bok used to send the probe. The ship is holding position approximately three hundred billion kilometres from here.
Plot a course. Maximum warp.
Even at warp nine we wouldn't get there for another twenty minutes.
The modifications you made to the transporter. Is there any way we could use a subspace transport from here to get me onto Bok's ship?
It may be possible, sir, but it would not be advisable.
I'll take that as a yes. You're with me.
There. I've aligned the field coils.
Phase dampers are in synch. Standing by to modulate the transport pattern.
Captain, we might be able to get you over there, but I don't see how we're going to get you back.
We'll deal with that when the time comes.
Transport's going to take longer than normal. We have to shunt your pattern through the subspace field coils.
Understood.
Initiating transport sequence now.
Maybe we can make a deal.
What kind of deal?
Tell my father you killed me. Put a phaser burn on my shirt and send it to him. He'll think I'm dead. That's what this is about, isn't it? I got friends on Camor Five that will make it worth your while.
I understand your desire to live, but I want Picard to see your body so there will be no doubt.
Lower your weapons or Bok is dead.
Lower yours or your son dies.
You know as well as I do, Bok, he's not my son. I know what you've done. Miranda Vigo is his mother but I am not his father. You made it appear so because you resequenced his DNA. But your technique was flawed. He developed a neurological disorder. When my ship's Doctor investigated it, she discovered what you had done.
Now he'll never pay the ransom.
Shut up.
There never was a ransom. All he was ever interested in was vengeance.
DaiMon, is this true?
He's not a DaiMon. He was stripped of command.
They had no right to do that to me.
He lied to you so that you would help him in his plan. The Enterprise is closing in on your position. If you let the two of us go, they won't attack you.
They won't attack us with you on board.
They will cripple your vessel and keep you here until the Ferengi authorities arrive. You've got a lot deal of explaining to do. Your only hope is to turn Bok over to them and tell them that he deceived you.
There is no profit in this for us.
Captain's log, stardate 47831.8. At Jason's request, the Enterprise has returned to Camor Five.
Doctor Crusher feels I'm responding well to the treatment. She thinks that the damage may be completely reversed.
I'm glad to hear it.
Yeah.
Are you sure that you wouldn't like to stay on board the Enterprise for a few more days?
I can't. I have a life back on Camor. It's a mess, but I'd like to go back and straighten things out.
I understand.
Well, maybe next time you come back this way, you can look me up.
I will. I put a little something into your bag while you were packing.  I know you'd probably have preferred a bottle of Saurian brandy, but that's all I could come up with.
I can't accept this.
I want you to have it.
Energise.
Captain, Starfleet Academy is requesting an update on our estimated arrival.
Mister Data?
We should be arriving at Earth in ten hours sixteen minutes, sir.
Please inform the Academy, Mister Worf, and send my regards to Superintendant Brand.
Aye, sir.
Do you know Admiral Brand?
We've met a few times. She's a formidable woman.
Sounds like my superintendent. When I was at the Academy, we had a Vulcan Superintendent who had memorised the personnel files of every single cadet. He knew everything about them. It was like having your parents around all the time.
My superintendent was a Betazoid, a full telepath. When he sent for you to his office, he didn't have to ask what you'd done.
You got called into the superintendent's office? That's a story I'd like to hear.
Sir, we are being hailed again by the Academy. It is Admiral Brand.
On screen.
Sir, she is requesting a private channel.
In my Ready room.
Admiral Brand. What can I do for you?
Hello, Captain. I know you're a close friend of the Crusher family.
Yes.
I wanted to inform you personally. There's been an accident.
He had second degree burns on his chest and multiple fractures of his right arm, but he's going to be fine.
Have they completed the regeneration series?
I'm not certain.
Wesley's allergic to metorapan treatments. I think they'll have to use a bicaridine substitute. I should send his complete records to the Academy infirmary. Of course, they probably have them already, but you can't be too sure.
Beverly. He's fine.
I know he's fine. I know he's fine. How did it happen?
Apparently, his squadron was practicing on the Academy flight range near Saturn. they were flying a close formation. There was a collision. All five ships were destroyed. Four of the cadets managed to transport out. One didn't make it.
Do you know who it was?
Yes. His name was Joshua Albert.
Wesley spoke of him. They were friends. Wesley was so excited to make the flight team. Of course, I was a little nervous, but I was proud of him. I always knew there was a chance that something like this might
Beverly, Wesley's alive and he's well.
There was very little left to salvage from the wreckage. We did recover one of the ships' data recorders, but it was badly damaged. We're attempting to restore the information, but that will take some time. Standard procedure calls for an immediate investigation by two command level officers. Captain Satelk and I will be taking depositions from Nova Squadron at fifteen hundred hours today. Commander Albert. I'm sure that everyone in this room joins me in expressing my deepest sympathies to you on the tragic loss of your son. There will be a memorial service for Cadet Albert this evening in the west garden. It has been suggested that we should cancel the graduation ceremonies in the light of what's happened. Commander Albert and I have discussed this and we've agreed that commencement should go forward as planned. The cadets should know that even after a tragedy like this, there are still duties to perform and life continues. Thank you all for coming.
It's good to see you again, Captain. I wish it were under better circumstances.
This is an unhappy way to begin commencement. If you require any assistance, then the Enterprise is at your disposal.
I'm sure we'll be able to conduct the investigation, but thank you for your offer.
Wes. I was so worried about you.
How are you feeling, Wesley?
Not bad. The arm's a little sore.
We were very sorry to hear about Joshua.
Would you like to talk about it?
No. I don't think so. No, thank you. I know you're trying to be helpful, sir, but it seems like that's all I've talked about for the last two days. I don't want to go through it again.
I understand. But I just want you to know I'm available if you should change your mind.
Thank you sir.
Hi.
Hi.
Captain, sir.
At ease, Cadet.
This is my squadron leader, Nicholas Locarno. This is Captain Jean-Luc Picard of the Enterprise. My mother, Doctor Beverly Crusher.
Hello, Doctor.
Hello.
Captain Picard.
Mister Locarno.
I came by to see if Wes had healed up all right.
And how are you feeling, Nicholas?
I'm okay. I just never lost anyone under my command before.
I'm afraid that never gets easier.
Captain, Mom, will you excuse us please? Nick and I have some things we need to talk about.
Of course. Let me know if you need anything.
I will.
I'll see you at the inquiry. Good to meet you, Mister Locarno.
You too, sir.
The inquiry is scheduled for fifteen hundred hours. Are you ready?
I think so.
Don't worry about it, Wes. Everything's going to be all right so long as we stick together.
Hey! Can't you see that's a flower bed?
Sorry. I'm really sorry.
Boothby? Jean-Luc Picard, class of twenty seven.
I know that. What happened to your hair?
How are you?
I'm pretty damned cranky, thank you. I've already replanted this bed four times this week.
Let me give you a hand.
You?
I've acquired an interest over the years.
Well, don't plant 'em too deep. The stems
Will rot.
Captain Picard. Of the Enterprise, no less. And giving the commencement address.
You sound surprised.
Surprised? Uh, uh. Nothing you ever did surprised me, son. Except that time you caught that Ligonian with a reverse body lift and pinned him in the first fourteen seconds of the match. Didn't think you had it in you.
Well, it was all in the legs, all that running I did. Boothby.
Hmmm?
I don't think I ever. I don't think I ever told you how much I appreciate.
There's nothing to tell.
Yes, there is. I just wanted to, while I was here. Look, you know as well as I do I would never have graduated if you
You made a mistake. There isn't a man among us who hasn't been young enough to make one.
Nevertheless.
You did what you had to do. You did what you thought was best. I just made sure that you listened to yourself.
At the time I thought you were a mean-spirited, vicious old man.
I was. And by the way, I was about the same age you are now.
I didn't speak to you for months.
You needed to get your bearings. I knew that. The important thing is, what you did with your life afterwards. Seems you did okay. That's thanks enough for me.
Did you know the boy from Nova Squadron who was killed?
Josh Albert? Yeah. Crusher, Hajar, Sito, Locarno. I know them all.
You nervous?
No. Yes.
That's okay. So am I. But we're going to be all right. We've got some tough times ahead but we've always come through for each other. Whatever happens, I want you all to know that leading this team has been the high point of my years at the Academy. No one could have asked for a better team, or better friends. Let's go.
At this point, we accelerated and executed a starboard turn of twenty seven degrees. We came out of the turn on course for Titan.
And you were still in the lead position?
Yes, sir.
Continue.
As we entered Titan's gravitational sphere, I gave the signal to tighten up and move into a diamond slot formation. Remaining in the diamond formation, we executed a low apogee turn around Titan then began a z-plus twenty five degree climb in preparation for a Yeager loop.
Approximately nine seconds later, Cadet Albert's ship collided with Cadet Hajar's. We had less than two seconds to activate our emergency transporters and beam to the evac stations at Mimas. Everyone made it except Josh.
Thank you, Mister Locarno. Cadet Hajar.
As team navigator, you filed a flight plan with the Academy Range Officer before the exercise. Correct?
Yes, sir.
Did Nova Squadron deviate from that flight plan after you entered the Saturn range?
No, sir.
Then how do you explain the fact that the low apogee turn around Titan was at least two thousand kilometres closer to the moon than indicated in your plan?
We were still within flight safety parameters, sir.
That was not my question, Cadet.
We had discussed changing our approach after I filed the flight plan. The final decision was made en route to Saturn. I didn't consider it significant enough to mention here. I apologise for the confusion, sir. I should have been more precise.
Did you see Mister Albert's ship break formation before it collided with your ship?
No, sir. My first indications of trouble was when my proximity alarm went off.
You may be seated. Did any of you see the collision take place?
No, sir.
Cadet Sito, you were in the tail position, therefore you should have seen any sign of trouble from Cadet Albert. Yet you saw nothing?
That is correct, sir.
Did your attention falter?
No, sir. I was flying solely on sensor readings at the time. I did not have any visual contact with Cadet Albert's ship when he broke formation.
Sensor readings?
What's wrong?
Well, it's unusual to fly on sensors alone in this type of manoeuvre. The pilot relies on visual clues from the other ships to maintain formation.
If you were flying on sensors alone, perhaps you could tell us the orientation of his ship before the collision.
I don't know, sir.
You were flying a ship, travelling eighty thousand kph, with Cadet Albert's ship less than ten metres away and you don't know what his orientation was?
I don't remember, sir.
Sir, may I?
Go ahead.
Admiral, Josh was a good pilot but lately he'd been having difficulties. He'd get nervous during close fly-bys and pull away in the final seconds. His formation flying was a little erratic.
And you didn't report this to anyone?
No, sir, I didn't. We'd flown together a long time. I thought he could handle it if I gave him a chance. I was wrong.
Then you are saying that the accident was Cadet Albert's fault?
I think Josh got frightened and tried to pull out of the turn prematurely, and then crashed into Cadet Hajar. Josh was our friend. We didn't want him to be remembered as someone who panicked.
Please be seated. I'm very disturbed by what I've heard here today. By your own admission, you allowed your teammate to fly when you knew he was having difficulties maintaining formation. That demonstrates a serious lack of judgment. I am also disturbed by the fact that you did not come forward with this information immediately. We should have the first data from Mister Crusher's flight recorder tonight. We will reconvene at thirteen hundred hours tomorrow.
Everything's fine. Trust me.
I don't know, Captain. The Academy has one of the best reconstructive analysis labs in Starfleet. I'm not sure there's much we could contribute to the investigation.
Yes, that may well be. But Wesley's one of our own.
Understood, sir. We'll get right on it.
Good. I've spoken with Admiral Brand and she's agreed to allow us access to all of the physical evidence and testimony. Thank you, gentlemen.
You shouldn't have said it, Nick. Josh wasn't responsible for what happened.
I had to do something.
You said we wouldn't have to lie to them. We all agreed not to lie to them.
I didn't lie. Everything I said was the truth.
The accident was not Josh's fault.
Look, he was my friend too, Wes. I worked to get him on this team. But the truth is, he panicked.
We don't know that.
Of course we do. None of us has wanted to say it out loud, but we've all had the same thought. Haven't we?
He must have pulled away too soon. I think he got scared.
Sito?
Wes, I know you want to protect his memory, We all do. But we have to look out for ourselves now. What do you want us to do, walk in and tell them everything that happened?
We might as well turn in our uniforms and start packing our bags.
Are we ready for that? We'll take this one step at a time. This is the preliminary report from your flight recorder. It was so badly damaged in the crash, that the lab could only retrieve a third of the total telemetry on the recorder. And all of it is before the collision. There's no problem here.
I don't know if I can do this, Nick.
You don't have to lie. Just don't volunteer any new information.
The first night I met you, Wes, I knew I wanted you on this squad. You, more than any of the rest, would understand what it means to be able to count on someone, because you've been out there, putting yourself on the line. You know you've got to be able to count on the people on your team, because your life is in their hands, and their lives are in yours. We made a promise to each other right in the beginning, that we'd stick together. We were Nova Squadron. Nobody else could say that. And even after we graduated, we'd try to get posted to the same duty. We were going to be a team for a long time. Josh can't be a part of those plans anymore, but I think he would still want us to be a team. What do you think?
Mister Crusher?
Sir.
At ease. Am I interrupting?
No. I was just going over my deposition for tomorrow.
They told me you'd be here. I found this in Josh's room. I think it belongs to you.
Our ski trip. Josh and I went to Calgary last month. He forgot his sweater so he borrowed one of mine.
He told me you helped him with his classes.
A little. He only needed help in statistical mechanics.
If Josh had a weakness, it was mathematics.
No, he could do it. He just didn't like to.
His mother and I thought he'd never get out of calculus. Then he found out what the Academy entrance requirements were like. That turned him around. He stayed after class, got a tutor. He really worked hard. Never gave up on anything. And he had a lot of respect for you, and everybody on the team. I realise it was his fault. That everybody could have been killed. And I want to say that, I want to say I'm sorry. I'm sorry that he let you down.
Are you ready, Mister Crusher?
Yes, sir. This is the beginning of our run toward Titan. I'm on the right wing.
Where is Mister Albert at this point?
He was on my port quarter, approximately fifty metres away. We've just received the signal to begin the diamond slot formation. That's Cadet Locarno coming into view. We're in a twenty degree turn around Titan. We should be coming out of Titan's gravity well about now.
That is the extent of the data we were able to recover from the flight recorder. Mister Crusher, would you describe what happened after you left orbit of Titan?
Once we cleared the moon, Mister Locarno led us into a Yeager loop. Approximately nine seconds later, my proximity alarm went off. I tried to veer away, but it was too late and I was hit. I lost control of my ship. A power coupling exploded in my cockpit. I don't know how, but I managed to activate my escape transporter, and the next thing I remember is finding myself on the emergency evac station on Mimas with the rest of the squadron, except Josh.
Do you have anything to add to your testimony?
No, sir.
Mister Crusher, will you describe a Yeager loop?
The ships begin in a diamond slot formation, and climb and loop backwards at a steep angle, and at the peak of the loop, turn over and accelerate in a new direction.
Mister Crusher, did your team remain in formation throughout the loop?
Yes, sir.
I want you to be absolutely clear on this point, Mister Crusher. Before the collision, was Nova Squadron in a diamond slot formation?
Yes, sir.
Computer, display Saturn NavCon file six dash three seven nine. These images were obtained by a navigational control satellite in orbit around Saturn during a standard sensor sweep. Computer, freeze image. Magnify sector gamma three and enhance.
This image was recorded when your ships moved briefly into the satellite's sensor range. According to the time index, what you see on the monitor took place seven seconds after Nova Squadron completed the Yeager loop.
Mister Crusher, are these ships in a diamond slot formation?
No, sir.
What is your explanation, Mister Crusher?
I have none, sir.
Everything's going to be okay, Wesley. There must be an explanation for all this. Data and Geordi are already analysing the flight recorder and the satellite transmission.
Why?
There must be something wrong with the satellite data. It might have been tampered with.
Mom.
Well, there must be some explanation for this. I know you're telling the truth but the satellite data made it look as if you were lying. I've spoken with the other parents. I am going to talk to Admiral Brand and ask her to delay the inquiry
Mom. Don't. You can't do that.
I'm not going to let them ruin your career, Wesley. You haven't done anything wrong.
Mom, don't try to protect me. Please stay out of this.
These weeds keep popping up in the pittosporum. Poor plants don't have a chance to grow.
You could use a good herbicide instead of pulling the weeds with your bare hands.
And you could explore space on a holodeck instead of a starship.
Boothby, tell me some more about Nova Squadron.
Not going well, is it.
No, it isn't.
Do you remember the parrises squares tournament of 'twenty four?
The final game against Minsk.
It took me three weeks to repair the grounds after the celebration.
We had a lot to celebrate. Our team wasn't supposed to win. We were very proud of them.
Well the cadets today are just as proud of the Nova Squadron. The celebration they held after Nova won the Rigel Cup made 'twenty four look like a dinner party. To the other cadets, the members of that team are gods, and that's a hard image to live up to. But Nick Locarno, he watches out for them. He keeps them together. Nick is what makes that team special. He's their coach, surrogate father and best friend all in one. A natural leader. The members of that team love him. If he asks them to do something, they do it, even if it means going right over a cliff.
Report.
Nothing conclusive. We do know that the collision occurred about four seconds after the satellite images were recorded, but we still don't know how the ships got into the new formation or why the crash occurred.
We unsuccessfully tried fifty three different computational models in an effort to simulate the movements of the Nova Squadron just prior to the crash.
There're just too many variables to take into consideration. Speed, attitude, course.
Did Wesley's flight recorder indicate that there was anything unusual about the ship or the way it was operating?
The starboard power flow was fluctuating.
However it was well within operational limits.
Fluidic pressure in the landing struts was low, but I don't know what difference that would make.
We did find that Wesley opened his coolant interlock just before beginning the manoeuvre around Titan.
That is a bit unusual. Normally the interlock is closed unless you're performing a check on the engine coolant levels. But there's no evidence Wesley was performing that sort of check.
Filling the primary coolant tanks requires an open interlock but that can only be performed in a maintenance bay. Is there any other reason for opening the valve?
It's the first step in purging the plasma exhaust.
That procedure would be extremely hazardous while the ship was in flight.
Yeah, the engine would probably ignite the plasma.
Ignite the plasma. That's exactly what they were trying to do.
Come.
Captain.
Can you tell me what manoeuvre this is?
It's a Kolvoord Starburst, sir.
Five ships crossing within ten metres of each other and igniting their plasma trails. One of the most spectacular and difficult demonstrations of precision flying. It hasn't been performed at the Academy team in over a hundred years. Do you know why?
It was banned by the Academy following a training accident, sir.
An accident in which all five cadets lost their lives. I think that Nicholas Locarno wanted to end his Academy career in a blaze of glory. That he convinced the four of you to learn the Kolvoord Starburst for the commencement demonstration. If it worked, you would thrill the assembled guests and Locarno would graduate as a living legend. Only it didn't work, and Joshua Albert paid the price. Am I correct? Cadet, I asked you a question. Am I correct?
I choose not to answer, sir.
You choose not to answer? But you've already given an answer to the inquiry, and that answer was a lie.
I said the accident occurred after the loop. It did.
What you neglected to mention was that following the loop your team attempted a manoeuvre that was the direct cause of the crash. You told the truth up to a point. But a lie of omission is still a lie. Do you remember the day you first came aboard this ship? Your mother brought you on the Bridge.
Yes.
You even sat in my chair. I was annoyed. Presumptuous child playing on my ship. But I never forgot how you already knew every control, every display. You behaved as though you belonged on the Bridge. And then later when I decided to make you an acting ensign, I was convinced you could be an outstanding officer. I've never questioned that conviction, until now. The first duty of every Starfleet officer is to the truth. Whether it's scientific truth, or historical truth, or personal truth. It is the guiding principle upon which Starfleet is based. If you can't find it within yourself to stand up and tell the truth about what happened you don't deserve to wear that uniform. I'm going to make this simple for you, Mister Crusher. Either you come forward and tell Admiral Brand what really took place, or I will.
Captain
Dismissed.
Your message said it was urgent.
They know, Nick. They know what we did.
Calm down. Calm down. Now tell me exactly what happened.
Captain Picard called me to the Enterprise. when I got there he told me that he knows. The Kolvoord manoeuvre, the cover up, everything. He said that if I didn't come forward and tell the truth now, he would.
You said he'd figured it out. Does he have any evidence?
No, but he knew exactly how it happened.
Captain Picard doesn't know anything. He has a theory. So let him tell the inquiry what he thinks happened. They'll ask us, is it true? We'll say, no, sir. There's no evidence, so there's no case. We'll get off with a reprimand.
I can't call Captain Picard a liar.
Wesley, we have to hang on just a little longer, then this will all be over.
It's wrong, Nick.
Wesley.
No. I'm going to tell them what happened.
You're going to tell them what happened? You? Alone? Are going to decide what happens to me, to Sito, to Jean? You're going to decide that?
I'm not going to lie to them again, Nick. I can't live with it.
You can't lie to them. You can't live with this. You have to tell them what happened. Who the hell are you?
Nick!
You're going to turn us in?
Now wait a minute.
No, you wait a minute. He got to you, didn't he? Picard told you some big story about duty and honour. It must've been a pretty good speech to make you turn your back on your friends.
We're Starfleet cadets. We have a duty to the truth.
What about your duty to your friends? I got you on this team. I gave you a chance when there were upperclassmen waiting in line. I said, He won't let us down. He was on the Enterprise. He knows what it's like to trust somebody with his life. I guess I was wrong.
If we all come forward together and tell Admiral Brand
We don't want to come forward. Sito, Jean and me, we don't have a problem with this. But if you do, then resign your appointment to the Academy and walk away. Don't make us pay for your guilty conscience.
You'd let me do that? You'd let me throw my career away just to save your neck?
To save the team. That's more important than you, and it's more important than me. And if I was in your place I'd do it without hesitation. But that's me.
Captain Satelk and I have gone over your testimony and the physical evidence from the crash. Your statements cannot be reconciled with the data collected from the NavCon satellite. Your unwillingness to offer any explanation for this contradiction is disappointing, and raises suspicion. We cannot escape the conclusion that either the data is faulty in some way, or you have lied to us. However suspicion is not proof and I have no proof that you have lied to this inquiry. Therefore, if no further evidence is presented, I have no choice but to close this investigation. For filing an inaccurate flight plan, and for allowing Cadet Albert to fly when you knew he was having difficulties, I am ordering a formal reprimand placed on each of your permanent records. I am also revoking your flight privileges. This inquiry is closed.
Sir. I would like to add something to my testimony.
Proceed, Mister Crusher.
Yesterday I testified that the crash occurred following a Yeager loop. That is not entirely true. We performed a loop, and afterwards broke formation and attempted a Kolvoord Starburst. We knew it was prohibited. We knew it was dangerous, but we wanted to do something spectacular for the commencement demonstration. We pushed Josh into it and he wasn't ready. We thought we could do it. We thought we could do anything. We were wrong, and Josh died. Josh didn't let us down, sir. It wasn't his fault.
Mister Locarno, you are the leader of Nova Squadron. Do you have anything to say? Mister Locarno?
No, sir.
Mister Locarno has been expelled.
They should've expelled all of us.
They very nearly did. Mister Locarno made an impassioned plea for the rest of you. He said that he'd used his influence as squadron leader to convince you to attempt the Kolvoord manoeuvre and then to cover up the truth. He asked to take full responsibility.
He did exactly what he said he would. He protected the team. I feel awful. I've let down everyone. My mother, my friends, you.
You should feel bad, and you will pay for what you've done. Admiral Brand has decided that in addition to a formal reprimand, your academic credits for the past year will be cancelled and you will not advance with your class.
I understand.
It's not going to be easy, staying here on campus, everyone knowing what you did. You have difficult times ahead.
Yes, sir. Thank you, Captain.
You knew what you had to do. I just made sure you listened to yourself. Goodbye, Cadet.
Goodbye, Captain.
You're absolutely right, Doctor. Right now, I can't imagine ever hurting anybody.
How do you feel about that person you used to be?
I feel terrible. But thanks to you, I'm doing much better now. And I'm confident that when I leave, I will be ready to take my place in society again.
When do you think that will be?
Well, now. Right away.
Why do you say that?
You said that when I was able to accept what I'd done and I understood the consequences of my actions, that I would be free to go.
Free to go? You mean you don't think you should stand trial for what you've did?
No, I'm looking forward to proving my innocence.
I thought you said you accepted what you'd done.
That's, that's not what I meant. I was sick when it happened. I wasn't responsible for what I did.
How do I know you're not just telling me what I want to hear? Perhaps we should continue this discussion next week.
No. I want to talk about this now.
You're starting to sound angry again. Maybe you need another treatment.
What I need is to get out of this cell. I've been locked in here for days. You've controlled my every move. You've told me what to eat, and what to think, and what to say, and when I show a glimmer of independent thought you strap me down, you inject me with drugs. You call it a treatment.
You're becoming agitated.
You bet I'm agitated. I may be surrounded by insanity, but I'm not insane. And there isn't any. There isn't. There's nothing.  'm sorry. Could we go back to 'you're becoming agitated'?
No. Why don't we take a break for tonight? I think we've made a lot of progress.
I'm still not comfortable with that final speech.
There's such a thing as over-rehearsing, Will. You're going to be fine.
Maybe I'm just not right for this part.
Most humanoids have the potential to be irrational. Perhaps you should attempt to access that part of your psyche.
Thank you, Data. Your character feels at odds with everyone, as if the world's against him.
Like my first year at the Academy.
Yes, that's what your character is going through. But I want you, Will Riker, to relax.
I'll do my best.
It'll be wonderful. You're going to knock 'em dead.
Right.
You control my every move, tell me what to say, what to think. What to eat, what to say. What to think, what to eat. Then when I show a glimmer of independent thought, you strap me down, inject me with drugs, call it a treatment. I may be surrounded by insanity, but I am not insane.
Excuse me.
Tilonus Four? Didn't their government just collapse?
It's in a state of total anarchy. When the Prime Minister was assassinated, a Federation research team was on the planet. It's believed that they were forced into hiding. Your mission will be to locate and to evacuate them.
Can't they go to local authorities?
There are no local authorities. The government is splintered. It seems that there are various factions vying for power. They're desperate for weapons or technology of any kind. Apparently, some of the factions have resorted to torture to gather their information. Well, a Starfleet research team would be a prime target.
Then I'll have to go down there alone, undercover.
Agreed. Mister Worf is ready to give you a detailed briefing on Tilonian culture.
Well, I guess I'll have to back out of Beverly's play after all.
Oh no, no, there'll be plenty of time for that. We don't arriving at Tilonus for another five days. And besides, if you back out, she'll come after me to play the part.
This is the last known location of the research team. They had occupied a small building in the south-west quarter of the city. You will begin your search there.
The south-west quarter covers over two hundred square kilometres. That's a lot of land for one man to cover. I guess I'd better pack an extra pair of boots.
This apparel will allow you to pass as a common merchant. This Tilonian pendant is equipped with a communicator circuit.
It doesn't really match the outfit.
I suggest you pay closer attention, Commander. Your life will be at stake. Do you understand what I am saying?
Of course I do.
Because you will be posing as a merchant, you will need to know how to use the nisroh for the traditional bartering ceremony.
You will be judged on your prowess with the blade.
I am sorry, Commander! I did not intend
It's okay. I guess I really wasn't paying attention. I'd better go to Sickbay. We'll continue this later.
Boy, you will do anything to get out of doing this play, but you're going to have to do something better than this.
The play's not till tomorrow night. I've still got twenty four hours.
Don't get any ideas. I will see you on stage at eighteen hundred hours.
Right. That still hurts.
There was no damage to the nerves so you shouldn't be feeling any pain.
Probably just a symptom of stage fright.
It hurts!
He was working on a conduit on deck thirty nine. A plasma torch blew up in his hands.
It hurts! Please!
Hypospray.
Yes, Doctor.
Get me twenty cc's of opporozine. Treat the surface burns with the anabolic stabiliser.
Yes, Doctor.
Should we get a stasis unit?
Have one standing by just in case. Get me an epidermal sample. Begin dermal regeneration. Have tissue regrowth standing by. I want him sedated.
I've been on a lot of missions, seen a lot of people injured, but I've never been affected by anything like this. He was looking right at me.
And that was disturbing to you.
It was as if he was blaming me for something. This wasn't the only incident. The last several days, I've felt like everybody's staring at me or talking about me. It's as if I was in Frame of Mind.
Frame of Mind?
Beverly's play. Ever since I began rehearsing for the role, I've been uneasy and restless.
You're probably drawing on feelings that you're not used to expressing.
Right. The play is full of disturbing images. People losing their minds, being tortured by doctors. I can't get it out of my mind.
Sometimes it's healthy to explore the darker sides of the psyche. Jung called it owning your own shadow. This could be a sign that you're a real actor. This is becoming more than just a role to you.
Maybe you're right.
Don't be afraid of your darker side. Have fun with it.
Who was that? You just missed him. Is there a new Lieutenant on board?
I'm not sure. Do you want me to check the personnel logs?
No, I'll check them tomorrow. I'm going to bed early. The performance is tomorrow night. I want to be up for it.
I'm looking forward to it. Break a leg.
I'll try not to take you literally.
You're becoming agitated.
You bet I'm agitated! I may be surrounded by insanity, but I am not insane. And nothing you or anyone else can say will change that. And I won't let you or anyone else tell me that I am. You may be able to destroy my mind, but you can't change the fact that I'm innocent. I didn't kill that man! And that's what's driving you crazy.
I can see we have a lot of work to do.
No matter you can say will the fact that I'm innocent! I'm not crazy! I'm not crazy.  I'm not crazy.
Bravo, bravo! Well done. Bravo.
Where am I? How did you get me off the ship?
The ship again?
What's going on?
I understand this must be disturbing for you, but try to relax. Tell me, where were you a moment ago?
I was on the Enterprise in the middle of a play. But it was here. It was not real, it was on a stage.
I can assure you this is not a stage. Do you remember your name?
I'm Commander. Commander. A second ago I knew who I was. I was on the ship. I was in a play. And now I'm having trouble remembering anything.
That's good. You're starting to come out of your delusional state.
Delusional? It was not a delusion. I was there.
We discussed this. Do you remember, we contacted Starfleet and asked them about you?
No.
We spoke with Admiral Budrow.
Starbase twenty nine. He had never heard of me, and they had no officer that fit my description.
That's right. Now, I want you to focus on who I am. Do you remember me?
I don't know.
I'm Doctor Syrus. Do you remember anything about where you are now?
My head hurts. Somebody hit me.
You tried to escape. You struggled with one of the attendants and hit your head on a door. Do you remember that?
Yes. I remember that now. But I thought it was a Klingon who had cut me with a knife.
That's called transposition. You're projecting elements from your delusions onto events that really happened. But that's good. There was a time when you couldn't break away from your starship fantasy at all.
Now, if what you say is true, where am I?
You're in Ward forty seven of the Tilonus Institute for Mental Disorders.
Why am I here?
We'll talk more later. You don't have to remember everything today. You're making excellent progress.
Wait.
Good afternoon. I've got some good news for you. Doctor Syrus suggested that you might enjoy a couple of hours in the common area today. Well?
I guess so.
I hope you're hungry. They're serving spiny lobe-fish today.
You won't need that.
That's what you said the last time.
I'll be back with your lunch.
I hear you're a Starfleet officer. I'm Commander Bloom from the Yorktown. There are at least a dozen of us here, maybe more. We were kidnapped, brought here against our will. Sanders was on the Yosemite. They did something to his mind. I think they're trying to get neurochemicals from our brains. Stafko was with me on the Yorktown. I don't know what they did to him. We're going to get out of here. I've made a communicator.
You have?
Yes. There are three starships in orbit. They're going to beam us out of here any day now. I'll tell them to get you out, too.  Lieutenant Bloom to Yorktown. Come in, Yorktown. I've made contact with another officer.
Talking to your Starship again, Jaya?
No. Don't let them tell you you're crazy.
You know you're not supposed to take utensils from the common area.
You're welcome to try.
I'm not that far gone, am I?
Of course you are.
Your name is Mavek.
That's right. Not bad for a crazy man.
I am beginning to remember certain things. Why am I here?
I remember when they brought you in. You were struggling, screaming. We could barely hold you down. In fact, just getting the blood off your hands took over an hour.
Blood?
On your hands, clothes. You didn't just kill that man, you mutilated him.
What are you talking about? I didn't kill anybody.
I'm afraid you did. You stabbed him. They found you near the body, the knife in your hand.
No. It's not true.
Yes it is. And if you get out of here, you're going to stand trial.
You're lying!
I imagine the punishment will be quite severe, considering you stabbed him nine times.
No!
I was there, in Ward forty seven, just like in the play. Everyone thought that I was insane, that I'd actually killed someone. But it was all real.
Deanna mentioned that you went to bed early because you were feeling a little anxious about the play, but I had no idea. You said that in your dream, we performed the play. How'd it go?
It was a smash. We got a standing ovation.
Let's hope it goes that well tonight. Well, we have got one hour before curtain. How are you feeling?
I feel like an actor.
Well, you're certainly beginning to look the part.
Perhaps we should continue this discussion next week
No. I want to talk about this now.
You're starting to sound angry again. Maybe you need another treatment.
What I need is to get out of this cell. I'm locked up in here for days. You've controlled my every move. You've told me what to eat, what to think, what to say.
And when I show a glimmer of independent thought
And when I show a glimmer of independent thought, you strap me down, inject me with drugs and call it a treatment.
You're becoming agitated.
You bet I'm agitated! I may be surrounded by insanity, but I am not insane. And there is nothing you
What's happening?
I can see we have a lot of work to do.
Nothing you can do will change the fact that I'm innocent. I'm not crazy. I'm not
You're the key to all this, aren't you? Who are you? Who are you?
Lieutenant Suna, sir.
Will, are you all right?
I. Yes. I don't know
Why don't we get him to Sickbay.
There's nothing wrong with you neurologically, and I can't find anything that could cause the hallucinations. But your heart rate is way up and your blood pressure's way above normal. And you're physically exhausted.
This is not a case of simple fatigue.
Will, you know that when you're under conditions of extreme stress the mind can manufacture all kinds of things.
Drugs. They injected me with me drugs. See if the drug's in my system.
Nothing.
In that dream they gave me drugs. Didn't anybody at the theatre see anything strange happen during the performance?
No, nobody. Get some rest, Will. The play is over. Don't give it another thought.
Right.
How's Lieutenant Suna?
A little shaken but all right.
I feel like such an idiot.
It's nothing to be embarrassed about. We're your friends. We all know the stress you've been under. I'm sure everyone understands perfectly.
Commander, I must compliment you on your performance this evening.
Oh?
Your unexpected choice to improvise was an effective method of drawing the audience into the plight of your character. You gave a truly realistic interpretation of multi-infarct dementia.
Thank you.
Well, maybe not everyone understands.
I think I'd better get a little rest. Clear my mind a little.
I want you to try a few relaxation techniques as well. Remember the ones I showed you a few months ago?
They never seem to work for me.
Maybe you need another treatment.
What's wrong?
Nothing. Nothing.
Will, I want you to get some sleep. I'll see you tomorrow.
Okay.
It's not real. It's not real.
Don't let them tell you you're crazy.
No! Let me out of here! Let me out of here! Help me!  Help me.
I need help. I don't want to be at the mercy of these hallucinations any more.
So you've accepted you're not from a starship? That it's all a delusion?
All I know is when I go back to the ship, reality breaks apart. Nothing makes sense. And then when it's over, it fades away like a dream. But when I'm in the hospital, everything here seems real and I remember everything that happens here.
And what about how you got here?
Maybe I did kill someone. I don't know. But I want to know how.
I'm glad to hear you say that, because I just had a long talk with the hospital Administrator. He told me there are certain legal questions that have to be resolved relatively soon.
Meaning?
Meaning we can't keep you here much longer. We're the only mental health facility on Tilonus Four. We have many people who need our help. I don't want to put any undue stress on you but we have to settle this case one way or another within the next few days.
What does that mean?
You're facing a choice. We can try to help you remember what happened using Reflection therapy. If it's successful, you would be fit to stand trial.
Reflection therapy?
It's a way for you to interact with the various facets of your personality. We scan the regions of your brain that control emotions and memory, and then project them holographically.
And what is the second option?
A complete synaptic reconstruction of your cerebral cortex.
Surgery.
We would neutralise the synaptic pathways responsible for your mental instability.
It doesn't sound like you care for that option.
I don't. The procedure is irreversible. You'd be left with a completely altered personality. The person you are now would cease to exist.
Option one is beginning to sound better.
I agree.
Reflection therapy, then. When do we begin?
This afternoon, if you're ready. I want you to understand that this isn't going to be easy. You'll be interacting with aspects of your psyche you've never dealt with before, and you may be disturbed by what they have to say.
Close your eyes. Try to relax. Clear your mind.
Now, think back to before you came to the hospital. But don't try to remember specific incidents. Concentrate on how you felt.
I was afraid.
Terrified.
She was on the ship with me.
That's because she represents an aspect of your personality, and there are many parts of you that still believe you're on that starship.
Why her?
I asked you to get in touch with your feelings, and this is the part of you that responded. Talk to her about how you felt before you came here.
You said I was terrified. Of what?
I was in a dark place. Cold. Frightened. Someone was there.
Who?
I felt threatened by them. Trapped
You're doing very well. Now let's try to find out how you responded to these feelings. Try to focus on your actions. You felt trapped. What did you do?
I was angry. They were attacking me. I fought back.
I felt pain.
I was injured.
I began to panic.
There was a struggle and I
You what? What happened?
Try to associate your actions and emotions with logical thoughts. What do you think caused you to act and feel this way?
It was cold and dark because I was outdoors at night. I was in a narrow place. I was walking through an alley.
I felt threatened.
I was being watched.
Someone must have followed me into the alley. That's why I started to walk faster. Someone grabbed me from behind.
I panicked.
I tried to fight them off.
How many of them were there?
Three. Humanoid. I only saw the face of one of them.
What did he look like?
I saw him on the ship too. I also saw him here in the hospital, but I don't know who he is.
That's Mister Suna, the hospital Administrator. You met him when you first arrived here.
What part of me does he represent?
I don't know.
Don't believe this, Will. None of it's real. You're still with us on the Enterprise.
Doctor?
We're your colleagues. You can trust us. Everything will be all right
Do you have anything to say to them?
You're all delusions.
Do not listen to him, Commander. He is trying to trick you. You are in danger here. Let us help you.
Listen to me, Will. In all the years we've known each other, have I ever lied to you?
No, please. Leave me alone!
Will, please.
No!
You've taken a big step today. You've finally turned your back on those delusions and all that they represent to you. We'll continue later.
It's not real.
Commander, do you know who I am? Do you know where you are? If you can't answer, just listen. You were on an undercover mission to Tilonus Four. Something happened. We were told that you killed somebody, but we do not believe it's true. We're being blocked at every turn. The hospital Administrator denies you're here at all. We're beginning to think that there's some kind of a conspiracy going on. I had to come in here posing as a health official. Sit tight, Commander. We're going to get you out of here.
Not real.
Commander.
Get away from me!
Commander, you must come with us. You are in danger here.
No!
Silence.
Commander, are you all right?
Help me! Help me!
Who are you? Take them to Security Ward.
Worf to Enterprise. The pattern enhancer has been activated. Three to beam up.
Acknowledged.
There's damage to the parietal lobe. It's as if someone's trying to access his long-term memory. He's in a severe state of neural shock. It's going to take him a while to recover.
Number One, do you remember what happened? You were abducted during the mission to Tilonus Four. You were put into a psychiatric hospital.
It's still bleeding.
It's minor. Don't worry about it.
We have been checking on the hospital Administrator.
Mister Suna.
It appears that he's involved with one of the rival factions. We believe that he is responsible for what happened to you.
It still hurts. It's bleeding again. Why? You just healed it.
Will, try to calm down.
This isn't real.
What are you doing, Will?
If I'm right, you're not really here. This isn't a real phaser. It's all a fantasy, and I'm going to end it, no matter what it takes.
But what if it isn't a fantasy? Are you willing to take that chance?
You're right, I won't. But I'm going to find out what's real and what's not.
Will, don't do it!
How's he progressing?
He's not responding to the Reflection therapy. His delusions are growing more elaborate.
He broke out of his cell last night. We found him running down a corridor claiming people had come to take him back to his starship.
Then I see no other choice. We'll have to perform the synaptic reconstruction.
I still have a phaser. Why do I still have a phaser?
It's not a phaser, it's a knife. You stole it from one of the food trays. Give it to me. We don't want you to hurt yourself.
I don't believe you.
If this is a knife, what happened to Mavek?
It's very complicated. I'll answer all of your questions, but first I want you to put that down.
No. If this is a real phaser, then I was on the Enterprise. But I fired it on myself, so I should be dead. None of this is real. I'm setting this to level sixteen, wide field. That should destroy half of this building. Unless, of course, this isn't a real phaser.
It's all about you, isn't it? You're the only constant, the only person in both places.
There's a lot more going on here than you realise.
This isn't real, either. What's happening to me?
Listen to me. We can still save you, but you must stop fighting us.
You're lying.
Let me help you.
No!
I'm warning you.
No!
He's conscious! I haven't finished the neurodrain. Get him sedated.
Riker to Enterprise!
Enterprise here. Are you all right, sir?
Emergency transport. Get me out of here.
Captain's log, stardate 46778.1. Commander Riker has returned safely from his mission to Tilonus Four. Doctor Crusher has repaired the damage to his long-term memory.
Evidently, you were abducted two days after beaming to the surface.
I remember now. I was in an alley. They attacked me from behind. I tried to fight them off with the nisroh Worf gave me. I managed to get off one of them off me but I think they injected me with some sort of drug.
We believe that they were trying to extract strategic information from your memory using a neurosomatic technique.
I was in a hospital, then I was back on the Enterprise. I was back at the hospital. I kept shifting from place to place. I couldn't tell what was real.
Your mind must have created a defence mechanism that helped you resist the neurosomatic process. Your unconscious fastened on to elements of your real life in an attempt to keep you grounded, to keep you sane.
The preparation for the mission, the play, those were recent experiences, fresh in my mind.
You should get some rest. We can talk some more tomorrow.
There is one thing I'd like to do first.
Are you sure you want to do this by yourself? The stage crew and I were going to do it tomorrow morning.
I'm positive. After everything that I've experienced, I don't think I could sleep knowing it was still up.
It's a chipped cup, off-white, with a crack in it. I can see it but I don't remember anything else about it.
When you see it, do you hear any sounds?
No, I don't think so. Wait, yes. Humming. Someone's humming.
A woman?
Yes, but I don't know who it is.
Try to touch the cup.
It has a sharp edge where it's chipped.
Is there anything inside the cup?
A liquid, dark.
Like tea?
It's not hot. It's bitter.
There's something else inside the cup.
Yes, a wooden handle.
A spoon?
No, it's more delicate than that.
Reach out for it.
A brush. An ink brush. I hear that humming again.
Keep listening to it, and hold out the brush. See if anyone takes it from you.
It's Obaachan! My grandmother. She's doing ink brush writing. I can remember it now. She used that cup for cleaning the brushes, and it was my job to fill it with water and bring it to the table. I would sit beside her and watch the most beautiful characters come from that brush. And the whole time, she'd be humming to herself. I remember it like it was yesterday.
That is remarkable. You remembered such vivid detail.
For years I've seen that old cup in my memory but I could never remember what it was or why it was important. Thank you.
You're entirely welcome, young lady. Perhaps someone else would care to try?  You, madam. You're thinking of that first childhood kiss. Would you like to remember more about it?
Father, you know you're not supposed to probe someone's memory unless they've given you permission.
You are right, but sometimes with a beautiful woman, I can not help myself.
How about you, Commander? Got any memories you feel like digging up?
None that I'd care to share with an audience.
It's getting late. I'd better be going.
It is perplexing to me that the Ullians' ability to retrieve memory is so highly prized. If an event were important enough to be recovered, why would it have been forgotten?
It's not quite the same for us as it is for you, Data. You record every second of every moment of your life.
That is correct.
And then if you want to recall any one of those moments, you just access the proper memory circuit.
My understanding of the human brain suggests that the process is the same for you. Each memory is encoded in chains of molecules. If you want to retrieve it, you simply access the proper RNA sequence.
Yeah, that's true.
Then in what way is it different?
Sometimes there are memories we just can't access at the spur of the moment. For instance, I have no recollection of how I spent my last birthday. Birthdays are important occasions, and you would think that I'd remember how I spent the day, but right now I can't even remember where I was.
Deck two. On the other hand, I remember everything about the time I got my first pet. A Circassian cat. I was eight. I remember how funny-looking he was. I remember how excited I was. It's as if it happened last week.
Perhaps you remember the pleasant memories and forget the unpleasant ones?
No, sometimes the bad memories can be the most intense of all.
It would seem there is no predictable pattern to human memory.
It would seem.
This library of ours has been in the planning stages for years. A collection of the retrieved memories of races from many different star systems.
What my son means to say is, we think of ourselves as archaeologists of the mind. We believe that the history of a world is contained in the personal experience of its people.
Rather like the ancient oral historians on Earth.
Exactly. The library we propose will be a vast storehouse of these individual memories.
That sounds like quite a project. How long will it take to finish your studies on Kaldra?
Many months. We've been working for years, and we've surveyed only eleven planets in eight star systems.
But it's our way of life. We wouldn't want to do anything else.
Captain, Mister Tarmin gave us a demonstration of his abilities this afternoon. It's fascinating. Perhaps you would like to resurrect some memories.
I'd be happy to probe your recollections, Captain. Most people find it an enjoyable experience.
I'm sure. However, I don't think I would make a particularly good subject.
I'm sure you'd be ideal, and you must have some intriguing memories.
We won't be on your ship for long. This may be your last chance.
Yes. Well.
Tarmin, we mustn't influence people. We must let them come to us willingly.
I have found over the years there are many who want the experience of memory retrieval, but who lack some encouragement in order to come forward.
You, Mister Worf? I would love to explore Klingon memories.
Klingons do not allow themselves to be probed.
But there is nothing to fear.
Father.
I am not fearful.
Commander La Forge, you?
I don't think so. Thanks anyway.
I have rarely encountered such squeamish people. Doctor Crusher? Commander Riker?
Mister Tarmin, are all Ullians able to read memories?
Oh, no, my dear. The technique requires special training. It is a serious commitment.
It takes years of study. Tarmin is the most proficient of our group.
Once Jev spent two days with a contingent of elderly Gentons. He couldn't get anything from them. I spent only one hour with them and retrieved a fragment from the Gentonian trade wars.
Excuse me.
Exactly how long will it be before we reach Kaldra, Captain?
Mister Data?
Four days, eleven hours.
Jev?
I'm sorry. I'm being rude.
No, not at all.
My father finds it amusing to demean me in public. I reach the point where I don't want to hear any more.
It's not easy having an overbearing parent. Believe me, I know how you feel.
Oh, that's right. You're an empath.
Oh, I can't read Ullians, but I do know a certain Betazoid mother who is a great deal like your father.
Deck eight.
Deck sixteen.
I've learned to remind myself that my mother and I are two separate individuals.
And have you enjoyed much success with this approach, Counsellor?
No. But I do keep reminding myself.
Goodnight.
Goodnight, Counsellor. And thank you.
Have you stopped thinking about us?
Hot chocolate.
Imzadi, we can't. Not when we're serving on the same ship.
Have you stopped thinking about us? Just answer that. I can't stop thinking about you.
Will, don't.
Imzadi, we can't. Not when we're serving on the same ship.
Have you stopped thinking about us?
We mustn't do this. Will, don't. Will, no!
Imzadi. Have you stopped thinking about us? Just answer that.
No! No! No! Don't!
I can't stop thinking about you. Imzadi. Have you stopped thinking about us?
No!
Captain's log, stardate 45430.9. Counsellor Troi has fallen into a deep coma. After a thorough examination, Doctor Crusher has been unable to find signs of illness or infection.
Any change, Doctor Martin?
No. I'm still getting unusual neurotransmitter readings in the diencephalon, but they might be a result of the coma.
Can you bring her out of it?
I've tried standard revival techniques. She doesn't respond. Until I find out what's caused this, I don't want to try anything more extreme.
Do we know what she was doing when this happened?
No. She was found in her quarters this morning when she didn't show up for an appointment. She was dressed for bed but the bed hadn't been slept in.
Who was the last person to speak with her?
She left the dinner last night with one of the Ullians. I'll talk to him.
Ask if they would consent to an examination, just to be certain.
I'll check the biofilter readings from the Ullian transporter log. It's possible they could still be carrying a harmful organism.
May I join you?
Commander. Of course. Something's wrong?
Counsellor Troi's ill.
I'm sorry to hear it
She's more than ill, she's in a coma. Doctor Crusher doesn't know what's causing it or how to treat her.
When did this happen?
Apparently some time last night. That's why I wanted to talk to you. You may have been the last person to see her. Did you go with her into her quarters?
Are you suggesting that I behaved improperly, Commander?
Not at all. I'm just trying to trace her steps.
We talked in a turbolift, briefly. She got out at deck eight. I did not go with her.
Jev, I'm not accusing you of anything. Did she mention feeling ill?
She seemed fine. She has a wonderful sense of humour.
If you have no objections, Doctor Crusher would like to examine you and your group.
To what end?
She's just trying to eliminate the possibility that one of you might be carrying an organism that was harmful to Deanna. I'm not implying that you did anything intentional. I'm just trying to get to the bottom of the mystery.
We have nothing to hide. If you wish to spend time examining us.
Fine. Thank you.
Deanna, I don't know if you can hear me. I've heard doctors say that even when someone's in a coma, they may be able to hear when people talk to them. That it might help stimulate the brain, speed the healing. In fact, I think you did that for me once, when I was in pretty bad shape. I just thought it might help to hear a friendly voice, even if you don't know you're hearing it. We've been busy mapping the sector. It's been pretty routine. The most unusual thing we've seen is a binary star system. Let's see, what else? I finished the personnel review that we were working on. You can check it out when you wake up. I miss you. Please don't stay away too long.
Will? Will, I promise I'll let you know the minute that she regains consciousness.
I know.
There's nothing you can do here. You'll wear yourself out.
Right.
It's late. Go to bed. That's an order.
Keller is still in there!
Let's move it! Out, out, out! Let's go! Everybody move! Everybody move! Out! Out! Come on, keep moving!
Commander, I need to bring that door down!
Antimatter injection breach. Evacuate immediately.
Keller, can you get to a Jeffries tube? Ensign Keller, answer me!
You killed her. Keller is still in there!
Commander, radiation levels are critical. We've got to seal it off.
She was right behind me!
Bring down the door!
Bring down the door.
I need to bring that door down.
Out, out! Let's go!
Keller is still in there.
Didn't you hear him? Keller is still in there.
Riker to transporter room three. Prepare to beam Ensign Keller out of the engine room.
Keller is still in there.
Keller is still in there.
You killed her.
Ensign Keller, answer me.
You killed her.
I've got to get that isolation door down!
Keller is still in there.
Bring down the door!
You killed her.
You killed her.
You killed her.
I need that door down!
Keller is still in there.
You killed her.
Bridge to Commander Riker. Picard to Commander Riker, answer please. Computer, locate Commander Riker.
Commander Riker is in his quarters.
On my way, sir.
Medical Officer:Medical log, stardate 45431.7. Commander Riker is the second officer who has fallen into an unexplained coma. I have examined the Ullians and ruled out the possibility that they carry a harmful organism.
I compared Deanna's brain scan to one that I took during her last physical. There is a difference. This time there's a trace of electropathic activity.
And Commander Riker?
I found the same pattern. If I didn't know better, I'd say they both had Iresine syndrome. That's the only medical condition that would produce that pattern.
What is Iresine syndrome?
A very rare neurological disorder first diagnosed in the twenty third century. It's characterised by an identical electropathic residue.
Why discount the possibility that it's responsible for these comas?
Iresine is always accompanied by a severely decreased histamine count. Both Will and Deanna showed normal levels. I've asked Commander La Forge to conduct a shipwide diagnostic to determine any other agent that might cause the same electropathic pattern.
Commander Riker and Counsellor Troi were in perfect health until the Ullians arrived. It would be wise to quarantine the aliens.
I believe that it would be premature to take that action, Mister Worf. There's no real evidence linking these comas with the Ullians.
That's true, but there is something curious. The electropathic residue I discovered is located in the thalamus. That's the area of the cerebral cortex that involves memory function.
I've been accused of putting people to sleep with one too many stories, Captain, but this is the first time it's ever been suggested that I might be the cause of someone's coma.
I mean no disrespect, but we are faced with an alarming situation
Why do you suspect us, Captain?
Suspect is perhaps too strong a word. I'm simply trying to determine what has caused two of my officers to fall into comas.
But you've already examined us. We aren't carrying anything harmful.
In further study of the victims, I detected some abnormal patterns in the area of the brain that involves memory.
In light of your telepathic abilities, it raises the question.
Captain, it is not our wish to obstruct you. What would you like?
If I could do further examinations tomorrow. Perhaps monitor you during a memory probe.
Scrutiny does not frighten us.
We will be happy to cooperate, Doctor.
Thank you. I'll contact you in the morning.
You're the only person on board to undergo a memory probe by the Ullians. I'd like to do a neurological work up and see if I can detect any residual effect. Doctor Martin will monitor your vital signs while I conduct the scan.
I'm happy to help.
Have you had any unusual symptoms since the probe? Headaches? Dizziness?
No, nothing like that. It was a wonderful experience.
Electrical activity is normal. CPK levels are normal. Hippocampus is stable, and the thalamus? The thalamus is normal. There is no indication at all of the electropathic residual.
Is that good?
Oh, you're fine, Keiko. But I am no closer to solving this mystery.
Computer, locate the electropathic pattern described in medical database four delta one.
Electropathic pattern located.
Okay, we're going to track down any possible cause of that brain pattern. First, what are the medical conditions that might account for it?
Iresine syndrome is a cause of the electropathic pattern.
Right. And Doctor Crusher already eliminated that, so how many non-medical forces or substances might cause the pattern?
There are twenty two non-medical agents.
Okay. And how many of those are present on the Enterprise?
None are present on the Enterprise.
Are the ship's sensors calibrated to detect all those agents?
All agents are scanned by the sensors.
Okay. Let's start with the chemical substances. Name them.
Ferrazene, hylanatine, dardilion, chrysimite, and manzene.
Ferrazene has a complex molecular structure. It breaks down into bilenium and tarrisite. Do the sensors scan for those?
Ship's sensors scan for both compounds.
And are they present on the Enterprise?
Bilenium and tarrisite are not present.
Do any of the substances break down into by-products that are not scanned for?
Dardilion contains the byproduct nilizene. Sensors do not routinely scan for that substance.
Well, this isn't a routine situation. Scan for the nilizene.
There is no nilizene on the Enterprise.
How did I know you were going to say that? Okay. Let's move on to the non-chemical agents.
Anything more I can do for you?
No, thanks. I was just doing some reading on the Iresine syndrome. If a new strain has developed, that might explain the normal histamine count.
Any luck?
Not so far.
Okay. I'll see you tomorrow.
You shouldn't remember him like this.
You don't have to do this.
It's important to me. I have to see him. To see him. To see him. To see him.
It's good of you to come.
It's the least I can do.
You shouldn't remember him like this.
I have to face the fact that he's gone.
You shouldn't remember him like this
It's good of you to come with me.
It's the least I can do.
You shouldn't remember him like this.
It's the least I can do
I've spent two hours having a cozy chat with the computer. I've checked everything I can think of. Any possible agent that might cause that electropathic pattern.
I assume from your tone of voice that you were unsuccessful.
Didn't find a thing.
Doctor Crusher's not going to be too happy with
Emergency medical team to Doctor Crusher's office immediately.
Doctor Crusher had me working on a shipwide diagnostic. I'd gone to give her the results when I found her.
Did your scans provide any insights into these comas?
None. I've checked and cross-checked. They're just dead ends.
We seem to have eliminated the all known factors that may have caused the comas, except for the Ullians.
Mister Data, I want you to investigate those eleven planets that the Ullians visited. See if there were any reports of unexplained comas.
Aye, sir.
In the meantime, we must consider restricting them to their quarters, as a precautionary measure.
If one of them is behind this, will keeping telepaths in their quarters prevent it from happening again?
What else can we do? Station a guard? Set up a force field? I don't see that those would be any more effective.
Sickbay to Captain Picard.
Picard here.
Counsellor Troi has regained consciousness. She's asked for you, sir.
I'm on my way.
It's like waking up from a nightmare and not remembering what it was about.
What is the last thing you do remember?
My hair. I was brushing my hair.
And then?
I don't know. Just waking up here. Why do I feel so frightened? What happened to me?
We were hoping that you could tell us.
How long have I been here?
Three days.
Three days?
You were the first. The next day Commander Riker fell into a similar coma. Last night, Doctor Crusher.
What is going on here?
We're not certain. It may be that there is some unusual effect produced by the Ullians' telepathic activity. I'm going to talk to them, and in the meantime, you're to stay here and recuperate. And if you remember anything at all about what happened, I want you to tell me immediately.
What are you suggesting, Captain?
That you voluntarily confine yourself to your quarters, at least until we have unraveled this mystery.
We're to be prisoners?
Father.
No, please don't look on it like that. We have done everything we can to explain these comas. We have performed physical examinations, and neurological scans. We have conducted a ship-wide diagnostic, looking for viruses, parasites, infestations. We have investigated every possible cause we can imagine. We have found nothing. Nothing to explain these comas. The only variable that we have not been able to eliminate is your presence here on this ship. Now, in the light of our actions, we would ask you to understand my request and to agree to it.
Captain, our history indicates that we do not adversely affect the people we contact.
I know that.
Then are you implying an intentional assault?
I'm simply considering all possibilities.
Surely you would give us the chance to prove that we are innocent?
If that's possible, of course.
Then I would propose doing a memory probe of Counsellor Troi. You have said that she doesn't remember anything that happened before she lapsed into unconsciousness. I could retrieve that memory There is a possibility that it could explain the coma and prove our innocence.
I'm sorry. I couldn't possibly subject Counsellor Troi to a potentially dangerous procedure.
And I refuse to be a party to any of these proceedings.
Jev is making a reasonable request, Captain. If we're to be accused, surely we're entitled to a defence? Tarmin did a memory probe on another of your crew. Has she suffered any ill effects?
No.
And neither will Counsellor Troi. Please, you may have as many people here as you need to guarantee her safety, but give us this chance to vindicate ourselves.
I will discuss the matter with Counsellor Troi.
Well, that's it for Melina Two. No unexplained comas during the time the Ullians were working there.
We have yet to receive transmissions from the two planets of the Nel system. Perhaps they will show different results.
Maybe. Or maybe we're not checking for the right thing.
Please clarify.
We haven't look into the comas that were explained.
Why would we do that?
Well, remember what Doctor Crusher said right after Counsellor Troi became unconscious? That it looked exactly like Iresine syndrome except for the histamine count?
Yes.
Maybe not every medical facility is as careful as Doctor Crusher. Maybe it's easier to just make a quick diagnosis rather than to keep hunting for the real cause.
You are searching for instances of Iresine syndrome?
Right, and correlating them with visits by the Ullians. And there we are.
Two cases of Iresine syndrome on Hurada Three, at exactly the time Tarmin and his group was there.
Let's check the other planets. I think we may have something here.
Counsellor, I want to reiterate, if you have any doubts whatsoever about this procedure, you don't have to go through with it.
I want to do it, Captain. Something awful happened to me and I don't even know what it was.
Very well.
Counsellor, what's the last thing you remember the other night?
Brushing my hair.
Would you get your hairbrush?
Tell me about brushing your hair. Do you do it every night?
Yes, when I'm ready for bed.
What is it?
Someone touching my hair.
Someone's with you in the room?
No. No, I'm alone. There's no one there.
Go on.
I get some hot chocolate.
Something's happening.
I'm alone in my quarters. I'm remembering something from a few years ago.
Go back into that memory. You said someone was touching your hair?
Yes. And.
It's Will Riker. That's right. I was thinking of him.
Remembering a time when you were with him.
Yes, after a poker game.
It's a pleasant memory. Stay with it.
Now he's hurting me no.
You're frightened.
I want him to stop. It's not Will. Somebody's taken his place.
Someone else is there? Who is it?
No! He shouldn't be here. Why is he here? Stop! You're hurting me.
Can you see his face?
Yes.
Imzadi.
No! Stop! You're hurting me.
Who is it? Who's doing this to you?
It's Tarmin. It's your father.
Captain's log, stardate 45433.2. We have set a course for Starbase four forty, where the Ullians will disembark and return home.
Inad and I have contacted our home planet. If you want to prosecute my father, the authorities there will support you.
I'm not sure we have any legal basis for such a prosecution. Memory invasion is simply not a crime we've ever had to contend with.
According to what I've just learned, it's a practice that was abolished on our world centuries ago.
What could motivate someone like your father to commit such an act?
I don't know. A perverse source of pleasure, perhaps? A way to exercise control over another?
Your father claims quite strenuously that he is innocent.
My father has never been one to admit that he's wrong. But it is difficult to believe he'd be capable of this. I am told that the punishment for this crime is quite severe. We are monitoring my father's telepathic activities. You have my assurance he won't assault anyone else. I am sorry for this, Captain.
Picard to Commander Data.
Yes, Captain.
How's your search coming?
We have uncovered several cases, sir, but we have not yet completed our investigation.
We'll inform the medical personnel on those planets that we have discovered the true nature of the comas. I'm sure they'll appreciate knowing what
Really happened.
Yes, sir. We will keep searching, sir.
We just got the transmission from the Nel system, Data. No mention of Iresine syndrome but there are two unexplained comas on one planet, none on the other.
And were the Ullians present?
Checking the mission logs. That's funny. On stardates 45321 and 45323, when the comas occurred, Tarmin was on his home planet. He wasn't anywhere near the Nel system.
Come in.
Hello, Jev.
We'll be reaching starbase soon. I wanted to say goodbye, and to apologise again for my father.
There's no need. You're not responsible for what he did.
Before all this happened, I had hoped we might become friends.
We still can.
After what he's put you through? Maybe you can forget. I'm not sure I can. You're so lovely. I have to go. Goodbye.
Jev, you're upset. Would you like to talk?
No.
You'd feel better if you did.
Why do you have to be so nice? So lovely.
What? What's happening? It's happening again.
You're so beautiful. So fragile.
It was you. It was always you.
Have you stopped thinking about us?
No!
Don't. Don't. I won't let you!
No! No!
Counsellor. Are you all right?
Yes.
Why are you here? How did you know?
We discovered two instances of unexplained coma on Nel Three while the Ullians were there, but Tarmin was not part of the group. Further examination revealed that only one Ullian was present at all incidents of coma. Jev.
Captain's log, stardate 45435.8. Doctor Crusher and Commander Riker regained consciousness while we were en route to the Ullian home world. The slow process of their recovery has begun.
I have asked that the finest physicians on my world meet with you all upon our return, to help you in your healing process.
They have been in contact with us already. Thank you.
It has been three centuries since anyone was treated for this, this form of rape. But there are medical records from that era. It was a time of great violence among my people. A time we thought we had put far behind us. That this could happen now, it's unimaginable.
Earth was once a violent planet, too. At times, the chaos threatened the very fabric of life, but, like you, we evolved. We found to find better ways to handle our conflicts. But I think no one can deny that the seed of violence remains within each of us. We must recognise that, because that violence is capable of consuming each of us. As it consumed your son.
What's that noise?
They must've left an audio monitoring system on. We're hearing a few thousand subspace messages. I'll try and shut it off. Got it.
Geordi, what's that?
I don't know. Sounds like a loose panel or something. I think it's coming from this service duct over here.
Here's your loose panel.
Hey, pooch. hey, pooch, come on out of there. Come on. Come on. Hey, pooch, what are you doing in there?
Commander, the shuttlecraft is gone. There is no one on board.
Commander?
What is it?
Cellular residue. I believe these are the remains of one of our lieutenants.
All of the blood traces I found match those of Lieutenant Aquiel Uhnari. I'll assume those are her remains but I'll need to take the deck plate back to Sickbay just to be sure.
It would take a powerful weapon to do that.
I'll have a better idea once I've analysed the deck plate.
If that is Uhnari, where's Rocha?
The station's shuttle's gone. Maybe he took it.
Before Uhnari died or after?
We're ready, Commander.
Did you have any luck downloading the station logs?
Not yet. I can't get past these security lock-outs, and I think I know why. All encrypted subspace messages are sent through this channel. Take a look at this signal notation.
It's out of sequence.
Looks like somebody tried to by pass the access protocols and break into the coded messages. It caused the security lockouts to freeze right up.
Are there any messages missing?
I won't know until I get into the files.
Looks like you've made a friend.
Yeah.
We're going to back to the ship. Let me know as soon as you have something.
I'm going to try accessing the logs from another console.
What's going on here? Well, we can start with repolarising the interface.
What is it, pup? What's the matter? Something over here?  This doesn't look like it belongs to you. Ah, This what you want, huh?  There you go. Computer, run station logs in sequence.
Station log, stardate 46458.3. Today we configured the relay controller grid. It was the last primary system we had to overhaul. We are scheduled to recalibrate and align the antennae systems in the next three days.
Computer, access visual output.
Sent in my third request for a message delay buffer. Until it arrives, Lieutenant Rocha and I have rigged a memory module to compensate. It better work, or about a half million subspace messages are going to end up drifting through space. Computer, open Uhnari correspondence file.
Computer, access correspondence files, Lieutenant Aquiel Uhnari.
Hello, Shiana. Sorry I haven't talked to you in a while but I've been dealing with the new Lieutenant, Rocha. So far he's been rude, arrogant and condescending, and he's only been here two days. This might be a long year.
Come on, Lieutenant. Stick with me.
I had the dream again. Mother's calling out my name. She's somewhere in the house. I get to the top of the hill all right, but then the house is slanted. I'm still walking uphill. I can't find her. Doors everywhere and they all look the same.
The cellular residue is completely fused with to metal of the deck plate. We're trying to micro-vaporise the metal in order to get a clear DNA sample.
Do you have any idea what killed her?
Well this is just a guess, but from the molecular deposition on the plating I'd say it was a high-level phaser blast.
Could it have been a Klingon disruptor?
Possibly.
Geordi's found evidence that the encrypted messages have been tampered with, and we are close to Klingon space.
There hasn't been a Klingon raid against the Federation for more than seven years. We can't risk a diplomatic incident until we have more evidence.
And there's still the question of what happened to Lieutenant Rocha.
Get Rocha's personnel file from Starfleet Command, and ask Starbase two twelve to help us find that shuttle.
Aye, sir.
Keep me apprised, Doctor.
All right, let's try this again. Come on, this should be working. The phase inducters are aligned. Come on, Lieutenant, I know you're in here somewhere. Computer me run a subsystem diagnostic, with a frequency range of ten to one hundred megahertz.
Diagnostic cycle will be complete in twenty seconds.
Iced coffee?
What is it, girl?
Hello, Shiana. By the time you get this the Batarael will be over. This is the first time I haven't been there. I've been wondering, who's singing the Horath in my place.  Jomiael hahnalia ma marou nitalia. Rumael tavariel fatra di va Jomiael.  I had that dream again. The one where Mother is screaming. I climb the hill to our house but I can't get to her. Shiana, this time I ran away. I was so scared I ran back down the hill. I think I know why I've been having the dreams about danger. It's because of what's been happening with that Klingon. He's getting more aggressive all the time. Not just the usual threat.
It's because of what's been happening with that Klingon. He's getting more aggressive all the time. Not just the usual threat. Morag actually locked his disruptors to the station this time. I don't think there'll be any trouble. It just brings up those feelings of panic, of wanting to run, wanting to get away from danger. Shiana, I couldn't say this to anyone but you, but the panic? It's the same thing I used to feel whenever Father got angry, when I knew he was going to punish me. Only now, I'm out here in space, and there's no place to run.
There are three references to a Commander Morag, a Klingon officer who patrols this section of the border. Apparently he would pass the station every few days and harass them.
Perhaps this Morag was the one who was interested in obtaining the encrypted messages.
Could be. She didn't say. But I do have several more days of logs left to watch. I'm hoping to learn more.
Very well. In the meantime, I'll speak with the Klingon Governor about Commander Morag.
Are you saying we attacked your outpost?
I'm merely saying that I'm following up on evidence that my officers discovered on board.
Evidence. So you are making an accusation. The Klingon Empire will not stand for these kinds of lies.
Governor Torak, I apologise. I can see that you honestly didn't know what happened aboard the station. I will just have to take this matter up with Gowron. I'm really sorry that we bothered you.
Gowron won't bother with such a minor incident.
Well, ordinarily he wouldn't, but of course I was his Arbiter of Succession. I'm sure that he will be happy to come here and investigate this matter. You needn't worry about it any longer.
Gowron will come here?
Oh, yes. So once again, thank you for your help. Oh, I will be sure to mention your name to Gowron when I speak to him.
I will investigate this further, Picard. You need not bother Gowron with this matter.
That's very kind. Qapla'!
Qapla'!
Computer access the personal logs of Aquiel Uhnari.
Logs accessed.
Begin playback.
Shiana, you always said I'd look great with a wig, so here it is. What do you think?
Definitely not you.
Okay, maybe I'm getting a little crazy. You would too, if you were stuck on a relay station in the middle of nowhere with no one for company except an egomaniac like Keith Rocha. I took a big risk today. I countermanded an order he gave. I agreed to handle the comm. traffic for Relay Station one nine four while they shut down for maintenance. Rocha said we couldn't handle the additional signal load, but I think he's wrong. When he finds out he'll be furious. It's days like this I wish I was home. You know what I miss most? Muskan seed punch. Real Muskan seed punch. You can get it from the replicator, but it's not the same. I'd give anything for some of the punch Mother used to make with chunks of the seeds still in it.  Keith, is that you? Keith?
Commander, there are DNA traces here. Klingon.
So Klingons did board the station?
Yes, but I only found DNA from one Klingon so far. I will continue to scan.
How could she read this stuff?
How's it going?
I've managed to access all of Lieutenant Uhnari's logs. I'm still looking for Lieutenant Rocha's. Whatever happened to the encrypted messages had a cascade effect on the whole storage system. I can't find his files anywhere. I'm running a level three diagnostic now.
Maybe Rocha didn't make the official logs. Uhnari could have been responsible for them.
I don't think so. Aquiel was the junior officer here.
Aquiel?
Lieutenant Uhnari. I've been up all night watching her personal logs. I guess I'm starting to feel like I know her.
What was she like?
Well she was Hahliian. She had one sister named Shiana, she drank muskan seed punch. She had a quirky sense of humour. She liked to sing. She had questionable taste in literature.
Enterprise to Commander Riker.
Riker here.
The Klingon ship Qu'Vat has arrived with Governor Torak. Please report to the Observation lounge.
We're on our way.
Governor Torak, sir.
Governor. Welcome aboard.
Do not bore me with your human pleasantries. I told you we did not kill the woman. Now I will prove it to you. ghoS!
This is Lieutenant Aquiel Uhnari.
We were running a level two diagnostic of the message buffer, Nothing special. Rocha had been on edge all morning, but he'd been irritable ever since he got there, so I didn't think anything of it. We were halfway through the procedure when suddenly he attacked me. He grabbed me, threw me against a bulkhead. I yelled at him to stop but he wouldn't listen. He took me by the throat. I broke free and tried to get to the weapons locker. I'm not sure what happened next but somehow I got aboard the shuttle and left.
We found her on our side of the border heading toward Sector two five two zero. She is lucky my patrol ship did not destroy her vessel on sight.
Lieutenant, why didn't you contact Starfleet? Let them know what happened on board the station?
I don't know, sir. Maybe I passed out. I'm not even sure how long I was in the shuttle before the Klingons picked me up.
Forty six hours. You've been gone forty six hours.
We presumed you were dead. Your blood stains were found at the murder scene.
I must have cut my head when he pushed me against the bulkhead.
Then the remains we found must be those of Lieutenant Rocha.
I can't confirm that. Until we're able to separate the cellular residue from the deck plate, I won't be able to do a clear DNA scan.
You said you were trying to get to the weapons locker. Is there a possibility that you did?
No, I didn't.
You're sure?
I don't remember exactly what happened to me after I was attacked. I'm sorry. It's as if all my memories were drained out of me.
Your logs said that a Commander Morag had been harassing you. Did you let him or any other Klingon aboard the station?
Absolutely not.
If that is true, then Morag or some other Klingon must have boarded the station after she left. We found traces of Klingon DNA on the station.
You still try to blame us.
Have the courage to admit your mistakes. Or are you a lo'Be Vos?
At least I do not wear the uniform of the P'tak!
Governor, we are merely exploring all the possibilities. Lieutenant Uhnari's logs reported that Commander Morag had been harassing the station.
He was doing his job.
If he was only doing his job, then I'm sure you won't mind if we spoke with him.
Very well. In the interests of diplomacy, I will allow you to speak to Morag. But my patience has limits.
Lieutenant, I know a friend of yours who's very eager to see you.
Who?
Come with me.
Maura! Come here, girl. Come on, Maura.
Maura. That's the name.
Yes, it's from Cold Moon Over Blackwater. Have you read it?
I'm not much for gothic fiction.
Not many people are nowadays. Oh, your shoe.
Yeah, Maura got a little restless.
Maura, shame on you. That's not like you. What a naughty dog.
It's all right, don't worry about it. At least she's chewing them up in pairs. I'll arrange quarters for you. I'm sure you want some time alone.
Actually I've been stuck on that station for over nine months. I wouldn't mind going someplace with some activity.
I know just the place.
Here you are, sir.
Thank you.
You're welcome.
Mmmm. Have you ever tried Muskan seed punch?
Yeah. It nearly made me sick.
You have to be raised on it. It's very nutritious. The taste grows on you.
Batar al nalia.
You speak Hahliian.
We travelled around quite a bit when I was growing up. I picked up a couple of languages along the way.
We never travelled. My family lived in the same house for five generations.
The one on the hill.
How do you know about that?
Well, to be honest, when we thought you were dead I needed to review your logs and personal correspondence for any possible clues about what happened.
All of it?
Most of it, yeah. You need to understand that we thought you'd been murdered. We needed information.
I'm sorry. It's just that I tell my sister things I wouldn't tell anyone else. I guess I was feeling a little exposed.
I'd feel the same way.
Especially if I had seen you in that wig.
It really wasn't you.
I'm curious. Now that you've met me, am I what you expected?
Actually, I'm not sure. The woman I saw in those logs is very complicated. I think there's more to you than meets the eye, Lieutenant.
In what way?
Well, your relationship with Lieutenant Rocha, for example. He was only there for five days and yet there was evidence of plenty of friction. You seemed to delight in doing things that you knew would upset him. Why take on extra comm. traffic when you knew it was going to make him angry?
Is that a personal question or part of a murder investigation?
I don't know. Maybe both.
Keith Rocha was obnoxious from the minute he reported to duty. He treated me as though I was beneath contempt. I felt like I had to battle him to hold my own. But I didn't want to see him dead.
Why do you think he attacked you?
I don't know.
Rocha's file is spotless. Two decorations for valour, three outstanding evaluations from his previous commanders. Doesn't sound like the same man that Lieutenant Uhnari described.
What did you found out about Uhnari?
I checked into her record, too. Her last posting was on Deriben Five. I spoke to her commanding officer there. He said she was argumentative, quick to take offence. He also told me he transferred her to that relay station because she was hampering their efforts. To be honest, I'm having trouble believing her story, sir.
Why?
I sent Worf to check the weapons locker on the relay station. There's a phaser missing.
You think that she lied?
Lied, conveniently forgot, I'm not sure. I think it's something we have to consider.
As of now, we don't have sufficient evidence one way or the other. I want you to examine her shuttle. You might find something there which will shed some light on her story.
Aye, sir.
How much longer do you think the investigation will take?
Three, maybe four days. It's tough to tell.
I know I'm a suspect in the murder, but let me ask you something. You've watched my logs. You know me better than anyone here. Do I seem like the kind of person who could murder someone?
No, you don't.
I don't think I realised how much I needed to hear that.
Look, Aquiel, it's been a rough couple of days. I think you need some sleep.
You called me complicated. You're right. I don't make friends easily. Oumriel.
Oumriel.
Commander. It is set to kill.
We found this type two phaser in your shuttlecraft. It was taken from the weapons locker on the station.
I told you I don't remember what happened. Maybe I did make to the weapons locker.
It was set to level ten. Standard procedure requires that all phasers are set on level one when they're in storage.
That means that someone deliberately changed the setting. And then there is the matter of your conflict with Lieutenant Rocha.
Rocha and I had our disagreements but that does not mean I would kill him.
Have you been able to remember anything that happened after he attacked you?
No. Nothing. I suppose maybe in self-defence I
Doctor Crusher tells me that in order to inflict the kind of molecular damage found in Rocha's remains, it would take a sustained phaser discharge of at least thirty to forty seconds. That doesn't sound like self-defence to me.
Now wait a minute. We haven't even established this phaser is the murder weapon yet. And even at level ten I don't see how it could have done the damage the medical evidence says it did. A phase disruptor like a Klingon weapon, maybe.
Look, we're not here to make accusations. We're trying to find out what happened. Commander Morag is due here in two hours. Let's see what he has to say.
Fine. In the meantime I'd like to go back to the station and see if I can access Rocha's personal logs again.
Good idea.
Geordi, wait a second. Thank you, Mister Worf.
Aye, sir.
This is off the record. I'm saying this as a friend, not your superior officer. I think it would be best if you weren't so personally involved with Aquiel right now. There's a lot about her we don't know.
And there's a lot about her that I do know, and if she's innocent I want to help her prove it.
I think you've let your personal feelings cloud your judgement.
I'm not the one making judgements.
Got it. Computer, display the personal records of Lieutenant Rocha from stardates 46455 to 46460.
Computer, what happened to the log entries for stardate 46459?
The logs have been deleted.
Who deleted them?
Unknown.
Captain's log, supplemental. The Qu'Vat has arrived with Commander Morag. We are preparing to question him regarding his involvement in the murder of Lieutenant Rocha.
I killed no one!
We found your DNA on the bulkheads and the console. We know you were there.
Answer their questions.
Yes. Yes, I was there. My patrol route takes me near the station every six days. Three days ago, I hailed them. There was no response. I was concerned.
Concerned?
Yes. I went aboard to see what had happened. There was no one was there, so I left.
Is that all?
That's all.
Commander Morag, we have discovered that the encrypted message bank on the station has been tampered with. Our analysis indicates that twenty seven priority Starfleet messages are missing.
What of it?
Your DNA was also found on the message control module.
This is outrageous! We will not tolerate these ridiculous accusations!
This is a diplomatic matter, Morag! Do not make me search your ship.
Yes, I did take the messages.
Did you kill Lieutenant Rocha?
No. I killed no one. There was no one there. I took the codes, but I killed no one.
Governor, we would like Commander Morag to remain on board the Enterprise until this investigation is complete.
Take him.
This way.
Last night, after I dropped you off at your quarters you established a subspace link with this console. You deleted some of Rocha's personal files, didn't you?
Yes, I did.
Why?
I found a letter Rocha was planning to send to Starfleet Command about me. The letter said I had become belligerent and insubordinate. He was going to ask for a formal hearing. Geordi, I know how this looks.
Yeah, it looks bad. I find out that you've erased a letter that contained a possible motivation for murder?
I didn't kill him.
Then explain this.
I was afraid if they found the letter they'd blame me for the murder. I'm not a model officer. I realise that. Sometimes I act on impulse instead of thinking things through.
Aquiel, this really complicates things.
What are you doing?
Getting out of here.
Aquiel, running away isn't going to prove your innocence. Facing the situation will.
I'm scared, Geordi.
Look, we'll get through this. I promise you, okay?
Then you believe me?
Yes, I do.
Medical Officer:Medical Officer's log, supplemental. I've isolated the cellular residue from the deck plate, but the DNA has destabilised. I'm attempting to reform it.
All right. Initiate the resonance frequency burst.
I'm starting to get a stable DNA scan. This is odd. The nucleotide sequences are starting to fluctuate. The DNA is becoming mobile. Let's try another frequency burst, but increase the resonance level by twenty percent.
I haven't been this close to someone in a long time. I don't want to let go of it.
Neither do I, but I've got six hundred logs to go through.
All right, but first there's something I want to share with you. A way that we can become more intimate. My people are partially telepathic. We use something called the Canar to help focus our thoughts. We also use the Canar for a stronger emotional link during love.
I was wondering what that was for. Do both of us have to be telepathic for it to work?
Let's find out.
Like this.
Think of me.
It's an exact reproduction of my hand, right down to the DNA structure.
Doctor, you said that this was formed from the organic matter found in the deck plates.
When I infused the matter with a resonance frequency burst, it activated its DNA. Then it touched my hand and it began to mimic my cellular structure.
Doctor, what exactly is this?
This is going to sound very farfetched, but have you ever heard of a coalescent organism?
No.
They're rare microscopic lifeforms which need to absorb other organisms in order to survive. Now, that in itself isn't so unusual, but coalescents become the organisms they've absorbed, right down to the cellular level.
Do you think this is what happened with your hand?
There've been reports that these organisms can exist on a larger scale. Certainly, what happened to my hand seems to support that theory.
So you think that Rocha was killed by one of these organisms?
It's possible that something happened to him before he reported for duty on the relay station.
I do not understand.
I've checked the records. Before he was posted to the relay station, Rocha served on an outpost in the Triona System. That is a remote sector. Maybe he was absorbed by a coalescent during that mission.
So what boarded the station could have been an organism that looked and acted like Lieutenant Rocha?
How often do they have to change bodies?
The microscopic organisms have a cycle of no more than five to ten seconds. We can only assume a larger, more complex coalescent would have a cycle of days, even weeks.
Doctor, if what you're saying is true, then Rocha attacked Lieutenant Uhnari to find a new body.
Right.
That means Uhnari is a coalescent.
There was one other person on the station. Morag. It is possible he was the one who was absorbed.
Computer, locate Commander Morag and Lieutenant Uhnari.
Commander Morag is in his quarters. Lieutenant Uhnari is not aboard the Enterprise.
Where did she go?
Lieutenant Uhnari transported to Relay Station forty seven at eighteen thirty hours.
You get Morag. I'm going to the station.
Aye, sir.
Geordi?
I can see you. Oh. And I can feel you.
Do not move.
What is this?
You will come with me.
You've never been as close to someone as you're about to be. Think of me.
Step away from him, Lieutenant.
What are you doing, Commander?
That may not be Lieutenant Uhnari.
What?
What are you saying?
Step away now.
Medical Officer:Medical Officer's Log, supplemental. Commander Morag and Lieutenant Uhnari are being kept under close observation. So far, no sign of coalescent behaviour has surfaced.
Aquiel and Morag will be transferred to a secure medical facility at Starbase twelve. Maybe we'll know more by the time we get there.
Yeah, right.
It could be Morag. We don't know for sure.
Sure.
Get some rest. You've had a rough couple of days.
Thanks.
Computer, display the Engineering duty roster for the next three days.
Maura, come on, not now. Maura, I said not now. Come on, give me a break here. Go lay down!
Maura?
Maybe the reason you don't remember anything that happened after Rocha attacked you is that the coalescing process had begun.  Thank you. Remember when you said you felt like the memories had been drained right out of you? That's probably exactly what was going on.
Then maybe I did take the phaser.
Whatever happened, at least you got away before the process took hold.
So he turned on Maura.
Right. Well, what now?
I guess I'll be going to Starbase two twelve for re assignment.
You know, I had a talk with Chief Pendleton in Communications. There's an opening for a level two specialist.
Really? I'm sure the waiting list so long I'd be grey before I got here.
I could put in a good word.
It's an appealing offer, but I think I'd rather get here on my own merits. Don't be surprised if you see my name on that list.
Check and mate.
Perfect. The queen's gambit finished off with the Aldabren Exchange.
That is unfair. I couldn't concentrate with all that noise.
Noise? It's Algolian ceremonial rhythms.
A toast to the success of the trade conference, Reittan. I must admit, I had some doubts when you invited the Ferengi.
They made a profit and behaved themselves. What more could one ask? Still, they trouble me. We Betazeds are uncomfortable with species like the Ferengi whose minds we can't read.
Perhaps your telepathic abilities are ineffective owing to the anomalous construction of the Ferengi brain, which is composed of four different
Thank you, Mister Data. It was thoughtful of you to invite Lwaxana Troi to be part of the Betazed delegation.
Yes, Lwaxana and I go way back. Her first husband and I were old friends, and I've known Deanna since she was a child.
I'm sure Counsellor Troi appreciates the opportunity to spend time with her mother.
Little One, you could at least pretend you're happy to see me.
Mother, we're among non-telepaths. It's impolite not to speak aloud.
You mean talk with my mouth full? Deanna, please!
All right, you want me to say something aloud? Have you considered if you had stayed on Betazed, you might have been a happier person.
Let's not guess what might have been. I love my work aboard the Enterprise.
Yes, of course you do, but its all business and no play. You've got to enjoy life, relax, like I do. Find yourself the right man, think of your future. Think of my future.
Lwaxana, Deanna. Anything I can do for you?
Could I?
She's as repulsive as the rest of them.
Repulsive? I find her exotic. And what an advantage her telepathy would be in our negotiations.
To read our competitors' minds? Yes, that would be valuable. But she'd never agree to use her powers to help us.
I'm not so sure.
Lwaxana Troi of Betazed, I believe. I am DaiMon Tog of the Ferengi vessel Krayton. May I join you?
I was just going to see Captain Picard. Excuse me.
Oh, Jean-Luc! Jean-Luc! Come have a drink with me. Tell me what you've been up to.
Perhaps later, Lwaxana. Mister Data and I were just about to show Reittan Grax the er, the er, the new door mechanisms on the aft turbolifts. If you'll excuse us?
Lwaxana Troi. I desire you.
What?
You see, your Betazoid skills would be very useful to me, and I find you very attractive. I am willing to pay handsomely for you.
I don't believe this.
You must be aware that every female has her price.
Let's get one thing straight, little man. I am not for sale. And if, by some chance I were to become available, I would rather eat Orion wing-slugs than deal with a toad-faced troll like you! So go away and find someone else to become your property.
As you wish.
Now that you've totally humiliated us, may we return to our vessel?
She is exhilarating, isn't she? Now I want her more than ever. Lwaxana Troi, you will be mine.
Are we at war with the Ferengi yet?
DaiMon Tog has returned to his vessel and the Ferengi have left orbit.
My mother will be relieved.
I hear she handled the situation quite skillfully. An admirable woman.
I'll be sure to tell her you said so.
Come in, Little One.
Mother? Mother, please.
After that awful little Ferengi insulted me, I needed to centre myself. Can you imagine that dreadful little creature talking to me like that? Doesn't he realise that I am a daughter of the Fifth House of Betazed. Holder of the Sacred Chalice of Rixx?
The Sacred Chalice of Rixx is an old clay pot with mold growing inside it.
Perhaps one day when you're older and wiser, you'll understand. Come on, sit down. Talk to me. We spend so little time together.
That's true. I'm sorry, and I didn't mean to get so upset with you at the reception.
Deanna, try to understand. You're all I have. My only concern is for your happiness.
I am happy. Why can't you believe that?
I wish I could, but how much happiness is there in always being there for someone else, and never being there for yourself?
I get a great deal of satisfaction out of my work.
I'm sure you do. I'm sure it's very rewarding in its way. What about a family?
This is my family. My friends here on the Enterprise.
All right. In case I have to spell it out for you, I'm talking about finding a husband, having a child. That's what made me happy. At least until now.
Mother, look. Perhaps some day I will marry. But you've got to let me make my own choices, live my own life, and not the life you would choose for me.
You had your chance with Commander Riker. Look how you ruined that.
I did not ruin anything. We've became very good friends.
Well, all the better. You certainly wouldn't want to marry an enemy. I see we can't talk about this. Very well, have it your way, Little One.
Little One? You called me that when I was five. Now stop demeaning me and address me as an adult!
I'll be home on Betazed if you need me, Little. Deanna.
Adding pre-processors to the neutrino counters boosted efficiency by eleven percent. Of course, Commander La Forge and Commander Data did most of the work.
Not so fast, Wesley. Pre-processing the data with an optical chip was your idea.
That is correct, sir. Although Commander La Forge and I designed the chip, Mister Crusher derived the equation governing its operation.
The point is, you've completed the upgrade well ahead of schedule. Very impressive.
Indeed. Fine work. We shall miss you, Mister Crusher. As you've guessed, final entrance examination scores from Starfleet Academy have arrived. Congratulations. As soon as you have completed the oral exam, you'll be formally admitted.
We'll have you back at Betazed in plenty of time to meet up with the Academy transport ship.
Thank you, sir.
That'll be all. Number One, a moment.
Yes, Captain?
You'll agree that this is a fairly routine mapping mission?
Yes, sir.
Counsellor Troi had the good sense to ask for shore leave. I can see I'm going to have to suggest it to you. Have a good time, Number One.
I think it's around here somewhere.
Maybe it died. It has been a few years.
Muktok live for hundreds of years. Here it is.
It's lovely. I remember that sound, and all the good times we had.
I remember a certain junior officer meeting a very serious psychologist. The best part about being assigned to Betazed.
Oh, this is the perfect spot. Put the food down over there, Mister Homn. Isn't it a beautiful day for a picnic? They'll join us in a minute. No, no, no, no. Here, put the food over there. No, you can go back
Mother, how did you know about this place?
Your father used to bring me here. Sit down.
And you even brought provisions. Very thoughtful.
Here, Will, Deanna. Try an oskoid. They're delicious. That sap running through the veins helps keep it warm.
Very tasty. So tell us, Lwaxana. The last time we met, you were looking for a husband. Did you have any luck?
Alas, no, but what happens to me isn't important. I'm much more concerned about other people getting on with their lives.
Mother.
Mister Homn, I noticed some uttaberries back along the path. Pick some.
Well, Mister Homn and I could go back home if you two would like to be alone. It's such a romantic setting.
Mother, stop it.
Darling, you have been so excitable lately. Have you ever thought of a leave of absence? I could talk to Jean-Luc.
Try the oskoid. Very different.
What the?
For one whose beauty surpasses even these pericules.
DaiMon Tog, I thought the Krayton left orbit hours ago.
It did. But when I tried to get the image of Lwaxana Troi out of my mind, I could not succeed.
This is ludicrous. You mean you came all the way back to Betazed for me?
Why continue to search for perfection once you have found it?
I don't believe this.
Look, Demon Tog, or whatever you call yourself, I am the Daughter of the Fifth House, Holder of the Sacred Chalice of Rixx, heir to the Holy Rings of Betazed. And unless you want to create an interstellar incident, you had better beam back to your ship.
Returning to my ship is exactly what I had in mind. Krayton, transport four immediately.
No, Tog!
Lwaxana? Deanna?
Where are we?
From the smell of things, I'd say we're aboard a Ferengi vessel.
The Ferengi can't do that. You're Starfleet officers.
Tog must have missed that chapter in the Ferengi book of Etiquette.  Enterprise? Must be too far out of range.
DaiMon, they have regained consciousness.
Very good.
I should have known. Even their transporters can't be trusted.
Why have you removed our clothing?
Females do not deserve the honour of clothing.
They're as bad as humans. Look at the leer on his face.
No. His is an expression of revulsion. But it is a feeling that I do not share, Lwaxana.
Well, it's cold in here. Do you want me to become ill?
You must forgive the doctor. He is not accustomed to dealing with Betazoid females. Now, Lwaxana, I have a business proposition for you.
Thanks, but I'm not interested in any of your propositions.
Hear me out. Your telepathic powers could bring us both great profit.
Huh. Why would I want to bring you profit?
In order to keep your daughter alive and healthy, for one.
There's no need for threats. Lwaxana is a sensible female
I don't like the sound of this, mother.
I believe I can control him, Little One.
I'm sure we can talk about this. Just the two of us.
A wise choice. Farek, leave us. And you may rejoin your friend.
Mother, are you sure?
I'll be fine.
And now, Lwaxana Troi, let us talk.
Fifteen hours from Gamma Erandi, and already the subspace static is playing hell with communications.
Just what you'd expect from a stellar nursery.
Wesley, congratulations on passing your Starfleet written examination. An excellent achievement.
Thanks, Data. Now if I can just do well on the oral exams.
Not to worry, you will. And when you return, we'll be gaining the best ensign in the fleet.
There is no guarantee that Wesley will be reassigned to the Enterprise. Ninety one per cent of Starfleet graduates are not posted to Galaxy class starships on their first assignment.
I never thought of that. I always assumed I'd be coming back to the Enterprise.
I'm sure Captain Picard will request you. That is, if he's still commanding the Enterprise when you graduate.
I never thought of that, either. I never thought I'd feel this way about leaving you guys and the Enterprise.
Is that not a part of the human experience? Growth and change?
I suppose so, but.
Listen, Wesley. I felt the same way when I left my family to go to the Academy. But it was one of the best times of my life. You're going to meet new friends and have adventures that you can't even imagine yet.
I hope you're right, Geordi.
Little One, Tog's given me something perfectly hideous to wear. He says it flatters my beauty.
So far, Mother's in no danger. I hope she knows what she's doing.
Well, she's bought us some time. Let's make the most of it.  I wouldn't do that.
I don't need your help.
The hell you don't. You're two moves away from being mated. See, you should have listened to me. Now you've only got one possible escape. That wasn't it.
You should've moved the bishop.
Ridiculous! The bishop was pinned.
Don't listen to me. Forget the fact that I beat you in thirty moves.
Pure luck.
I was being polite. I could've won in twenty moves.
Then prove it.  Pawn to queen four, King's level.
Pawn to king's bishop three, Queen's level.
I must admit, when you first approached me aboard the Enterprise, I was intrigued.
You mean revolted.
Perhaps a little. Do you forgive me?
Yes. With your powers we could be a formidable team.
My, you have great strength in your hands.
And you like that?
I have always admired strong males.
You are beautiful. It is impossible for me to resist you.
Then don't.
Initial scans of ionisation patterns complete, sir. Now correlating sensor readings.
It's almost incomprehensible, the amount of energy being expended.
Actually, it is five point three four times ten to the forty first watts, sir. Well within the norm for this type of phenomena.
Yes, yes, yes. Perhaps, Data, but that takes away none of the wonder.
Check.
I'm sick of this game.
Of course, now that you're losing.
Who's losing? I'm just tired of standing up.
You can't resign now.
It's hard to play from in here. I can't even see the whole board.
Ah, then you'll finish the game if I let you out of the cell?
I might.
Clever, human, but I'm not that foolish.
What, do you think I'm going to try to escape? What would that get me? You've already got her. Besides, where would I go?
I do not trust you.
Fine. Thanks for the game.
Come out here.  Now save your rook, if you can.
And that was my first husband. Not much of a conversationalist, but what a lover. Well, then I met Zarn
I do not want to hear about your other romances. It makes me jealous.
My, my. What big ears you have. Has anyone ever told you how attractive they are?
Some females think they are my best feature. No one has ever given me oo-mox like this before.
Oo-mox?
There is no translation. But the ear is one of our most erogenous zones.
Those Ferengi have iron jaws.
Little One, if Tog were a kitten, he'd be purring.
Good work, Mother.  According to Mother, DaiMon Tog is extremely relaxed at the moment.
Tell Lwaxana to keep him relaxed while we call the cavalry.
Access to communications denied. All transmissions to be authorised by DaiMon Tog.
Let's see just how relaxed DaiMon Tog is.
Mother, we're out of the cell and we're trying to contact the Enterprise, but we can't do it without Tog's access code. Do you think you could manage to
Say no more, Little One.
Lwaxana, you and I are going to make such a wonderful team. With your telepathy and my cunning, I foresee
A very profitable future.
Subspace interference is subsiding, sir. Communications have been restored.
Good. Contact Commander Riker on Betazed.
Message coming in from Betazed, sir. Priority One.
On screen.
Captain Picard, at last. We have been trying to reach you for two days.
Our communications have been blocked by the nebula, Reittan. Is there a problem?
I'm afraid so, Captain. Lwaxana, Deanna and Commander Riker have disappeared.
I knew I wanted you the moment I saw you. You have fulfilled all my expectations.
How sweet.
Farek thought it was a bad idea, but I knew better.
How clever.
I knew best. I always know best.
How repugnant.
What?
I said, how romantic. I can't resist a man who knows what he wants and goes after it.
That's me. That's why I'm DaiMon of this ship. I take charge of every situation. More to the left, woman.
Whatever you say. My darling, would you care for something to drink?
You're so attentive.
Does your food synthesiser know how to make an Arcturian Fizz?
I don't think so.
They have certain pleasure-enhancing qualities.
Mmm
Let me teach your computer how to make one. I'll need your access code.
Yes, my beloved. Computer, access code kayee yooree dahtayee
Tog! Be silent! I knew you were not to be trusted.
Doctor Farek! I was going to make DaiMon Tog a drink.
Save your lies for this fool.
Oh please, don't listen to him. Don't. No, he's misunderstood me.
No, Tog. You have misunderstood. You have been tricked by a sly female who finds you repulsive.
She was only trying to serve me a drink.
You almost gave her complete access to the ship's computer. A security breach severe enough to cost you your command.! It's time you took my advice. Let me study her.
Study her? Your mind probes could kill her.
You brought her aboard for her telepathic powers. If I can determine what neural configuration gives her those powers, I may be able to duplicate them. We could still profit from this.
I don't know.
A true DaiMon would not be blinded by lust. Give her to me, or I may be forced to report your transgressions.
Very well. Take her.
When you have finished here, survey in that direction.
Aye, sir.
I wish I had some answers for you, Lieutenant Worf.
Mister Homn was no help?
None. He last saw them as he was leaving this clearing. When he returned, all three of them were gone.
Lieutenant Foley discovered this in the pond.  The species is Zan Periculi. It is not indigenous to Betazed, but to Lappa Four. A Ferengi world.
Now we now have a reasonable hypothesis as to whom.
The difficult question is where.
The Ferengi ship is almost as fast as the Enterprise. She could be anywhere by now.
Commander Riker will assume that we'll be searching for them. He'll find some way to send us a message. Mister Worf, I want continual monitoring of Ferengi subspace frequencies. Mister La Forge, can you extend our sensor range?
If I narrow the band and tie in long range sensors to the subspace scanners, I can boost the gain.
Make it so.
Do you wish to leave orbit, sir?
Not until we have someplace to go.
I've done everything I know how. It's no use. Without Tog's security code, I can't get near their communication system.
We're running out of time. Farek's about to begin the neural scan on Mother.
Maybe I'm going about this in the wrong way. If I pick a minor subsystem, something non-essential. Like this. Warp field phase adjustment. All this does is suppress the subspace interference generated by the warp engines.
Meaning what?
Meaning if I set up a simple oscillation, I can send out a signal. The trick is to create a message that the Enterprise will understand but that the Ferengi will think is just normal subspace static. What's wrong?
Mother. Will, we have to help her.
Thanks for your help, Wes, but you'd better get aboard the Bradbury. They were ready to break orbit an hour ago.
Soon as I'm sure this works.
Initiating scans now, Captain.
Can you locate the Krayton?
Ferengi transmissions are routinely scrambled and encoded, sir. Without breaking the code, we will be unable to identify any specific Ferengi vessel.
Ferengi codes are damn near impossible to break.
Gentlemen, I have the utmost confidence in your ability to perform the impossible.
Captain, the Bradbury is hailing us. They can no longer delay their departure.
Mister Crusher. Now. No lengthy farewells. Good luck.
Thank you, sir.
The repetitive nature of the subcarrier pattern would imply a modified
Deck six.
Wesley?
Take care.
You too, Mom.
Something the matter?
We've been scanning Ferengi transmissions, trying to find the Krayton. One of the signals was, I don't know, familiar somehow.
Something in the message?
No, the message was scrambled. It was the static!
Where are you going?
Captain. The Bradbury has informed us they can wait no longer for Mister Crusher to come aboard.
Wesley.
Captain, I think there's a pattern to the subspace interference I heard on one of the Ferengi messages.
Wesley, unless you leave immediately, you're going to miss the Bradbury.
The interference itself could be a message. If I could just hear a replay of the subspace scans.
Signal the Bradbury they may leave. Play back the Ferengi transmissions.
Wait. Repeat that one. Put it on a continuous replay. Hear that popping noise? Data, can you filter out everything but that sound?
That's Cochrane distortion. A fluctuation in the phase of the subspace field. All warp engines generate that kind of interference.
But listen to the pattern. It's the Algolian ceremonial rhythm that the musician played at the reception.
Mister Crusher is correct, sir. There is a temporal correlation.
Then it is a signal from Commander Riker. Ingenious. He selected a signal we'd recognise but one the Ferengi would dismiss as static.
Signal source located, Captain.
Plot an intercept course.
Course plotted and laid in, sir.
Well done, Mister Crusher. Warp eight.
Aye, sir.
Engage.
Get away from her.
What are you doing? br>
Stand off, Commander.
DaiMon Tog, can't we strike a bargain? All I'm concerned about is my daughter's safety. What happens to me isn't important.
What are you suggesting?
Let me be candid, DaiMon Tog. Deanna's of no use to you. She's only half Betazoid. And if you keep Riker, Starfleet will never stop chasing for you. Release them. Release them and I will stay with you willingly. I'll even use my telepathy to aid you in your negotiations.
A tempting offer. I would like to believe you.
The offer is genuine. I give you my word as a Daughter of the Fifth House of Betazed.
Lwaxana, don't.
I've made up my mind.
I can't let you do this.
William, I am a grown woman. I can make my own decisions.
Mother, we can't just leave you here.
Yes, you can, and before he changes his mind.
Please, Little One, do this for me. Just this once. Do we have an agreement?
I give you my word. I will release your daughter and the Commander.
DaiMon. A Federation ship approaching at high warp.
The Enterprise has found us
Slow to impulse. Raise shields. Inform the Enterprise that two of our guests are ready to return. The other will be staying with us, at her own request.
I must protest, DaiMon.
Lwaxana has given her word.
Oo-mox is only the beginning.
Are you both all right?
None the worse for wear.
My mother bought our freedom, Captain. She doesn't want to stay with Tog.
Hail the Krayton.
Frequencies open. DaiMon Tog responding.
On screen.
Captain Picard, so good of you to meet us. We were on our way to Betazed to return our guests.
Of course you were, DaiMon. But you're still holding Lwaxana Troi.
When will you get it through your thick head that it's over between us, Jean-Luc?
I think I know what she's doing. You have to fight to get her back, Captain.
Open.
Er, er. It's not over between us, Lwaxana. You're mine and I will not let you go. I insist you return to my side immediately.
You mean, you still care?
My love is a fever, longing still for that which longer nurseth the disease.
Tell me more.
In faith, I do not love thee with mine eyes, for they in thee a thousand errors see. But 'tis my heart that loves what they despise, who in despite of view are please'd to dote. Shall I compare the to a summer's day? Thou art more lovely and more temperate.
You didn't tell me that you and Captain Picard were
You said you didn't want to hear about my other romances. I have a new love, Jean-Luc.
And you can't keep killing all my lovers. That simply has to stop.
Killing?
Oh, he's insanely jealous.
Listen, Tog, I must possesses Lwaxana. And if that means destroying your ship in the process, so be it.
Captain, I had no idea Lwaxana was
Don't let him threaten you. You can defeat him. The only way you'll ever get me back is over Tog's dead body!
That can be arranged. Mister Worf, arm phaser banks and photon torpedoes. If Lwaxana Troi is not in my arms in ten seconds, throw everything you've got at the Krayton.
But you will destroy Lwaxana!
When I have plucked the rose, I cannot give it vital growth again. It needs must wither. Nine, eight. 'Tis better to have loved and lost than never to have loved at all. Seven, six
No, wait.
Five, four
Beam her to their Bridge, now!
Two, one
You wonderfully jealous fool, you.
Captain, I trust there will be no further action taken against us?
Such as my reporting this incident to your superiors who may question your competency as DaiMon? I will think about it. Screen off.
Thank you, Jean-Luc. You were most convincing. You certainly convinced me.
I am truly grateful, Mrs. Troi, that you risked your life to save my people. I'll have you home within a few hours.
Oh, no, no, no, no, that won't be necessary. I'd just love to hear more of your poetry.
Perhaps another time. (finally manages to stand up. Please. Mister Crusher, set course for Betazed. Warp nine.
You asked to see me, Captain?
I've been in touch with Admiral Hahn at Starfleet Academy. The Admiral regrets your missing the oral examination but hopes that you'll reapply next year.
I understand, sir, and I do intend to reapply.
In the interim, the Academy's loss is our gain. The Enterprise will continue to benefit from your talents for another year.
Thank you, sir. Is that all?
No.
Is there something wrong, Captain?
I'm just thinking that I'm saying goodbye to you as you are today.
But I thought you said I wasn't going to be able to go?
The Academy must make you wait, that's true. But, when I review your service to this ship, your crewmates, I cannot in all conscience make you wait for the Academy. You see, Wesley, in my eyes you're an acting ensign in title only. I hereby grant you field promotion to full Ensign, with all the commensurate responsibilities and privileges of that rank. Congratulations. You're dismissed.
Lwaxana Troi has beamed down to Betazed, Captain.
Notify Starfleet we are en route to the Xanthras system for our rendezvous with the Zapata.
Aye, sir.
Ensign Crusher, take us out of orbit and set course for Xanthras Three, warp factor six.
Aye, sir. Course is set.
Engage.
You will agree, Data, that Starfleet's orders are difficult?
Difficult? Simply solve the mystery of Farpoint Station.
As simple as that.
Farpoint Station. Even the name sounds mysterious.
It's hardly simple, Data, to negotiate a friendly agreement for Starfleet to use the base while at the same time snoop around finding how and why the life form there built it.
Inquiry. The word snoop?
Data, how can you be programmed as a virtual encyclopedia of human information without knowing a simple word like snoop?
Possibility, a kind of human behaviour I was not designed to emulate.
It means to spy, to sneak.
Ah! To seek covertly, to go stealthily, to slink, slither
Exactly, yes.
Glide, creep, skulk, pussyfoot, gumshoe.
Captain, I'm sensing a powerful mind.
Something strange on the detector circuits.
It registers as solid, Captain.
Or an incredibly powerful forcefield. But if we collide with either it could be very
Shut off that damned noise. Go to Yellow Alert.
Shields and deflectors up, sir.
Reverse power, full stop.
Controls to full stop, sir. Now reading full stop, sir.
Thou are notified that thy kind hath infiltrated the galaxy too far already. Thou art directed to return to thine own solar system immediately.
That's quite a directive. Would you mind identifying what you are?
We call ourselves the Q. Or thou mayst call me that. It's all much the same thing.
I present myself to thee as a fellow ship captain, that thou mayst better understand me. Go back whence thou camest.  Stay where thou art!
Data, call medics.
He's frozen.
He would not have injured you. Do you recognise this, the stun setting?
Knowing humans as thou dost, Captain, wouldst thou be captured helpless by them? Now, go back or thou shalt most certainly die.
Captain's log, supplementary. The frozen form of Lieutenant Torres has been rushed to sickbay. The question now is the incredible power of the Q being. Do we dare oppose it?
Captain, thy little centuries go by so rapidly. Perhaps thou will better understand this.
Actually, the issue at stake is patriotism. You must return to your world and put an end to the commies. All it takes is a few good men.
What? That nonsense is centuries behind us.
But you can't deny that you're still a dangerous, savage child race.
Most certainly I deny it. I agree we still were when humans wore costumes like that, four hundred years ago.
At which time you slaughtered millions in silly arguments about how to divide the resources of your little world. And four hundred years before that you were murdering each other in quarrels over tribal god-images. Since there are no indications that humans will ever change.
But even when we wore costumes like that we'd already started to make rapid progress.
Oh yeah? You want to review your rapid progress?
Rapid progress, to where humans learned to control their military with drugs.
Sir, sickbay reports Lieutenant Torres's condition is better.
Oh, concern for one's fellow comrade. How touching.
And now a personal request, sir. Permission to clean up the bridge.
Lieutenant Worf is right, sir. As Security Chief I can't just stand here and let
Yes you can, Lieutenant Yar.
Oh, better. And later, on finally reaching deep space, humans of course found enemies to fight out there too. And to broaden those struggles you again found allies for still more murdering. The same old story, all over again.
No. The same old story is the one we're meeting now. Self-righteous life forms who are eager not to learn but to prosecute, to judge anything they don't understand or can't tolerate.
What an interesting idea. Prosecute and judge. Suppose it turns out we understand you humans only too well.
We've no fear of what the true facts about us will reveal.
Facts about you? Splendid, splendid, Captain! You're a veritable fountain of good ideas. There are preparations to make, but when we next meet, Captain, we'll proceed exactly as you suggest.
Sir, respectfully submit our only choice is to fight.
Fight, or try to escape.
Sense anything, Commander?
Its mind is much too powerful. Recommend we avoid contact.
From this point, no station aboard, repeat no station, for any reason will make use of transmitted signals or intercom. We'll try and take them by surprise. Let's see what this galaxy class starship can do.  Lieutenant, inform engine room to prepare for maximum acceleration.
Aye, sir.
Records search, Data. Results of detaching saucer section at high warp velocity.
Inadvisable at any warp speed, sir.
Search theoretical.
It is possible, sir. But absolutely no margin for error.
Using print-out only, notify all decks to prepare for maximum acceleration. Now hear this, Maximum, you're entitled to know, means that we'll be pushing our engines well beyond safety limits. Our hope is to surprise whatever that is out there, try and outrun it. Our only other option is to tuck tail between our legs and return to Earth as they demand.
Engine room ready, sir.
The board shows green, Captain. All go.
Stand by. Engage.
Velocity warp nine point two.
Heading three five one mark eleven, sir.
Steady on that.
The hostile is now giving chase, sir. Accelerating fast.
We're now at warp nine point three, sir, which takes us past the red line, sir.
Continue accelerating. Counsellor, at this point I'm open to guesses about what we've just met.
It it felt like something beyond what we'd consider a life form.
Beyond?
Very, very advanced, sir, or certainly very, very different.
We're at nine point four, sir.
Hostile is now beginning to overtake us, sir.
Are you sure?
Hostile's velocity is already warp nine point six, sir. Shall I put them on the main viewer?
Reverse angle.
Magnifying viewer image.
Hostile's velocity is nine point seven, sir.
Worf, inform the engine room we need more.
Engine room attempting to comply, sir, but they caution us
Go to yellow alert. Arm aft photon torpedoes. Place them on ready status.
Torpedoes to ready, sir.
Hostile now at warp nine point eight, sir.
Our velocity is only nine point five, sir.
Projection, sir. We may be able to match hostile's nine point eight, sir. But at extreme risk.
Now reading the hostile at warp nine point nine, sir.
Now hear this. Print-out message, urgent, all stations on all decks. Prepare for emergency saucer sever. You will command the saucer section, Lieutenant.
I am a Klingon, sir. For me to seek escape when my Captain goes into battle.
You are a Starfleet officer, Lieutenant.
Aye, sir.
Make the mark, Data. Note in ship's log that at this startime, I'm transferring command to the battle bridge.
Captain's log, stardate 41153.7. Preparing to detach saucer section. so that families and the majority of the ship's company can seek relative safety while the vessel's stardrive, containing the battle bridge and main armaments, will turn back and confront the mystery that is threatening us.
Lieutenant, your torpedoes must detonate close enough to the hostile to blind it at the moment we separate.
Understood, sir.
All decks acknowledging, sir.
Worf, this is the Captain.
At the moment of separation, we will reverse power just enough to get your saucer section out ahead and clear of us.
Understood, Captain.
Torpedoes away, sir.
Begin countdown. Mark.
Starship separation in six, five, four, three, two, one.
Separation is successful, sir.
Torpedoes have detonated, sir.
Let's come to a stop. Reverse power.
Reverse power. Decelerating.
Dead stop. We'll hold this position and wait for them.
That will bring them here in just minutes, sir.
Will we make a fight of it, Captain? If we can at least damage their ship we'll have a chance
Lieutenant, are you recommending we fight a life form that can do all those things? I'd like to hear your advice.
I spoke before I thought, sir. We should look for some way to distract them from going after the saucer.
O'BRIEN:All forward motion stopped, sir.
Thank you, conn. Commander, signal the following in all languages and on all frequencies. We surrender. State that we are not asking for any terms or conditions.
Aye, sir. All language forms and frequencies.
The prisoners will all stand.
Historically intriguing, Captain. Very, very accurate.
Mid twenty first century. The post-atomic horror.
All present, stand and make respectful attention to honoured Judge.
Careful, sir. This is not an illusion or a dream.
But these courts happened in the past.
I don't understand either, but this is real.
Get to your feet, criminals!
At least we are acquainted with the judge, Captain.
Attention! On your feet. Attention!
You are out of order.  The prisoners will not be harmed until they are found guilty. Dispose of that.
Can we assume you mean this will be a fair trial?
Yes, absolutely equitable. Proceed.
Before this gracious court now appear these prisoners to answer for the multiple and grievous savageries of their species. How plead you, criminal?
If I may, Captain? Objection, your honour. In the year 2036, the new United Nations declared that no Earth citizen could be made to answer for the crimes of his race or forbears.
Objection denied. This is a court of the year 2079, by which time more rapid progress had caused all United Earth nonsense to be abolished.
Tasha, no.
I must! Because I grew up on a world that allowed things like this court. And it was people like these that saved me from it. This so-called court should get down on its knees to what Starfleet is, what it represents.
You barbarian! This woman
Criminals keep silence!
You've got a lot to learn about humans if you think you can torture us or frighten us into silence. Will she live?
Uncertain. When he froze Lieutenant Torres on the Bridge, we had our Sickbay to help thaw him out.
You will answer the charges, criminals.
Or what? Or this? Her death? Or worse? You promised the prisoners will not be harmed. We plead nothing so long as you break your own rules.
I suggest you centre your attention on this trial, Captain. It may be your only hope.
I suggest you are now having second thoughts it. You are considering that if you conduct a fair trial, which was your promise, you may lose.
Lose?
Yes, even though you're judge and prosecutor.
And jury.
Accepted, so long as you keep to your agreement. And assaulting prisoners is hardly a fair trial.
This is a merciful court.  Silence! Continuing these proceedings, I must caution you that legal trickery is not permitted. This is a court of
court of fact! We humans know our past, even when we're ashamed of it. I recognise this court system as the one that agreed with that line from Shakespeare.  Kill all the lawyers.
Which was done.
Which led to the rule guilty until proven innocent.
Of course. Bringing the innocent to trial would be unfair. You will now answer to the charge of being a grievously savage race.
Grievously savage could mean anything. I will answer only specific charges.
Are you certain you want a full disclosure of human ugliness? So be it, fool! Present the charges.
Criminal, you will read the charges to the court.
I see no charges against us, Your Honour.
You are out of order!
Soldiers, you will press those triggers if this criminal answers with any word other than guilty. Criminal, how plead you?
Guilty. Provisionally.
The Court will hear the provision.
We question whether this court is abiding by its own trial instructions. Have I have permission to have Commander Data repeat the record?
There will be no legal trickery
These will be your own words, your Honour. What exactly what followed his Honour's statement that the prisoner will not be harmed?
Yes, sir. The Captain had asked the question. Can we assume you mean this will be a fair trial? And in reply the judge stated, yes, absolutely equitable.
Irrelevant testimony, entirely irrelevant.
Alright! We agree there is evidence to support the court's contention that humans have been savage. Therefore I say test us. Test whether this is presently true of humans.
I see, I see. And so you petition the Court to accept you and your comrades as proof of what humanity has become.
There must be many ways we can be tested. We have a long mission ahead of us.
Another brilliant suggestion, Captain. But your test hardly requires a long mission. Your immediate destination offers far more challenge than you can possibly imagine. Yes, this Farpoint station will be an excellent test.
All present, respectfully stand.
This trial is adjourned, to allow the criminals to be tested.
This honourable court is adjourned. Stand respectfully.
Captain, you may find you are not nearly clever enough to deal with what lies ahead for you. It may have been better to accept sentence here.
What is present course, conn?
O'BRIEN:It's what it's been all along, sir. Direct heading to Farpoint Station.
Confirm. We are on that heading, sir.
O'BRIEN:Know anything about Farpoint Station, sir? Sounds like a fairly dull place.
We've heard that we may find it rather interesting.
Personal log, Commander William Riker. Stardate 41153.7. The USS Hood has dropped me off at Farpoint Station, where I await the arrival of the new USS Enterprise to which I have been assigned as First Officer. Meanwhile I have been asked to visit the Farpoint Administrator's Office, in the old city.
Ah, Commander Riker, I thought you'd want to know we've still no word from your vessel. I trust we made your waiting comfortable?
Luxurious is more like it.
Good.  Good.
Would I seem ungrateful if I ask for some information?
Anything.
Fascinating, the advanced materials used in constructing this space station. Your energy supply must be as abundant as I've heard.
Geothermal energy is the one great blessing of this planet. I'll have all the details of that sent to your quarters.
Thank you. But it still seems incredible to me that you could have constructed this station so rapidly and so, so perfectly suited to our needs.
Would your care for an Earth delicacy, Commander?
If there's an apple?
I'm sorry, Commander.
It doesn't matter. What I was saying was  I'll be damned.
Ah yes, there was another selection here
Groppler, I could have sworn it wasn't here a minute ago.
And did your failure to notice it make it unwelcome?
Not at all, Groppler.
I trust it will be the same with Farpoint Station, Commander. A few easily answered questions about it won't make Starfleet appreciate it less.
And it's delicious. Thank you. Good morning, Groppler Zorn.
Good morning.
You have been told not to do that. Why can't you understand? It will arouse their suspicion. And if that happens, we will have to punish you. We will, I promise you.
Doctor Crusher!
Mother, it's Commander Riker.
Hello, Wes. Enjoying Farpoint Station?
Yes, sir.
I saw you. I thought I might join you for a stroll.
Actually, we were about to do some shopping.
I've been meaning to visit the mall myself.
Of course.
If you're wondering about Mom, Commander Riker, she's not unfriendly. She's just shy around men she doesn't know.
Wesley! I believe that means he would like us to be friends.
I'm willing, Doctor. Although we're not officially part of the Enterprise, I thought there might be something useful we can do while we wait.
Useful? How, Commander?
Investigating some things that I've noticed since I've been here. The last was a piece of fruit.
Gold would be lovely with this. I am sure, Commander, there are reasons for a first officer to want to demonstrate his energy and alertness to a new captain. But since my duty and interests are outside the command structure
Isn't it remarkable they happen to have exactly what you asked for?
Thank you. I'll take the entire bolt. Send it to our starship when it arrives. Charge to Doctor Crusher.
Let's see, where were we?
I was accusing you of inventing work in order to curry favour with our new captain. I apologise.
Mom, that gold pattern wasn't there.
Maybe this is something Jean-Luc would like looked into.
Jean-Luc Picard? You know the Captain?
When I was little, he brought my father's body home to us.
Yes, Wes, long, long ago. A pleasure to meet you, Commander. You will excuse us.
My pleasure, Doctor. Wes.
Sir?
See you on board.
Yes, sir.
Sir, the Enterprise is arriving
Is this an official report, Lieutenant?
Sorry, Commander. Sir, Lieutenant La Forge reporting. The Enterprise arriving, but without the saucer section, sir.
Stardrive section only? What happened?
I don't know, sir. Captain Picard has signalled for you to beam up immediately.
Our new captain doesn't waste time. It's a good idea. Thank you, Lieutenant.
Aye, sir.
Enterprise, this is Commander Riker at Farpoint Station. Standing by to beam up.
Lieutenant Yar of Security, sir. Captain Picard will see you on the Battle Bridge.
With the saucer gone, I assume something interesting happened on your way here?
Battle bridge. That's for the Captain to explain, sir.
Do we have clearance?
Aye, sir, into the standard parking orbit.
Make it so.
Commander Riker, sir.
Riker, WT, reporting as ordered, sir.
Is the viewer ready?
All set up, sir.
We'll first bring you up to date on a little adventure we had on our way here, Commander. Then we'll talk. Welcome aboard.
This way, sir.
Thou art directed to return to thine own solar system immediately. Go back or thou shalt most certainly die. You can't deny you're still a dangerous, savage, child race.
Message from the saucer module, sir. It will arrive here in fifty one minutes.
Inform them we'll connect as soon as they arrive. And sent the Commander to me when he's finished.
Yes, sir.
And four hundred years before that, you were murdering each other in quarrels over tribal god images. Since then there are no indications that humans will ever change. There are preparations to make, and when we next meet, Captain, we'll proceed exactly as you suggest.
He calls that a little adventure?
Come.
Not exactly a run of the mill happening, Captain.
It seems we're alive only because we have been placed on probation. A very serious kind of probation.  Go.
The saucer module is now entering orbit with us, sir.
Acknowledged. Commander Riker will conduct a manual docking. Picard out.
Sir?
You've reported in, haven't you? You are qualified?
Yes, sir.
Then I mean now, Commander.
They say you will be doing this manually, sir. No automation.
As ordered.
Velocity to one half metre per second. Adjust pitch angle, negative three degrees. Watch your roll angle, conn. All stations, prepare for reconnection. Thrusters to station keeping. All velocity zero. Her inertia should do the job now. Lock up now.
A fairly routine manoeuvre but you handled it quite well.
Thank you, sir. I hope I showed some promise.
I do have some questions for you though.
Yes, sir, I thought you might.
I see in your file that Captain DeSoto thinks very highly of you. One curious thing, however, you refused to let him beam down to Altair Three.
In my opinion, sir, Altair Three was too dangerous to risk exposing the Captain.
I see. A Captain's rank means nothing to you.
Rather the reverse, sir. But a Captain's life means a great deal to me.
Isn't it just possible that you don't get to be a Starfleet Captain without knowing whether it's safe to beam down or not? Isn't it a little presumptuous of a first officer to second guess his captain's judgment?
Permission to speak candidly, sir?
Always.
Having been a first officer yourself, you know that assuming that responsibility must by definition include the safety of the captain. I have no problem with following any rules you lay down, short of compromising your safety.
And you don't intend to back off that position?
No, sir,
One further thing. A special favour.
Anything, sir.
Using the same kind of strength you showed with Captain DeSoto, I would appreciate it if you can keep me from making an ass of myself with children.
Sir?
I'm not a family man, Riker, and yet, Starfleet has given me a ship with children aboard.
Yes, sir.
And I don't feel comfortable with children. But, since a captain needs an image of geniality, you're to see that's what I project.
Aye, sir.
Welcome to the Enterprise, Commander Riker.
Naturally I've heard of your case. The visor implants you wear
Is a remarkable piece of bio-electronic engineering by which I quote see much of the EM spectrum ranging from simple heat and infrared through radio waves et cetera, et cetera, and forgive me if I've said and listened to this a thousand times before.
You've been blind all your life?
I was born this way.
And you've felt pain all the years that you've used this?
They say it's because I use my natural sensors in different ways.
Well, I see two choices. The first is painkillers.
Which would affect how this works. No. Choice number two?
Exploratory surgery. Desensitise the brain areas troubling you.
Same difference. No, thank you, Doctor.
I understand.
See you.
Yes sir?
Where will I find Commander Data?
Commander Data is on special assignment, sir. He's using our shuttlecraft to transfer an admiral over to the Hood.
An admiral?
He's been aboard all day, sir, checking over medical layout.
Why a shuttlecraft? Why wouldn't he just beam over?
I suppose he could, sir, but the Admiral's a rather remarkable man.
Have you got some reason you want my atoms scattered all over space, boy?
No sir. But at your age, sir, I thought you shouldn't have to put up with the time and trouble of a shuttlecraft.
Hold it right there, boy.
Sir?
What about my age?
Sorry, sir. If that subject troubles you
Troubles me? What's so damned troubling about not having died? How old do you think I am?
One hundred thirty seven years, Admiral, according to Starfleet records.
Explain how you remember that so exactly.
I remember every fact I am exposed to, sir.
I don't see any points on your ears, boy, but you sound like a Vulcan.
No, sir. I'm an android.
Almost as bad.
I thought it was generally accepted, sir, that Vulcans are an advanced and most honourable race.
They are, they are. And damned annoying at times.
Yes, sir.
Well, this is a new ship, but she's got the right name. Now you remember that, you hear.
I will, sir.
You treat her like a lady, and she'll always bring you home.
Did you signal the Hood, Commander Riker?
Your exact message. Bon voyage mon ami.
What was my answer, computer?
You're wasting time, Captain.  Or did you think I was gone?
Lieutenant! Do you intend to blast a hole through the viewer? If the purpose of this is to test humans, your honour, we must proceed in our own way.
You are dilatory. You have twenty four hours. Any further delay and you risk summary judgement against you, Captain.
Sorry, sir
You reacted fast, Mister Worf.
But futilely.
I will learn to do better, sir.
Of course you will. We've a long voyage ahead of us.
What do we do now, Captain? With them monitoring our every move and every word.
We do exactly what we would do if this Q never existed. If we're going to be damned, let's be damned for what we really are.
Personal log, stardate 41153.8. Of the twenty four hours Q allotted us to prove ourselves, eleven have now passed without incident. And yet I cannot forget Q's prediction that we will face some critical test.
This planet's interior heat provides an abundance of geothermal energy, sir. But it's about all this world does offer.
And it's your belief that this is what made it possible for them to construct this base to Starfleet standards?
Yes sir. We have to assume that they've been trading their surplus energy for the construction materials used here. According to our ship's scans, many of the materials used are not found on this world.
Perhaps it's like those incidents you describe in your report as almost magical attempts to please us.
Those events did happen, sir.
None of it suggests anything threatening. If only every life form had as much desire to please. Ready to beam down? I'm looking forward to meeting this Groppler Zorn.
I have a feeling there's more to it than just pleasing us, sir.
As if it's something Q is doing to trick us? Over here. I've asked the Counsellor to join us in this meeting. May I introduce our new First Officer, Commander William Riker. Commander Riker, this is our ship's Counsellor, Deanna Troi.
Do you remember what I taught you, Imzadi? Can you still sense my thoughts?
A pleasure, Commander.
Likewise, Counsellor.
Have the two of you met before?
We have, sir.
Excellent. I consider it important for my key officers know each other's abilities.
We do, sir. We do.
I, too, would never say goodbye, Imzadi.
My crew and I need a bit more information before we make our recommendations to Starfleet.
No objections to that, but but I'm puzzled over you bringing a Betazoid to this. If her purpose, sir, is to probe my thoughts
I can sense only strong emotions, Groppler. I am only half Betazoid. My father was a Starfleet officer.
Well, I have nothing to hide, of course.
Good, since we admire what we've seen of your construction techniques. Starfleet may be interested in your constructing starbases elsewhere also.
We are not interested in building other facilities.
If I may, Captain. Then a trade, Groppler? Some things you need in return for lending us architects and engineers who can demonstrate your techniques.
Bandi do not enjoy leaving their home world. If Starfleet cannot accept that small weakness, then we will be forced, unhappily, to seek an alliance with someone like the Ferengi, or
Counsellor? What is it?
Do you want it described here, sir?
Yes. No secrets here if we're to be all to be friends. Agreed, Groppler?
We ourselves have nothing to hide, of course.
Pain. Pain. Loneliness. Terrible loneliness. Despair. I'm not sensing the Groppler, sir, or any of his people, but it's something very close to us here.
The source of this, Groppler. Do you have any idea?
No. No, absolutely not. And I find nothing helpful or productive in any of this!
And that's it? No other comment?
Well what do you expect of us? We offer you a base designed to your needs, luxurious even by human standards
While evading even our simplest questions about it. We'll adjourn for now while we all reconsider our positions.
Captain, the Ferengi would be very interested in a base like this.
Fine. I hope they find you as tasty as they did their past associates.
Ensign, can you help me find Commander Data? I understand he's somewhere on this deck.
This way, sir. You must be new to these Galaxy class starships, sir.  Tell me the location of Commander Data.
Lieutenant Commander Data now located in Holodeck area 4J.
And as you see, sir, it's pointing you that way.
Thank you
You're welcome, sir.
The next hatchway on your right.
Thank you.
You're welcome, Commander Riker. And if you care to enter, Commander?
I do.
Hello?
Marvellous. How easily humans do that. I still need much practice.
There are some puzzles down on the planet that the Captain wants answered. He suggests that I take you with me on the away team that I'll be leading.
I shall endeavour to function adequately, sir.
Yes. When the captain suggested you, I looked up your record.
Yes, sir. A wise procedure, sir, always.
Then your rank of Lieutenant Commander is honorary?
No, sir. Starfleet class of '78. Honours in probability mechanics and exobiology.
Your file says that you're an
Machine, Correct, sir. Does that trouble you?
To be honest, yes, a little.
Understood, sir. Prejudice is very human.
Now that does trouble me. Do you consider yourself superior to us?
I am superior, sir, in many ways, but I would gladly give it up to be human.
Nice to meet you, Pinocchio. A joke.
Ah. Intriguing.
You're going to be an interesting companion, Mister Data.
This woodland pattern is quite popular, sir. Perhaps because it duplicates Earth so well. Coming here almost makes me feel human myself.
I didn't believe these simulations could be this real.
Much of it is real, sir. If the transporters can convert our bodies to an energy beam, then back to the original pattern again
Yes, of course. And these rocks and vegetation have much simpler patterns.
Correct, sir. The rear wall.
I can't see it.
We're right next to it.
Incredible!
Commander Riker!
Commander Riker, isn't this great? This is one of the simpler patterns. They've got thousands more. Some you just can't believe.
Careful, the next rock is loose!
Wesley!
Wow!
Mister Data has agreed to join me on the away team, Captain.
Very good, Commander.
Sir, maybe I should get something to wipe this water up.
Good idea.
There's a low gravity gymnasium, too. It'd be hard to get bored on this ship.
Good.
Mom, could you get me a look at the Bridge?
That's against the Captain's standing orders.
Are you afraid of the Captain too?
I certainly am not.
But Captain Picard is a pain, isn't he?
Your father liked him very much. Great explorers are often lonely. No chance to have a family.
Just a look, at the Bridge. I'll stay in the turbolift when the doors open. I won't get off.
You are asking for trouble, Wes. We'll see what we can do.
Recommend that someone could begin by examining the underside of the station, sir.
Our sensors do show some passages, sir. Perhaps you and I?
Tasha, you and the Counsellor. And, Geordi, I want your eyes down there.  You and I will start with topside.
Have you noticed anything unusual?
I can't see as well as Geordi, sir, but so far the material seems rather very ordinary.
Construction records?
Construction records show this to be almost identical to that which Starfleet uses.
Team Leader.
We've found something interesting. We're in a passageway directly under the station, sir.
But these tunnel walls are something I've never seen before, sir.
How are you examining them?
In every way.
Microscopically, thermally, electromagnetically. None of it is familiar.
What about you, Troi?
Sir, I've avoided opening my mind. Whatever I felt in the Groppler's office became very uncomfortable.
I'm sorry, Counsellor, but you must. We need more information.
Pain. Such pain! Pain!
Hang on, I'm coming. Enterprise, lock us onto her signal.
I'm sorry. Close your mind to the pain.
Unhappiness. Terrible despair.
Who?
I don't know. No life form anything like us.
What in the hell kind of place is this? Geordi, what do you see?
Well, it's of no material I recognise, sir, or have even heard of.
Children are not allowed on the Bridge.
Permission to report to the captain
Doctor Crusher.
Captain. Sir, my son is not on the Bridge. He merely accompanied me on the turbolift.
Your son?
His name's Wesley. You last saw him years ago when
Well, as long as he's here. I knew your father, Wesley. Want a look around?
But don't touch anything! Try it out.  The panel on your right is for log entries, library computer access and retrieval, viewscreen control, intercoms, and so on. Here we have
And here, the backup conn and ops panels, plus shield and armoury controls.
The forward viewscreen is controlled from the ops position there
Which uses high resolution, multi-spectral imaging sensor systems
How the hell do you know that, boy?
Perimeter alert, Captain!
Wesley!
I'm sorry.
You shouldn't have touched anything
Off the bridge! Both of you.
You have a perimeter alert, sir.
As my son tried to tell you!
Picard. Go ahead.
Ship's sensors have detected the presence of a vessel approaching this planet. No ship is scheduled to arrive at this time, sir.
Have Commander Riker and his team beam back up. Security, could that be the Hood returning here?
The vessel does not match the Hood's configuration or ID signal.
Put it on main viewer. Identification?
Vessel unknown, configuration unknown, sir.
Hail it.
We've been trying, sir. No response.
Raise all shields, phasers at ready.
Shields up, sir. Phasers ready.
Get me Groppler Zorn. And continue universal greetings on all frequencies.
This is Zorn, Captain.
Zorn, an unidentified vessel has entered into orbit with us.
Do you know who it is?
There are no ships scheduled to arrive until
I asked if you knew who it is. You mentioned the Ferengi Alliance to me.
But we have had no dealings with them. It was only a, a thought.
Are you certain?
I promise you, Captain.
We were making an empty threat. I wanted your cooperation. Forgive me.
Definitely entering orbital trajectory, sir.
It measures twelve times our volume, Captain.
Sensors say we were just scanned, sir.
Pain again?
Troi, you've been at it enough.
No, I feel close to an answer of some kind.
Commander, something down here is shielding our communicators.
Yes, that's exactly the feeling I've been reading. As if someone doesn't want us to be in touch with our ship.
Come on, let's get to the surface.
There is no computer record of any such vessel, sir. Nothing even close.
Still no response, sir. We've done everything but threaten them.
Sensor scans, Mister Worf.
Our sensor signals seem to just bounce off. Something's happening, sir. They're firing on Farpoint, sir!
Bring photon torpedoes to ready!
Wait, sir. They're hitting the old Bandi city, not Farpoint Station.
Those stairs are where we entered down here, sir.
At this point, it becomes ordinary stone, sir. Matching what's above.
My God! Was that a phaser blast?
Negative. But something similar.
You, Tasha, and Geordi will beam up to the ship. Now, come on, I want to see exactly what's happening.
Don't. If you should be hurt
You have your orders, Lieutenant. Carry them out.
Yes sir, I'm sorry, sir. Enterprise, three to beam up.
Enterprise, Enterprise, come in! Help us, please! What shall we do?
Enterprise, help us, please!
Tune that down! Commander Riker, come in. Can you hear me?
Riker to Enterprise, come in.
Commander Riker, come in. Where are you?
With Data, on the edge of the old city, sir. It's being hit hard, sir.
And Farpoint Station? Any damage there?
Negative on damage to Farpoint, sir. Whoever they are, it seems they're carefully avoiding hitting the station.
It's from an unidentified vessel that's entered into orbit with us here.
No ID, no answer to our signals.
The old Bandi city's being hit hard, sir. Many casualties very probable.
Understand, Commander.
Would you object to your Captain ordering a clearly illegal kidnapping?
No objection, sir.
Groppler Zorn may have the answers we need. Get him. Bring him here.
Aye, sir.
They're forcing a difficult decision on me, Counsellor.
But I doubt protecting the Bandi would violate the Prime Directive. True, they are not actual allies, but
We are in the midst of diplomatic discussions with them. Lieutenant, lock phasers on that vessel.
Phasers locked on, Captain.
Typical. So typical. Savage lifeforms never follow even their own rules.
Get off my bridge!
Interesting, that order about phasers.
Standing by on phasers, Captain.
Please, don't let me interfere. Use your weapons.
We've no idea who is on that vessel. My order was a routine safety precaution.
Really? No idea of what it represents? The meaning of that vessel is as plain, as plain as the noses on your ugly little primate faces. And if you were truly civilised, Captain, wouldn't you be doing something about the casualties happening down there?
Captain to CMO.
Are you reading any of this?
Medical teams already preparing to beam down, Captain.
Compliments on that, Doctor. Any questions? Starfleet people are trained to render aid and assistance whenever
But not trained in clear thinking.
Let's consider your thoughts. You call us savages and yet you knew those people down there would be killed. It is your conduct that is uncivilised.
Sir, they're firing on the planet again.
Go to manoeuvring jets. Position us between that vessel and the planet. Force fields full on.
Aye, sir. Impulse power to  We have no ship control, sir. It's gone!
Are you undamaged?
Yes. You?
All systems operating.
Please! Make it stop! You can drive it away!
Drive who away, Groppler?
I don't know.
Unlikely, sir. Our records show that you supervised all Bandi contact with other worlds.
We done nothing anything wrong!
Then if we can learn nothing from you, we'll leave.
No! Oh no, please, don't leave. I'll try to explain.
First officer to Enterprise. We've lost Zorn. Something like a transporter beam seems to have snatched him away.
Question, sir, could it be this Q?
None of you knows who transported him. You're running out of time, Captain.
Captain, suddenly I'm sensing something else. Satisfaction. Enormous satisfaction.
From the same source as before?
No, that was on the planet. This is much closer.
Excellent, Counsellor. He's such a dullard, isn't he?
Captain from Transporter Room. First Officer and Mister Data have beamed aboard.
Excellent also. Perhaps with more of these little minds helping
That is enough, damn it!
Have you forgotten that we have an agreement,
An agreement which you are at this moment breaking by taking over our vessel, interfering with my decisions. Either leave or finish us.
Temper, temper, mon Capitaine. I'm merely trying to assist a pitiful species. But perhaps I will leave if Commander Riker provides me with some amusement.
Do nothing that he asks.
But I ask so little, and it's so necessary if you're to solve all this. Beam over there with your what do you call it? Your away team.
I'll risk none of my crew on that unknown.
You should already know what you'll find there. Or perhaps it's too adult a puzzle for you.
With all respect, Captain, I want to beam over there.
You show promise, my good fellow.
Have you understood any part of what he's tried to tell you? Humanity is no longer a savage race.
But you must still prove that.
At least you impressed him, Number One. That's hopeful.
Thank you, Captain. Captain, if he's not open to evidence in our favour, where will you go from there?
I'll attend to my duty.
To the bitter end?
I see nothing so bitter about that.
Can I help you, Captain?
I didn't want you thinking me harsh. Cold blooded.
Why oh why would I ever think that.
I didn't welcome you aboard personally, professionally. I made you come to me on the Bridge. I yelled at your son. Who, as you pointed out, was quite correct. He does seem to have a very good grasp of starship operations.
You've just won this mother's heart, Captain.
Ah, but, now, your assignment here. I would consider and approve you a transfer for you.
Oh. You consider me unqualified?
Hardly. Your service record shows you're just the Chief Medical Officer I want.
Then you must object to me personally.
I'm trying to be considerate of your feelings, Doctor. For you to work with a commanding officer who would continually remind you of a terrible personal tragedy.
If I had had any objections to serving with you, I wouldn't have requested this assignment, Captain.
You requested this posting?
My feelings about my husband's death will have no effect on the way I serve you, this vessel, or this mission.
Ah. Then, welcome aboard, Doctor.
Riker to Picard. We're ready to beam over, sir.
I, er, I hope we can be friends?
Thank you.
Phasers on stun. Energise.
Most interesting, sir.
It's much the same construction we saw in the underground tunnel.
But no sound of power. No equipment.
How does this ship run?
What is it, Troi? Is it the same as you felt down there?
No. This is much more powerful. Full of anger! Hate!
Toward us?
No. It's directed down toward the old Bandi city.
Most intriguing again, sir. The place that this vessel was firing upon was not the Farpoint starbase, but the home of those who constructed. Sorry, sir. I seem to be commenting on everything.
Good. Don't stop, my friend.
Enterprise, Riker. This is turning out to be a very long tunnel or corridor, sir.
No ship's crew in sight. No sign of mechanism or circuitry. No controls or read-outs. This is nothing like any vessel I've seen before.
Groppler Zorn, sir. A great fear just ahead.
There's a different feeling here than in the tunnel. Very different.
No! Please! No more! Please, no more! Please, please, make it stop! Please! Please! Please! Make it stop! Please!
No! Please! No more, please! No more! Please!
Zorn. Can you hear me?
The pain! No!
Has the alien communicated?
Please! Please! Please, no more!
That's it, sir. It's just one alien that I'm sensing here.
Please! I don't understand what you want!
Not true. He does know.
No, please, no more. No more! No, no, no, don't!
Captain!
Transporter chief, yank them back now! Riker, acknowledge!
Your time is up, Captain.
Transporter Chief, do you have their coordinates? Transporter Chief!
He can't hear you, Captain.
Transporter Chief, come in! I've people in trouble over there, Q.
Everyone at ease. That's an order. Q, my people are in trouble. Let me help them, please. I'll do whatever you say.
You'll do whatever I say?
It seems I did make that bargain.
The agreement isn't valid, sir. It wasn't Q that saved us.
Save yourself. It may attack you now.
It was that which sent us back, Captain.
Yes sir. It is not merely a vessel, sir. Somehow it is alive.
She lies. Destroy it while you have a chance. Make phasers and photon torpedoes ready.
No! Do nothing he demands.
Captain, that thing was killing my people!
Was there a reason?
It is an unknown, Captain. Isn't that enough?
If you'd earned that uniform you're wearing, you'd know that the unknown is what brings us out here.
Wasted effort, considering the human intelligence.
Let's test that. Beginning with the tunnels you have under Farpoint, Groppler.
Identical to the ones on the space vessel lifeform over there. Why was it punishing you, Groppler?
In return for some pain you'd given other creature?
We've done nothing wrong. It was injured. We helped it.
Thank you. That was the missing part. Lieutenant Yar, rig main phaser banks to deliver an energy beam.
Aye, sir.
You're right, Captain. It has to be conceivable that somewhere in this galaxy there could exist creatures able to convert energy into matter.
And into specific patterns of matter, just as our transporters do.
On the viewer, Captain!
Groppler, you captured something like that, didn't you?
Warn my people, please, to leave Farpoint Station immediately!
He lies, Captain. Shouldn't you let his people die?
Transmit the message, leave Farpoint Space Station immediately.
Then it was a pair of creatures I was sensing. One down there in grief and pain, the other up here, filled with anger.
And firing not on the new space station, but on the Bandi and their city.
Attacking those who had captured, capture its mate.
Energy beam ready, sir.
Lock it in on Farpoint Station.
I see now it was too simple a puzzle. Generosity has always been my weakness.
Let it have whatever it can absorb. Energise.
Now getting feedback on the beam, sir.
Discontinue. Groppler Zorn, there'll soon be no Farpoint Station, if I'm right about this.
A lucky guess.
Please believe me, we meant no harm to the creature. It was starving for energy.
Which your world furnishes you in plenty.
We did feed it.
Only enough to keep it alive, so that you could force it to shape itself into whatever form you needed!
Sir! Wonderful! A feeling of great joy. And gratitude. Great joy and gratitude, from both of them.
Why do you use other lifeforms for recreation?
If so, you've not provided the best.
Leave us! We've passed your little test.
Temper, temper, mon Capitaine.
Get off my ship.
I do so only because it suits me to. But I will not promise never to appear again.
Captain's log, stardate 41174.2. The agreement for the rebuilding Farpoint Station has been completed per my instructions.
All stations?
Ready for departure, sir.
Some problem, Riker?
Just hoping this isn't the usual way our missions will go, sir.
Oh no, Number One. I'm sure most will be much more interesting. Let's see what's out there. Engage.
Placing beam-out marker. Return transport, fourteen minutes, forty seconds. Is your view any better, Geordi?
Not too bad, Commander. A lot of charged-particle precipitation, but I can compensate.
Communicators are dysfunctional.
Tricorders?
Readings only valid within five metres.
Good thing we didn't bring Data. We'd be unscrambling his circuits for a week.
Commander! Picking up something on the positron scan. Over here. Some electrically conductive objects.
Recognise those markings, Worf?
Yes, sir. Romulan.
What the hell are they doing in a Federation sector?
Picking up traces of ultritium residue. An explosive device must've been used to destroy the craft after it crashed.
All right, let's spread out. Twenty five metre radius. Our window back closes in twelve minutes.
Commander!
Commander Riker!
Four minutes to beam-up.
Where is he? Wait here.
Worf! Worf! Commander Riker!
Geordi! Geordi!
Worf! Commander Riker!
Hold your position, Mister Worf.
Worf!
Captain's log, Stardate 43349.2. An unidentified distress signal has led to the discovery of a crashed Romulan vessel on the surface of Galorndon Core, a Federation planet. We have recovered one survivor, but Lieutenant Commander La Forge did not report back with the away team and is still missing.
Get him to Sickbay.
Secure Sickbay. Post a guard in visual contact at all times.
He's not going anywhere, Lieutenant.
O'BRIEN:I'm sorry, Commander. There's just no way to lock in on anything down there.
Keep trying, O'Brien.
O'BRIEN:The electrical storm's creating thousands of ghosts.
Well beam some of those ghosts back. One of them may be Geordi. Permission to lead another away team, sir.
Denied. When we get another window in the storms. The crash site?
The Romulan craft is a total loss. There's nothing there to salvage unless you want to use tweezers.
No sign of others?
You couldn't see two metres in front of yourself down there.
It certainly is the last place one would expect Romulan encroachment. On the other hand, Galorndon Core would provide ideal cover for an opening move of a new offensive.
I doubt if they were there for the climate.
We thought it would be like working on Vulcans, but there are subtle differences. Too many of them.
Can you treat him?
He has cell damage to vital areas. He's going to need a transfusion of compatible ribosomes in order to recover. I'm setting up a schedule to test every member of the crew.
We can't use the replicator?
The molecules are too complex.
Will he survive?
I can't answer that yet.
Well let me put it another way. Will he survive long enough to tell us what he was doing here?
Doctor, it's an important consideration.
I can bring him around for a few minutes. But there is one serious complication. His brainwaves indicate early neural-pathway degeneration.
Head injury?
There's no obvious cranial trauma. I'm guessing his exposure to the magnetic fields on the surface was slowly breaking down his synaptic connections.
Will it affect Geordi the same way?
He'll be conscious for a minute or two.
You are on board the Federation Starship Enterprise. We're treating your injuries. How long were you down on Galorndon Core? Do you understand me?
I will not answer questions.
We need to know if there are other survivors on the surface.
I am alone. I will not answer any questions.
Do you have a mother ship who should be advised of your condition?
The only answer he wants to give is that he was alone.
Which suggests that he wasn't.
Something, anything to can cut through the storm. Some way to get a signal through to him.
A neutrino pulse. We could build a portable neutrino source and send it in a probe to the planet surface. It'll act like a beacon.
A neutrino pulse would send non-charged particles back up through the atmosphere and would be detectable by Geordi's Visor.
He can show us that he's found it by modifying the pulse
Make it so.
Captain, I have a new transmission on a parallel frequency to the distress call.
From the surface?
No, sir. From inside the Romulan Zone. We should be able to view the transmission.
On screen.
Tomalak to Pi. We have received your distress signal. Respond. If you can hear me, we are entering the Neutral Zone now. We will reach you in six hours.
Mister Worf, hail the Romulan vessel.
Hailing frequencies open, sir.
Romulan vessel, this is Captain Jean-Luc Picard of the Federation Starship Enterprise.
The frequency is open, sir.
Commander Tomalak, we have intercepted your transmission. You are not to enter Federation space.
Captain Picard, my apologies. Had I known you were in this sector, I certainly would have advised you before crossing the Neutral Zone.
Indeed?
I'm sure you will understand when I explain. One of our ships had a slight navigational error and apparently crashed on Galorndon Core.
A slight navigational error? Nearly half a light year past the Neutral Zone?
I assure you, Captain, no aggression was intended.
Commander, we have recovered one of your survivors.
He is on board your ship?
He is being treated for severe injuries.
And his craft?
Destroyed, deliberately, after the crash.
I'm sure you are prepared to leave at once and rendezvous with me in the Neutral Zone.
I have an away team on the planet. We are waiting for a window in the storm to beam them up.
And then you will return my officer?
Are there any other Romulans we should be looking to recover from Galorndon Core?
No. It was a one-man craft. Captain, we will be at the Federation border of the Neutral Zone in roughly five hours. We will expect you to rendezvous at that time.
Counsellor?
There's great hostility behind his smile. He'll stop at nothing to complete his mission.
Including the Neutral Zone border.
Captain, I see no reason to return the Romulan to his ship. He should be held and interrogated.
We have every right to detain him, sir.
Without evidence of intent, Number One, it will not be a simple matter.
It obviously wasn't pilot's error. I think it demands a response from us.
But we must measure our response carefully, or history may remember Galorndon Core along with Pearl Harbour and Station Salem One as the stage for a bloody preamble to war.
I want him off all the drugs. They're not doing anything. Doctor Crusher to Picard.
Go ahead, Doctor.
My patient is not responding
To treatment.
You haven't found a compatible ribosome donor?
The lab is still processing the tests. Early results indicate humans have far
Too many bio-rejection factors. I've also ruled out the Vulcans we've tested.
I think I'll try a little old-fashioned country medicine. Keep the fever down, try to let the body heal itself.
Keep me advised. Picard out.
Captain, the neutrino beacon is operational, and we've placed it aboard a class three probe.
Well done, Ensign. Mister Worf, launch the probe.
Aye, aye, sir.
Probe has reached the surface, sir.
The neutrino stream is coming in strongly. Sensors are tracking the probe despite the interference.
A stationary neutrino source. Wesley Crusher. Thank you, Wesley.
You are my prisoner.
Right. Congratulations. Surely a strategic triumph for the Romulan Empire.
Stay there.
My shoes are getting full of sand. I just hate that, don't you?
Name and rank.
Lieutenant Commander Geordi La Forge. I don't think I got yours?
A Romulan ship will arrive shortly. You will accompany me on board.
I don't think so. You see, we heard your message too and well, the fleet's in, Commodore. Sky's full of Federation ships.
You're lying.
I never lie when I've got sand in my shoes, Commodore.
Get up.
Seriously, the only one way out of here is for you to put that thing down and soon as there's a window in the storm
Are you okay?
You gotta be kidding.
Sit.
Welcome to Galorndon Core, where no good deed goes unpunished.
Yes, Doctor?
Lieutenant, good. Come in. Please sit down. We have finally found a compatible ribosome match for the Romulan. But only one. You.
That is impossible. I am a Klingon.
Different species, yes. But many humanoids have comparable cell structures. And you have what this Romulan needs. There's absolutely no risk to you. You did understand that was the purpose of all the testing?
I have no objection to tests.
You have an objection to being a donor?
Yes.
Lieutenant, I understand your feelings about the Romulans, but this is not the time or place.
If you had seen them kill your parents, you would understand, Doctor, it is always the time and place for those feelings.
This Romulan didn't murder your parents. And you are the only one who can save his life.
Then he will die.
I sure wish you'd put that away.
You're afraid of dying.
You bet I am. Who isn't?
I'm not.
Right.
To die in the service of my people.
Ah, the Romulan path to glory.
You can be sarcastic now, but in a few millennia, when humans are extinct and the Romulan Empire spans the galaxy.
You really believe that stuff, don't you, Commodore?
You may address me as Centurion Bochra.
Bochra? Good, solid Romulan name. What's the matter?
Nothing.
Wrong. Your heart rate just shot way up.  It translates a wide range of radiation into neural impulses. Allows me to see.
Without it, you're blind?
Yes.
How did this happen?
I was born that way.
And your parents let you live?
What kind of question is that? Of course they let me live.
No wonder your race is weak. You waste time and resources on defective children.
Whoa. I must be having some sort of polarity shift. The diagnostic insists everything's fine. Hey, hey, your body temperature's gone up another full point.
What are you saying?
I don't know. It must be this place, all that electromagnetic soup, it's wreaking havoc on our nervous systems. Your metabolism's messed up, so's my interface with the Visor. We've got to get out of here while we still can.
Sit down.
Bochra
Sit down!
What is that?
It's just a background fluctuation, Commander. He hasn't found it yet.
Then he must be hurt or dead. When does our next window open up, Mister Data?
There is no indication, Commander. I have no way to predict.
Incoming Romulan transmission, Captain.
They're early.
The Romulan warbird should still be twenty nine minutes away from the edge of the Neutral Zone.
Close enough, however, to see we're not there. On screen.
Picard, I'm approaching the Federation border and the Enterprise is not to be found. Why?
My away team is unable to leave the surface because of the storms.
And my officer?
He is alive.
His life remains in jeopardy?
Yes.
And yet you will still not permit me to cross into your precious Federation space to retrieve him?
If the point hasn't been made clearly, Commander, let me make it again. Romulan warships do not enter Federation space unless they are prepared to do battle.
But a mission of mercy?
A mission to recover one of your officers who has been caught on a Federation planet for reasons as yet unknown.
I have already explained.
And I have rejected your explanation.
Territories! You would measure territories against a man's life?
Commander, I am singularly impressed by your concern for a life. Do not risk any more lives by leaving the Neutral Zone. Picard out.
Bochra. Bochra, you're in bad shape and my vision's getting worse. Now there's a beacon out there that'll get us back to my ship, but not if I can't find it.
I cannot surrender to the Federation.
Then stay here and die.
If the situation were reversed would you not die to avoid capture?
I don't know. I might, if I thought it was necessary. If the stakes were high enough. But they'd have to be pretty damn high. I guess I'd make a pretty lousy Romulan, huh?
I no more wish to die than you do.
Bochra, there are times when it is necessary to die for one's ideals. Do you believe this is one of those times?
Come on. Let's go find that beacon. Whoa!
What is it?
Everything's gone blank. I'm blind.
Come. Worf.
You are busy. Forgive my intrusion.
For what it's worth, I understand your bitterness.
With respect, sir, you cannot. I am asked to give up the very lifeblood of my mother and my father to those who murdered them.
Must you blame all Romulans for that?
Yes.
Forever? What if some day the Federation made peace with the Romulans.
Impossible.
That's what your people said a few years ago about humans. Think how many died on both sides in that war. Would you and I be here now like this if we hadn't been able to let go of the anger and the blame? Where does it end, Worf? If that Romulan dies, does his family carry the bitterness on another generation?
Then you believe I should?
What I believe doesn't matter.
My Starfleet training tells me one thing, but everything I am tells me another.
Lieutenant Worf, report to Sickbay.
Acknowledged.
Lieutenant, his life is coming to an end. I thought it important for you to see him again. It's not too late to change your mind.
Come close to me, Klingon. Let me die with my hands at your throat.
There is a substance within my cells which you need to survive.
Then you've come to hear me beg for my life?
No.
I would rather die than pollute my body with Klingon filth!
I've lost almost all feeling in my legs.
My synapses must be turning to jelly. The Visor's fine. I just can't see a thing.
How do we locate the beacon?
We don't.
Do all humans give up so easily?
Bochra, we're lost, unless you've got something that can smell neutrinos.
We have the sensor device you are carrying.
Tricorder? It's not set up to detect neutrinos.
Your eye device does. Connect them.
That's crazy. They don't speak the same language. Besides, I'd never be able to get an accurate sampling. Wait a second. Wait, I wouldn't need an accurate sampling, just need a pointer. A neutrino Geiger counter. No, it's still not possible.
You cannot do it?
Under normal circumstances, maybe. Here, no way.
Why?
Because I can't see. Adapting the neural output pods of the Visor is tricky work. It can't be done by touch.
Then I will be your eyes.
The storm is beginning to subside, Captain. We should have a window in less than an hour.
There's still no indication that he's found the beacon, sir.
Assemble an away team.
Yes, sir.
Captain, the Romulan warship has crossed the Neutral Zone border. It is in Federation space and heading toward us.
Belay that order, Number One. Red alert.
Make sure the scanner select limiter matches the Visor output range.
Not so fast.
Now, place the neural output pods in contact with the tricorder scanner heads.
Ready.
Let her rip.
Bearing three five zero.
We did it! The first Federation-Romulan co-venture.
The storm may be breaking.
With any luck, there'll be an electromagnetic window opening up and we can get out of here.
At which point, I'll be your prisoner.
Can you walk?
I don't know.
Let's find out. Come on.  Okay, let's go.
Straight ahead.
Okay.
To the right.
Come.
You wished to see me, Captain.
Yes, Lieutenant. I assume you know what it's about.
Yes.
The Romulan ship will reach us within the hour. If our patient dies it may be just the excuse the Romulan commander needs to start an incident. The death of a Romulan officer at the hands of the Federation. Think of it.
I have, Captain.
So, there is no question that the Romulan officer is more valuable to us alive than dead.
I understand.
Lieutenant, sometimes the moral obligations of command are less than clear. I have to weigh the good of the many against the needs of the individual, and try to balance them as realistically as possible. God knows, I don't always succeed.
I have not had cause to complain, Captain.
Oh, Lieutenant, you wouldn't complain even if you had cause.
If you order me to agree to the transfusion, I will obey, of course.
I don't want to order you. But I ask you. I beg you to volunteer.
I cannot.
Lieutenant.
Sir?
That will be all.
Picard to Doctor Crusher.
Go ahead.
Do not continue to enlist the cooperation of Lieutenant Worf.
I won't have to, Captain. The Romulan has died.
We've found it!
Now we have to alter its signal pattern so the Enterprise knows we've found it.
Will that be difficult?
No, not with your help.
Scanners are showing a window, Captain.
Expected duration?
Nine minutes, forty seconds, sir.
No change in the neutrino beacon signal, sir.
Romulan ship approaching. Bearing three fifty four mark two eight seven.
On screen.
Entering phaser range. We are being hailed, sir.
On viewer.
You have one chance to escape destruction, Picard. Return my officer at once.
Commander, you have entered Federation space despite my warning.
You forced the situation. I will not leave without him.
He's dead.
Then he is but the first to fall, Picard.
The Romulan ship is routing power to its forward disruptor array.
All shields to maximum.
Aye, sir.
Lock phasers on target.
Phasers locked and ready.
Captain, the signal pattern from the neutrino beacon is modulating.
It's Geordi.
We can't transport him with the shields up.
If we lower our shields, the Romulan will strike.
The electromagnetic window on the planet is closing, sir. Three minutes remain.
Transporter room, lock onto the neutrino beam and stand by.
O'BRIEN:Standing by, Captain.
The window is allowing intermittent sensor readings. There are still numerous ghost images, but I believe we are picking up two life forms near the beacon.
Another Romulan?
I cannot say. The electromagnetic interference prevents an accurate reading.
But it's a likely hypothesis, Number One. If Commander La Forge has located a second survivor. Lieutenant, hail the Romulan vessel.
Aye, sir. They're ignoring our hail, sir.
Repeat the hail all channels. You see, they have no way of knowing how accurate our sensors are. Put on your best poker face, Number One. Open a frequency. Commander Tomalak. It would appear our away team has rescued a second man from your one man ship. We're preparing to beam them to the Enterprise. After which, of course, we will return the survivor to you.
No acknowledgement, sir.
Commander, both our ships are ready to fight. We have two extremely powerful and destructive arsenals at our command. Our next actions will have serious repercussions. We have good reason to mistrust one another, but we have better reasons to set our differences aside. Now, of course, the question is, who will take the initiative? Who will make the first gesture of trust? The answer is, I will. I must lower our shields to beam these men up from the planet surface. Once the shields are down, you will of course have the opportunity to fire on us. If you do, you will destroy not only the Enterprise and its crew, but the cease-fire that the Romulans and the Federation now enjoy. Lieutenant, lower the shields. Leave the hailing frequency open.
Yes, sir. Shields down.
Mister O'Brien, transport Mister La Forge and the Romulan directly to the Bridge.
O'BRIEN:Aye, sir. Energising.
Security team to the Bridge.
Belay that order, Lieutenant. Shields up. No one is going to harm you.
You have my word on that.
Well, Commander?
If he has been in any way mistreated.
I have given them no information, Commander, but I have not been mistreated. In fact, this human saved my life.
Tomalak, how is it possible you didn't know of the second Romulan on Galorndon Core?
A simple misunderstanding, Captain Picard. I was obviously misinformed as to the size of the craft. I assure you I intended no deception.
Of course not.
You doubt my good faith?
Let's just say my faith would be strengthened by a gesture from you, such as powering down your disruptors.
Disruptors powering down.
Thank you. Cancel Red alert, Lieutenant. Commander, we shall return your officer and escort your ship to the Neutral Zone.
That is acceptable.
Good to have you back, Commander.
Good to be back, sir. Actually, I have Centurion Bochra to thank for it.
Indeed. Commander La Forge and Lieutenant Worf, escort our guest to transporter room one.
Yes, sir. Come on.
Close call.
Too close, Number One. Brinksmanship is a dangerous game.
Captain. Doctor. I am honoured by your presence, but may I suggest you attend the second concert.
Why, Data?
Ensign Ortiz will perform the violin part. My rendition will be less enjoyable.
Oh?
Although I am technically proficient, according to my fellow performers, I lack soul.
Data, telling us why you're going to fail before you make the attempt is never wise.
But is not honesty always the preferred choice?
Excessive honesty can be disastrous, particularly in a commander.
Indeed?
Knowing your limitations is one thing. Advertising them to a crew can damage your credibility as a leader.
Because you will lose their confidence?
And you may begin to believe in those limitations yourself.
Captain, we're receiving a message from the Sheliak Corporate.
Origin point of the message confirmed, sir. It is from the Shelia star system.
The Sheliak have not attempted to communicate with the Federation for a hundred and eleven years. Why are they doing it now?
On screen.
Federation creatures, there are humans on the fifth planet of Tau Cygna. This planet was ceded to the Corporate in section one hundred and thirty-three, paragraph seventy seven of the Treaty of Armens. We will begin settlement of this world in four days. Remove the humans.
What the devil?
Federation creatures, there are humans on the fifth planet
Cancel message.
Tau Cygna Five is in the de Laure Belt. Heavy concentrations of hyperonic radiation.
Humans can't survive in that environment. Exposure to hyperonic radiation is fatal.
Then the Sheliak are asking us to chase ghosts.
No, Number One. The Sheliak haven't broken a century of silence to send us after phantoms. An investigation is in order. Set course for Tau Cygna Five.
Captain, human life form readings from the planet.
So the Sheliak weren't hallucinating.
Numbers?
Impossible to get an accurate reading. High levels of radiation are disrupting our sensors.
Hyperonic radiation also interferes with ship's transporters. They are now inoperable.
So are the ship's phasers.
How can humans survive down there?
They must have found a way to adapt. Milan's work with radiation sensitivity suggests it is possible. Perhaps with extensive viral therapy.
Well, whoever they are, and however they survived, we've got to get them off the planet.
By treaty, that world still belongs to the Sheliak.
Who are within their rights to demand the removal of these trespassers.
And if we don't remove them, the Sheliak will. Forcefully.
How forcefully?
The Sheliak consider humans a lower life form. They would have no compunctions about exterminating the intruders.
Mister Data, as you are unaffected by hyperonic radiation, I'd like you to go to the planet via shuttlecraft and commence evacuation procedures.
Aye, sir.
Number One, any speculation on what we might find down there?
My guess would be a lone survey ship. Maybe a dozen or so survivors.
I think it's some sort of shuttlecraft.
Where's it from?
Look at the markings. It must be from the Federation.
Greetings, gentlemen.
We saw your ship You're the first visitor we've had in
The first visitor we've ever had.
You're not human.
That is correct. I am an android. I am Lieutenant Commander Data of the Federation Starship Enterprise.
Our great-grandparents were citizens of the Federation. But you don't want to waste time talking to us.
You want to speak to Gosheven. We'll take you to him.
I'm sure the Federation will be very proud of us. Wait until you see all we've accomplished.
And who, precisely, is us?
Don't you know? Oh, no, I don't guess you would. We're descendants of the original settlers, from the colony ship Artemis.
Got it. The Artemis. Launched ninety two years ago. Destination Septimus Minor. When they failed to check in, Starfleet began an extensive search.
What carried the Artemis
So far off course?
My local informant does not have that information. In the early days on Tau Cygna Five, survival was more important than history.
Understood. How many are there?
Fifteen thousand two hundred fifty three, sir.
Fifteen thousand!
Three days, no transporters. We'll never get them out in time.
Shuttles?
Loading all the Enterprise shuttlecraft to capacity, evacuation will take four weeks, four days.
We need more time. Mister Data, prepare the colonists for an evacuation.
Aye, sir.
Get me the Sheliak.
Their home world is quite distant, Captain. This will take some time.
Gosheven, look what's come.
Lieutenant Commander Data of the Starship Enterprise.
He's an android.
So he is. Well, now that you're here, what do you want?
My mission is to prepare this colony for evacuation.
Why?
Because this planet belongs to the Sheliak.
And who is this Sheliak?
The term is plural. The Sheliak are a non-humanoid, intelligent life form, classification R3.
Well, this colony's been here over ninety years. We've never seen a Sheliak. I'd say that makes Tau Cygna Five our planet.
The original destination of the Artemis was Septimus Minor.
The guidance system on the Artemis failed. Took them off course. Far off course. Our ancestors were lucky to find any place to land.
And when they did, the radiation started killing them.
Hyperonic radiation took the lives of a third of the colonists before they learned they could adapt to it.
But our colony survived and prospered.
Look around. We have brought water to the desert, built a community.
Your accomplishments are truly remarkable. Yet the Sheliak and the Federation have a treaty which clearly makes this planet Sheliak domain.
Then change the treaty.
That may not be possible. The Sheliak wish to colonise this planet, and are unwilling to share it with humans. If you are still here when the Sheliak colony ship arrives, they will eradicate you.
They'd kill all of us?
They have little regard for human life. Thus, the most sensible course is to prepare a contingency plan for the evacuation of your people.
We're not evacuating.
Perhaps I have not made myself clear.
Yes, you have. Let me be equally clear. There's going to be no evacuation. You've delivered your message, so go back to your ship. I have work to do.
ARD'RIAN:Nice catch. Wonderful reflexes. Sorry to test you like that, but I was curious.
Found a new toy, have we, Ardi?
ARD'RIAN:Toy? This is the most incredible android I've ever seen.
Have you seen many?
ARD'RIAN:Actually, no. You're the first.
Only you would get this excited over a walking calculator.
ARD'RIAN:Cybernetic intelligence fascinates me. Are your neural pathways duotronic?
No, positronic.
ARD'RIAN:I didn't know that was possible! What's your memory capacity? How many operations per second? I have a million questions.
I'm afraid I have no time to answer a million questions. I have a mission to accomplish. I need to know more about your people, and Gosheven seems unwilling to talk to me further.
ARD'RIAN:I'm Ard'rian McKenzie. Perhaps I can help you.
Gentlemen, we're giving you an assignment. One thing we don't want to hear is that it is impossible.
I need the transporters to function despite the hyperonic radiation.
Yeah, but that's im. Yes, sir.
Even if we get the Sheliak to talk, they're not likely to be accommodating.
Captain, when the treaty was first negotiated the Federation sent three hundred and seventy two legal experts. What do we have?
Thee and me?
No response.
Try them again. Boost the signal strength.
Sheliak Corporate. This is the starship Enterprise. Respond please.
Conversation is neither required nor desired.
Conversation is necessary if we are to find a solution to our mutual problem.
Our involvement in Federation illegality is not indicated.
Both parties are involved, sir.
Remove the humans from the Tau Cygna system. Three Earth days remain.
Let us negotiate in good faith.
Negotiate to what purpose? The treaty is signed.
There is a thriving colony on that planet. Rather than uproot these people, may I offer a compromise?
Denied.
Why?
The law is paramount. We are entitled.
This is not a law. It is a treaty. It is designed to smooth relations between peoples. Not to act as a strait
Jacket.
ARD'RIAN:You really think we'll have to leave Tau Cygna Five?
The possibility does exist, yet Gosheven seems unwilling to prepare for it. Why?
ARD'RIAN:Maybe because you're an android. I don't think Gosheven likes the idea of machines ordering him around.
I am not ordering him to do anything. I am merely trying to persuade him that his people should prepare to evacuate. Do you believe my suggested course of action should be followed?
ARD'RIAN:Of course.
In spite of the fact that I am an android?
ARD'RIAN:Because of that fact. I don't have any silly prejudice against computers. I like them. Not that any computer we have is half as sophisticated as you are.
No, I would say not.
ARD'RIAN:People can be selfish, irrational, stubborn, malicious, you name it. But computers don't have those failings.
And you conclude because of this that I am impartial. Hence, you accept my recommendations? Yet Gosheven does not.
Picard to Commander Data.
Data here.
The Sheliak won't bargain.
Understood, sir.
I'm contacting Starfleet to arrange transport. Get those people prepared to evacuation. We may have to move quickly.
Aye, sir. We must speak to Gosheven immediately.
Gentlemen, how's it coming? What the hell is that?
Our first attempt.
Keep at it. We need those transporters.
You see this? Do you have any idea what it is, or what it means?
It is water. A substance composed of two atoms of hydrogen
It's not water. It's blood and it's sweat. It's the result of a ninety years of combined effort. This isn't a town. It's a monument to every man, woman, and child who's lived and died on Tau Cygna Five.
ARD'RIAN:Gosheven, you're talking nonsense.
Am I? My grandfather is buried on that mountain. He died in a rock slide surveying the route for this aqueduct. This colony exists because of his sacrifice, and the sacrifice of thousands of others. No, we're not leaving.
The Sheliak will not accept humans on their planet, And they will not hesitate to use force to remove you.
We will not be bullied off our land. Not by you, and not by the Sheliak.
ARD'RIAN:Stubborn and irrational. Now what do we do?
Are his sentiments typical of the colonists?
ARD'RIAN:I hope not.
If I can convince enough people of the necessity of leaving
ARD'RIAN:Don't you mean, if we can convince?
Come.
Yes, sir?
Three weeks. Starfleet is profuse in their apologies, but it will still be three weeks until the arrival of a colony transport ship equipped with dedicated personnel shuttles.
We can't wait three weeks.
Then the Sheliak must agree to extend our deadline. They plan to settle Tau Cygna Five two days from now.
One of their ships must already be en route.
We're going to intercept that ship.
The Sheliak may interpret that as a hostile act.
A risk we have to take.
The Enterprise is going to try to intercept the Sheliak colony ship. Your job well, you know what your job is.
Commander.
In human parlance, I do not believe I can get the job done. My training has prepared me for starship command duties. As a cultural contact I am proving to be
Less than exemplary.
What's the situation?
Their leader refuses my counsel.
He denies the logic of my arguments and speaks of structures they have built.
Then try something else.
I have, sir.
In the last three hours and eight minutes, I have spoken to fifty six colonists. Ten of those refused to believe a threat exists. Twenty two favour staying and fighting the Sheliak. Sixteen prefer negotiation or
Some form of passive resistance. Only eight were willing to consider evacuation. And of those eight
Data, I can't help you. I don't know these people. I haven't talked to them. You have. Use that fancy
Positronic brain of yours and carry out your mission.
Sir, if I do not succeed, how violent is the Sheliak reaction likely to be?
The treaty is the only thing that prevented them from eradicating the colony the moment they discovered it.
Ah.
Ah is right, Data.
The lives of fifteen thousand people are riding on you.
You'd better get innovative. Riker out.
ARD'RIAN:Data? We're having an effect. So many people are asking questions about the Sheliak that Gosheven has called a public meeting.
Is there any indication that Gosheven has changed his position?
ARD'RIAN:No. But a meeting will give you the chance to present your recommendations.
So far, my attempts at persuasion have been ineffective.
Why did you do that?
ARD'RIAN:You appeared to need it.
Among humans, a kiss usually serves to seal a friendship, or indicate support, attraction, affection. In this context, I must assume that your intention was to express support.
ARD'RIAN:You don't really understand human behaviour, do you?
That is something of an understatement.
ARD'RIAN:Sometimes I don't either. androids are a lot more rational.
Thus far, that quality has not helped me to accomplish my mission.
ARD'RIAN:A rational argument isn't always enough. Maybe to be more persuasive, you need to use a little reverse psychology.
Elicit a desired behaviour by advocating its opposite. That implies deception, does it not?
ARD'RIAN:A little. But if it helps us get our point across.
Perhaps this is a situation where excessive honesty can be detrimental.
Now, are we progressing, Mister La Forge?
About like you'd expect, sir.
Splendid. Splendid. Carry on.
He wants the impossible.
That's the short definition of Captain.
You've all heard of the android Starfleet sent here, and you've been discussing why he's come. I've called this meeting to replace misinformation with cold, hard fact.
I wish to speak.
No. Leave now.
Do you consider your position so weak that it cannot withstand debate?
Let him talk.
You know of the Sheliak threat. Starfleet wishes to evacuate you for your own protection. Yet Gosheven has decided otherwise. That is his right, And I will not waste time trying to reverse that decision. I admire your conviction in the face of certain defeat. Though doomed, your effort will be valiant. And when you die, you will die for land and honour. Your children will understand that they are dying for a worthy cause. Long after the battle is over, their courage will be remembered and extolled.
ARD'RIAN:Remembered by who?
Yes, that is true. There will be no one left alive to remember.
A valiant try, android, but what a low opinion you must have of us.
I was simply attempting to describe your inevitable destruction in a manner that would have an emotional effect.
And he describes it pretty damned well.
Are you ready to follow this machine? Give up without a fight? He says we're going to lose, but I think that's just his cowardice talking!
What if he's right and you're wrong? Shouldn't we consider that possibility?
This colony exists because generations gave their lives for it. Many people died before we found a way to adapt to the radiation. And many more died bringing water to the desert. My grandfather
ARD'RIAN:Is buried on that mountain. Well, who'll be left to bury you?
Have you considered what this evacuation means? Everything we have, we abandon. Everything that we have built turns into dust. Everything that we have accomplished means nothing. Well, I say no. You elected me your leader. Follow me now. I don't think our chances are as hopeless as he says. And I'm willing to stake our lives on it. Any objections? Good, because here we stand.
Aye, We stand with you.
Then here you die.
Mister Data, I just want you to know that Gosheven doesn't speak for all of us. I see no reason to die needlessly.
And you?
I'm not sure. Gosheven's done well for us, but I'd like to hear more of what you have to say.
There are many others that feel the same way but they're very uneasy about confronting Gosheven.
ARD'RIAN:Get them together and we'll meet at my house.
In our dealings with other non-humanoid races there has been some point of reference. Not so with the Sheliak.
But we must have something in common. We communicate.
Barely. They have learned several Federation languages, but theirs continues to elude us.
Telepaths?
Attempted and failed. Actually, the fact that any alien race communicates with another is quite remarkable. We are stranded on a planet. We have no language in common, but I want to teach you mine.  S'smarith. What did I just say?
Cup? Glass?
Are you sure? I may have meant liquid, clear, brown, hot. We conceptualise the universe in relatively the same way.
Point taken.
In your talks, you must be extremely accurate. The treaty is five hundred thousand words. The length was to accommodate the Sheliak. They consider our language irrational, and demanded this level of complexity to avoid any future misunderstandings.
Captain, we have the vessel carrying the Sheliak colonists on visual.
On my way. So, it begins.
Hailing frequencies.
Open.
This is Captain Jean-Luc Picard of the Starship Enterprise.
Your purpose, Enterprise?
We desire face-to-face negotiation to settle the crisis on Tau Cygna Five.
Meaningless.
We are entitled to consultation under paragraph six hundred and fifty three subparagraph nine.
Granted.
Was that an invitation?
I am taking it as such. Counsellor. You have the Bridge, Number One.
Helm, maintain relative position. Mister Worf, tell transporter room two to stand by.
Aye, sir.
And once the Federation resettles us, we'll be left alone?
If you so desire.
We do. We like to do things on our own.
The Federation will offer as little or as much help as you dictate.
ARD'RIAN:Kentor, are you with us?
Yes. The question is, how do we convince Gosheven?
Why do we need to?
Because he's respected. Most people will do what he says.
ARD'RIAN:They respect you, too. If you take a stand, they'll fall in line.
I don't know. Gosheven's got a lot of supporters.
Don't forget that, Kentor. I'm disappointed. I thought we'd settled this.
Apparently, that is not correct.
Still stirring up trouble?
ARD'RIAN:Since when is talk trouble?
It's over. Don't you get it? You had your say. You lost.
I appear to be reversing that defeat.
No, you're not. You're just stubborn. Well, let me tell you something.
So am I.
ARD'RIAN:Damn you, Gosheven.
You killed him?
I've killed no one. I merely shut down a machine. That's it, everyone. It's time to go home. You'll see that I'm right.
Advance and speak.
Director, we will comply with your request to remove the colony from Tau Cygna Five, but we need time.
The given time has elapsed. We carry the membership and we will proceed with their debarkation.
The temporary presence of these humans should not interfere with your plans.
Unacceptable. You must remove the creatures.
I'm trying, but the needed ship will not be available for three weeks.
Then you are in violation.
I have admitted that. I am only asking for a little flexibility.
Section five hundred and one, paragraph seven hundred and sixteen, subparagraph five. Unwanted lifeforms inhabiting H class worlds may be removed at the discretion of the Sheliak Corporate.
We will remove them, but you must grant us the time we require.
You need time, Picard of the Enterprise? We will save you time. We will eradicate the human infestation.
They are not vermin. They are citizens of the Federation. I will not permit this outrage!
Intelligent converse is impossible. You do not discuss, you gibber.
Between intelligent species of good will
I take it the Sheliak just hung up on us again.
ARD'RIAN:I was afraid your neural pathways were scrambled beyond repair.
I am equipped with diagnostic circuits and am able to correct many malfunctions.
ARD'RIAN:I'm not surprised at Gosheven's behaviour. But Kentor and the others, they said they were with us. I guess words don't mean very much.
Perhaps that is a part of our difficulty. Words are all we have been using. Humans seem to take much stronger notice of actions. I require a phaser.
ARD'RIAN:What's a phaser?
A type of weapon. Unfortunately it does not function in the presence of hyperonic radiation. I will have to be innovative.
Hyperonic radiation randomises phaser beams. But I believe I can improvise a servocircuit which will compensate by continuously recollimating the output.
ARD'RIAN:You're using your own neural subprocessors to build a smarter phaser.
Essentially correct. Get word to Gosheven. Tell him I am coming to the pumping station. Tell him I am going to destroy the aqueduct.
ARD'RIAN:He'll try to stop you.
I sincerely hope so.
Go to yellow alert. Shields up.
Aye, sir.
Mister Riker, put us nose to nose with the Sheliak ship. Any move she makes, match it.
Aye, sir.
Mister Worf, hailing frequency.
Open. They are not responding.
They don't have to answer. They just have to listen. Sheliak vessel, you will have to get past me to get at the colony on Tau Cygna Five.
No response.
Close channel. And get me that treaty. They've been beating us over the head with it for three days. Let's see if we can't find something in it that we can turn to our own advantage.
Stop. That was the stun setting. This is not.
I can reduce this pumping station to a pile of debris, but I trust my point is clear. I am one android with a single weapon. There are hundreds of Sheliak on the way and their weapons are far more powerful. They may not offer you a target. They can obliterate you from orbit. You will die never having seen the faces of your killers. The choice is yours.
There are other places, other challenges.
I really was willing to stay here and die for this.
I know that. This is just a thing, and things can be replaced. Lives cannot.
This is hopeless. Fighting would be preferable.
That's it.
I don't follow you, sir.
Mister Worf, get me the Sheliak.
Yes, sir. Coming through, sir.
Pursuant to paragraph one thousand two hundred and ninety, I hereby formally request third party arbitration of our dispute.
You have the right.
Furthermore, pursuant to subsection D three, I name the Grisellas to arbitrate.
Grisellas?
Unfortunately, they are currently in their hibernation cycle, However, they will awaken in six months, at which time we can get this matter settled. Now, do you want to wait or give me my three weeks?
Absurd. We carry the membership. We can brook no delay.
Then I declare the treaty in abeyance,
Wait! Negotiation is permiss
You enjoyed that.
You're damned right.
Captain, they are hailing us.
Sir?
On screen.
You may have your three weeks, Picard of the Enterprise.
Thank you.
Captain, we can do it. We can modify the transporters.
Excellent.
It'll take fifteen years, and a research team of a hundred.
Mister La Forge, I believe we will postpone.
Yes, sir.
Lieutenant Commander Data to Enterprise. I am preparing to leave Tau Cygna Five and await rendezvous instructions.
Acknowledged. Stand by.
ARD'RIAN:Hi. The evacuation plan is going well. When the ship arrives, we'll be ready to leave. You succeeded.
I could not have succeeded without your support and insight. I am grateful for your assistance.
ARD'RIAN:Good. Then you won't forget me.
I am incapable of forgetting. I will remember every detail of my visit here with perfect clarity.
ARD'RIAN:But nothing more?
I do not understand.
ARD'RIAN:I guess what I really want to know is, do you have any feelings for me?
I have no feelings of any kind.
ARD'RIAN:No, of course you don't.
ARD'RIAN:What was that for?
You appeared to need it.
ARD'RIAN:So you saw I was unhappy and did what you concluded would make me feel better. Rational to the last.
ARD'RIAN:Bye.
Come. Welcome home, Mister Data. Well done.
Thank you, sir.
The good doctor was kind enough to provide me with a recording of your concert. Your performance shows feeling.
As I have recently reminded others, sir, I have no feeling.
It's hard to believe. Your playing is quite beautiful.
Strictly speaking, sir, it is not my playing. It is a precise imitation of the techniques of Jascha Heifetz and Trenka Bronken.
Is there nothing of Data in what I'm hearing? You see, you chose the violinists. Heifetz and Bronken have radically different styles, different techniques, yet you combined them successfully.
I suppose I have learned to be creative, sir, when necessary.
Mister Data, I look forward to your next concert.
Coming into position.
Stand by to dock.
Ready to dock, sir.
Engage mooring beams and lock off.
Aye sir.  And docking complete.
Thank you, Number One. Well done. And well done all.
Starbase maintenance approaching airlock five.
Commander Quinteros. Request permission to come aboard.
Granted. Welcome.
Captain.
Commander Riker.
Commander. You're late. We expected you a week ago.
We were unexpectedly delayed at Omicron Pascal.
Is there anything specific you wish to report, or that we should be aware of?
No. We are very pleased with the operation of the Enterprise.
I knew you would be - I was in charge of the team which put her together.
And are these gentlemen the Bynars?
They're not gentlemen, or ladies, Commander. They are a unified pair. They're always together. This is One Zero.  And this is Zero One.  They just finished upgrading the computers on the Wellington. Did a great job.
Your reputation precedes you. I'm very pleased you're going to be improving our system.
ONE ZERO:It is a great pleasure
ZERO ONE:to work on such a large mobile computer.
You have forty eight hours, because at forty eight plus six we have an appointment at Pelleus Five we must keep.
ZERO ONE:I thought we'd
ONE ZERO:have more time.
I'm sorry. This mission can't be delayed. If you want to postpone the work?
ZERO ONE:Oh, no. This is
ONE ZERO:the best time
ZERO ONE:to do it.
ONE ZERO:We can complete
ZERO ONE:our work within the
ONE ZERO:time allotted.
They work very quickly, but it'll be very tight.
Commander Riker and I will stay on board, be available should you need us.
Thank you, Captain. I don't think we'll need you until we're ready for inspection.
The Bynars seem perfect for this. Even though this is the first time I've ever come in contact with them.
As I understand it, over time they have become so interconnected with the master computer on their planet that their language, their thought patterns have become as close to binary as it's possible for organic beings.
It'll be interesting to see how they improve a computer as advanced as ours.
Bridge. Well, I have a little work to finish up, then I'm going to my cabin. I'm going to put my feet up, I'm going to turn on my personal relaxation light and I'm going to lose myself in the pages of some old novel. What about you, Number One? You've earned a rest.
I've never been very good at organising my time off. Something'll turn up. It always does.
I'll be in my ready room. And Number One, good work.
I thought there were only going to be two of you.
ONE ZERO:Because of the limited time allotted us
ZERO ONE:We need others
Is there a problem?
ZERO ONE:No.
ONE ZERO:No. No problem.
Then why are you acting so excited?
ZERO ONE:Because we have to
ONE ZERO:The stacking
ZERO ONE:To reconfigure the computer
ONE ZERO:To communicate with itself
ZERO ONE:More efficiently
ONE ZERO:And at higher speeds.
You act like you don't believe them.
I'm not sure that I do. Maybe it's probably nothing.
Perhaps it's just how another species behaves.
Maybe. I'm going to stroll the ship. You've got the Bridge. Keep your eye on them.
Yes, sir.
We've been challenged to a friendly game of Parrises Squares by some of the maintenance personnel. Want to join us on the starbase?
You've already got all the players you need.
We can switch off.
No, you know if you do that in Parrises Squares you lose the rhythm of the game.
I can't talk you into coming with us?
No. But win, all right? The pride of the Enterprise goes with you.
Rest assured, Commander, we will be victorious. At whatever the cost.
Worf, it's just a game. A little friendly competition, You work up a sweat, you have a few laughs, and you make new friends.
If winning is not important, then, Commander, why keep score?
I think he's pulling your leg. Believe it or not, Worf is developing a sense of humour.
I hope so, for their sake.
Computer. There's a power reduction in section L-Ninety Four. Explain.
Unoccupied sections are being closed down in order to clear space in the main computer banks. It is necessary to facilitate the system upgrade. Full power can be restored if needed.
Well, what do you think?
Tell me what it's supposed to be, then I'll give you my opinion.
It is an attempt at pure creativity.
What we're investigating is, can Data be creative?
And this is my attempt, with guidance from Geordi.
I suggested the zylo eggs.
Is that what those are?
Keep notes. This project might turn out to be of interest to scholars in the future.
Really?
Well of course. Think about it. A blind man teaching an android how to paint? That's got to be worth a couple of pages in somebody's book.
You look like you're packing to leave forever.
Oh, Commander Riker. No, I'm just gathering my notes. Professor Terence Epstein is at this starbase.
Is that someone I should know of?
He's the leading mind in cybernetics. He lectured at my medical school. You know the disaster at Micromius?
Well, since then I've been working on an approach that combines cybernetics and regeneration. It sounds impossible, I know, but I have found an approach which will work. I mean, what an opportunity. To have a chance to talk with Doctor Epstein. Sorry, Will, I'd love to chat, but I have to go.
How's it going?
ZERO ZERO:We are almost done.
ONE ONE:The deviation
ZERO ZERO:caused by a previous
ONE ONE:probe has been corrected
ZERO ZERO:You may use the equipment
ONE ONE:anytime you wish.
How much has been changed? What exactly did you do?
ONE ONE:Enhancement.
ZERO ZERO:Nothing more.
ZERO ZERO:Would you like to try
ONE ONE:the enhancement?
All right. What should I choose? Computer, I'd like some place to play some music. A little atmosphere.
Specify.
Jazz.
Era?
Circa 1958.
Location.
Kansas City. No, wait. New Orleans. Bourbon Street Bar, New Orleans. Around two a.m.
Programme complete. Enter when ready.
Very good. Very good indeed. Now I'll need someone to play with. A trio. Piano, bass and drums, and a 'bone for me.
Now an audience. Whoa. Too many. I was thinking of something a little more intimate.
Great job, boys. But, computer, blondes and jazz seldom go together.  Now that is truly exceptional. But more sultry.
Gentlemen, if this is what you call enhancement, you've got a gift for understatement.
What's your name? Tell me you love jazz.
My name is Minuet and I love all jazz except Dixieland.
Why not Dixieland?
You can't dance to it.
My girl. What's a knockout like you doing in a computer-generated gin joint like this?
Waiting for you.
Waiting for me? You can't be serious.
Oh yes, Will. I've never been more serious in my life.
Can I ask you a question about the Bynars?
Why not just ask them?
What is that high-speed sound you make?
ZERO ONE:That is our
ONE ZERO:primary language.
How can you process information at that speed?
ZERO ONE:We store the information
ONE ZERO:with these buffers.
ZERO ONE:We receive information
ONE ZERO:all the time
ZERO ONE:and save it
ONE ZERO:until we need it.
How did you happen to develop this ability?
ONE ZERO:It happened over
ZERO ONE:a long period of time.
To have a society so intermixed on computers has tremendous advantages.
ONE ZERO:And a few
ZERO ONE:disadvantages.
Everything under control, Ensign Crusher?
Fine, Captain. I was just trying to find something about the Bynars.
Where's Commander Riker?
He's in holodeck four. Shall I call him for you, sir?
No, I'll go down there myself. Keep me apprised.
Yes, sir.
Hey, man, the chick digs you.
What makes you say that?
Hey, look at her.
Maybe it's my music.
Yeah, well, about that. Don't give up your day job.
Too real.
You got that straight, Slim. Too real is too right.
Thanks for letting me sit in.
Ain't nothin' to it.
I'm going to have to leave for a while to see to my duties.
Your work's very important to you.
It is me. It's what I am.
Can we dance once before you leave?
Sure, why not.  How did you learn to dance so well?
From following you. I can anticipate your lead. So, tell me about your work. What is it about it that consumes and enthralls you?
Interesting choice of words. That's exactly what it does.
You're very fortunate.
I know that.
To be exactly where you want to be. And it's great that you realise it.
I'd be a fool not to realise how lucky I am to be on this ship serving with these people. It's like a dream come true. Just like this.
A dream? Is that what this is? Is that what I am?
I know you are a computer-generated image, but your smell, your touch, the way you feel. Even the things you say and think seem so real.
Thank you.
How far can this relationship go? I mean, how real are you?
As real as you need me to be.
Astounding.
Captain.
Oh, I'm sorry, Number One. I didn't mean to interrupt.
No, it's all right. Come on in.
You picked a wonderful locale. This is something I might have chosen myself.
Aren't you going to introduce me?
Captain Picard, this is Minuet. Minuet, Captain Jean-Luc Picard.
Enchantee. Comme c'est merveilleux de vous voir ici.
Incroyable! Vous etes Parisienne?
Au fond, c'est vrai, nous sommes tous Parisiens.
Oui, au fond, nous sommes tous Parisiens. The spirit of that city can always enchant my soul.
I have been hoping to meet you.
Oh. Have I been the subject of conversation?
Indirectly. Come, join us, Jean-Luc. A glass of wine?
Thank you.
Will was saying how much he enjoys this assignment. It's a credit to you. For a ship and crew to function well it always starts with the Captain. You set the tone.
At the moment, it's you who are setting the tone. The sophistication of this programming is remarkable.
In what way?
The holodeck has been able to give us woodlands and ski slopes, figures that fight and fictional characters with which we can interact, but you, you're very different. You adapt. You spoke to me in French.
It was very simple. When I heard your name, I merely accessed the foreign language bank.
That's very impressive.
Oui, mon chou.
Now what are you doing?
I am awaiting inspiration.
Commander Data?
This is Commander Data. Go ahead, please.
I'm getting an indication of possible trouble in main Engineering, sir.
Can you be more specific?
I'm afraid not. I'm reading a problem with the magnetic containment field which contains the antimatter. Could you come up here?
We'll go to Engineering since that's where the trouble is. Wes, don't disturb the Captain or Commander Riker until we check this out.
Aye, sir.
Bridge, this is main Engineering.
This is the Bridge.
Are you running any test programs up there?
No.
Are the Bynars?
Not to my knowledge. Is there a problem?
I don't know. There's no one on duty here, and we're getting some very strange readings from the magnetic containment field.
The field is deteriorating. Contact the captain immediately. I am initiating Red Alert.
Data, I can't maintain the integrity of the containment field.
Engineering to Captain.  If the antimatter is released, the ship will be destroyed.
Nothing I do has any effect. I'm losing it. Data, I've rechecked every circuit. This is not a misread by the computer.
Computer, situation analysis.
Estimate release of antimatter in four minutes eighteen seconds. Seventeen seconds. Sixteen seconds.
Engineering to Bridge.
This is the bridge.
Alert starbase. Inform them we are abandoning the ship. Tell them why. Initiate automated sequence for departure. Set course and speed course and speed to put maximum distance between the Enterprise and any inhabited planets.
Shouldn't we wait for the Captain's approval?
There is no time.
Based on all information presently available, the decision is correct. This is Lieutenant Commander Data speaking for the Captain. Abandon ship. This is not a drill. All personnel. This is not a drill.  I say again, abandon ship. All personnel, this is not a drill.
Abandon ship.
Decks two through four to cargo transporters. Decks five through ten, proceed to transporters one, two, three and four. Decks six through sixteen, proceed to transporters five, six, seven, eight, nine and ten.
Hold your positions please. Prepare to energise. And energise.
Decks seventeen through twenty eight proceed to transporters eleven, twelve, thirteen and fourteen.
Decks twenty nine through forty two, proceed to transporters fifteen, sixteen, seventeen, eighteen, nineteen and twenty. This is not a drill. This is not a drill.
What's going on?
Please stand out of the way.
The Enterprise is being evacuated.
Why?
Some problem in Engineering.
Get a Security team together.
Aye, Lieutenant.
Ship's log, supplemental. This is Lieutenant Commander Data. I have put the ship on automated departure and ordered the complete evacuation of the Enterprise. Everyone remaining is leaving on foot or beaming off.
Computer, where are the Captain and Commander Riker?
All decks empty.
Curious. The Captain is usually the last to leave.
Let's go. We've only got forty one seconds.
I think we're the last.
I hope we are.
Did you see the Captain and Commander Riker?
No. Are they not here on Starbase?
No, we thought
You mean they're still on the Enterprise?
Yes. Sir, where is your transporter room?
We have to beam back and get them.
You haven't time.
This is Starbase 74. The Enterprise magnetic field is regenerating.
Wait a minute. How is that possible?
Unknown.
That changes nothing. The Captain and Commander Riker must be in trouble, or they'd be here.
Look. Your ship is almost clear.
And the boy never found out?
Oh, yes, but not until later when he came back into the room with his little sister.
I'll bet both of them were all smiles.
Yes, but by that time both of them had been found out.
You handled that in a very thoughtful way. You're very good with people. Don't you agree, Jean-Luc?
She's so very different from the images we've experienced on the holodeck, isn't she? She's more intuitive.
It's as though she's been plugged into my subconscious. She already knows what I want her to say before I'm aware of it myself.
I suppose it's an understandable progression. Computers make decisions based on inputs and we humans give off a multitude of subtle signs that communicate our emotions.
It's uncanny. I could develop feelings for Minuet, exactly as I would for any woman.
Doesn't love always begin that way? With the illusion being more real than the woman?
Oh, Jean-Luc, spoken like a true Frenchman.
Well, I think I'll be leaving.
Oh, don't go.
Two's company.
We have time. There's no rush. I'd really like it if you would stay.
Yes, Captain, stay.
This is your diversion, Number One, not mine.
Wait! We haven't danced.
I don't dance.
Then some more wine.
No, thank you.
Wait! Please! Please, don't go. You can't. Not yet.
Why? What's the matter? Why can't he leave?
Exit!
Captain to Bridge. Situation report.
Riker to Bridge.
Computer, explain Red Alert.
Initiated as a programmed response. The magnetic field containing the antimatter had weakened. There was no fail-safe available.
Why wasn't I notified?
Unknown.
Present condition?
The magnetic field is now restored. Containment is restored. Propulsion is at maximum efficiency.
Locate Lieutenant Commander Data.
Not on board the Enterprise.
Explain.
All Enterprise personnel except the Captain and First Officer have been evacuated.
Evacuated? Was the condition that critical?
Yes.
Are we still docked at the starbase?
No.
Position report.
Co-ordinates four one five nine point two six by eight one nine two one by three one two. Heading two three three mark four five.
Destination?
Planet Bynaus in the Beta Magellan system.
The Bynars.
Am I to understand the Bynars have stolen the Enterprise?
That information is not available.
It's the Bynars, and you're part of this.
Yes.
They made you the lure to keep me here. They programmed you while I was relaxing.
Yes. When they saw your interest in me, they thought I could distract you and keep you here.
That explains, Riker. What about me?
Your being here was just a fortunate happenstance.
Why do they want with me?
What do they want with the Enterprise? What's their purpose?
I'm not programmed to give you that information.
Come on, Number One. We've got to regain control of our ship.
Okay, so what do we do?
Which is the nearest Starfleet vessel?
The Trieste.
I know the Trieste. Too small, too slow.
Plus it's sixty six hours away.
Where are the Bynars?
I haven't seen them.
They are obviously still aboard. Another Starfleet vessel must be sent to intercept the Enterprise at Bynaus. They might be taking the ship to their home planet.
What makes you think so?
It is the best place for us to start.
Picard. Access.
Captain's log, supplemental. We now know who has commandeered the Enterprise. The Bynars. We can't communicate with the Bridge. Commander Riker and I will now try to regain control of our ship.
This way.
That's toward Engineering.
That's our first stop. Verify containment and initiate auto-destruct.
Initiate auto-destruct?
Our ship has been commandeered by a force of unknown size and intent. We're here alone. We must assume the worst.
If we don't regain control, then no one else must have it either. Now, this is the one decision involving the operation of this vessel which requires you and I to be in total agreement.
It's the time allotted that concerns me.
As to that, there's no option.
I know. It's a five minute countdown.
That's sufficient to get to the Bridge. Once there, either we'll get control of the ship and shut off the auto-destruct, or we won't. This vessel must not fall into hostile hands.
Then let's set it and get going.
Recognise Picard, Jean-Luc, Captain. Recognise Riker, William T, Commander.
Set auto-destruct sequence.
Does the First Officer concur?
Yes. Set auto-destruct sequence. Now.
Auto-destruct will detonate in four minutes and fifty-nine seconds.
The only place we can stop this is on the Bridge. Let's go.
What do you make of this, sir?
An enormous amount of data is being received and stored in the main computer.
Just stored. Why?
It's another piece to of puzzle.
Bridge access denied.
They've locked it off. We must find another way to get in.
One of us could beam into the Bridge.
No, it takes several seconds to materialise. You wouldn't stand a chance.
I could beam into the turbolift, force the doors, take them by surprise.
No, we'll both beam in simultaneously in two different areas of the Bridge. With luck one of us will be a distraction.
There must be only four minutes left.
Still no response from the Enterprise.
They would answer if they could. Someone else has control of the ship.
Do you think I am responsible?
Responsible? How could you possibly have known?
My station is on the Bridge.
You can't be on the Bridge every second, Data.
You are wrong, Geordi. I can. I do not need rest or diversion. I should not have been painting. I was negligent.
It's a pointless discussion, Data. You could have been on the Bridge and it still might have happened. Commander Quinteros, you have three ships in here. We need one of them now.
We're rushing repairs on the USS Melbourne, but it's still eighteen hours until she'll be ready. There's nothing else you can do.
Set coordinates for main Bridge. Port forward for me and aft for you.
You're on pad two. I've set a ten second delay.
Set phasers on stun. Number One, good luck.
Over here, Captain.
Why did you steal my ship?
ONE ZERO:Please try to
ZERO ONE:help us.
Cancel auto-destruct.
Does the First Officer agree?
Affirmative.
Auto-destruct cancelled.
We're in orbit around Bynaus. How are they?
They appear dead. Let's see if we can get some answers from Bynaus.
Their main computer is off. All sensors reveal that all of the equipment on the planet is inert. They can neither receive nor send any messages.
What about all the people in that world who are totally dependant on their computer? Are they still functioning?
They're probably like these Bynars here. Dying. What is this all about? Why did they steal the ship and bring it here? What is their purpose?
They went to an awful lot of trouble to clear computer space. Let's see what they've stored.
Captain, it's enormous. Every byte of free space in the computer has been filled. They must have made a core-dump from their world to our computer. I can't get in. I wish they'd left a note.
Maybe they did.
Minuet.
Maybe.
Tell me what this is all about.
A star in the Bynar system went supernova and they miscalculated. The electromagnetic pulse from the explosion was going to knock out their main computer.
So their only choice was to transfer all the stored information and shut down until after it passed. And then reactivate their system and transfer the information back to this main computer.
The Enterprise has the only mobile computer large enough to handle all that information.
So what went wrong? Why are they dying?
The star went supernova before it was expected, and you were late arriving at Starbase 74.
Why didn't they say something? Why didn't they just ask for help?
I don't know. I don't have those answers.
Is there anything we can do?
Yes. Return the data stored on the Enterprise's computer back to the one on Bynaus.
How can we do that?
You don't know?
Yes. If we had the file name. But we don't. Do you?
I don't know what you're talking about.
They wouldn't intentionally hide it or make it difficult for us to find. It must be right in front of our faces.
We should call Starbase 74, and see if anyone can decipher this.
They're dying. They meant you no harm. It was their world they were trying to save. Help them, Will. Hurry. Please.
Starbase 74, this is the Enterprise. Do you read me?
This is Starbase 74. Captain Picard, what is your situation?
We'll go into that later. Right now I must speak to Lieutenant Commander Data.
I am here, sir.
Data, the Bynars have stored an enormous amount of material in our computer. We need to access it. We can't.
The access would be available by code or password.
Yes, I know that, Data, but what could it be?
File names can be anything, sir.
They want us to find it. They would have kept it simple.
Then a name, or a place. It could be something personal. In this case, in binary language, which is ones and zeros in groups of eight or sixteen characters.
Would they have kept it that simple? Try it. Picard out.
That's the file. It'll work now.
Now access the file. Start the transfer.
So much for that idea.
Let me get on the other position. The Bynars always work in pairs. Maybe that is also required. It appears to be successful. Their system's started up. A resident diagnostic programme is running. Their system is absolutely incredible.
ZERO ONE:Our world
ONE ZERO:is reactivated.
ZERO ONE:Our people
ONE ZERO:express their gratitude.
ZERO ZERO:We will return to
ONE ONE:your starbase for whatever
ZERO ZERO:punishment your system
ONE ONE:requires of us.
Why didn't you just ask for our help?
ZERO ONE:You might have
ONE ZERO:said no.
But there was a very good chance we would have said yes.
ZERO ZERO:Our need was too great
ONE ONE:to risk rejection.
So you stole it.
Their reason is part of their binary thinking. For them there are only two choices. One or zero. Yes or no. Why did you lure me to the holodeck and hold me there.
ONE ZERO:Because we knew we might die.
ZERO ONE:And we needed someone
ONE ZERO:to restore our computer.
ZERO ONE:And you did.
No one has been hurt. You have achieved your objective. You have your planet back in order. We have our ship. Well, it's been some time since I had the conn. But not to worry, Number One, you're in good hands. Starbase 74, warp two. Engage. Everything's under control.
USS Enterprise has cleared the starbase perimeter.
Is everything all right?
We're fine. Everything is in order. But now, I want a complete check, all systems, all divisions.
What about the Bynars?
Turn them over to Quinteros. There will be a hearing.
ZERO ONE:We understood that
ONE ZERO:would happen.
Follow me, please.
While these things are being checked, permission to leave the Bridge, sir.
Permission granted.
What is a knockout like you doing in a computer generated gin joint like this?
You're not Minuet.
She's gone. I tried variations of the programme, others appeared, but not Minuet.
Maybe it was all part of the Bynar's programming. But you know, Number One, some relationships just can't work.
Yes, probably true. She'll be difficult to forget.
Reduce to half impulse.
Reducing velocity to one half impulse.
Come. Ah, Number One. Look at this. Ever since we left the Lima Sierra system, I have been puzzling over how the third planet could maintain such an orbit, when it is theoretically impossible. But consider this.
There's no degeneration.
Exactly.
Why?
Why? I haven't a clue.
Perhaps this facsimile lacks the proper mass.
Perhaps, but if this is an accurate representation, it could explain what happened in that system.
Perhaps.
Well, not a matter of great moment, just a knot I had to untie. So, what do you want to see me about?
We've arrived at Ramatis Three.
Oh well, time to leave.
Standard orbit, Mister Crusher.
Standard orbit.
Mister Data, you have the Bridge.
Transporter room five. I'm still a little uncomfortable with your leading this away team.
This is not an away team, Commander. I consider this a ceremonial function. For me not to go could be construed as lack of interest.
You will be careful, sir
Oh, cluck, cluck, Number One.
Sir?
You're being a mother hen. I appreciate your concern. Actually I'm looking forward to meeting this mediator.
We came a long way to get him.
They wanted the best. That, according to all reports, is Riva.
If he can put an end to all the years of blood-letting on those planets, I think we should do everything in our power to assist him.
Our job is not to police the galaxy.
Isn't that my speech, Number One? No, of course you're right. We must not get involved.
Coordinates have been input, sir.
Have your sensors indicated any problem down there, Lieutenant?
None.
But you're feeling a certain confusion about this mission.
No.
Yes. I've never known you to have such strong emotions, except when you're expecting to do battle.
I am not expecting battle.
Then what is bothering you?
Riva.
Ah. Riva negotiated several treaties between the Klingons and the Federation.
Before him, there was no Klingon word for peacemaker.
Then I can understand why you're feeling uneasy.
Now look, this is a simple ceremonial greeting, nothing more. All right?
Aye, sir.
Energise.
Captain, this is the Enterprise.
We've arrived safely, Number One, but so far we've been ignored. I'll keep you informed.
I would appreciate it.
Captain.
Sir.
Riva.
Please, come closer. Before I start, is there anything you need? Food, refreshments?
Thank you, no.
Then proceed.
Greetings from the United Federation of Planets. I am Captain Jean Luc Picard, of the USS Enterprise. This is Counsellor Troi. Lieutenant Worf.
Greetings.
Welcome to Ramatis.
I have been expecting you.
You are empathic.
Yes.
Then although you already know my feelings toward you, allow me to put them into words. I am looking forward to this journey, now more than ever, because it gives me the chance to be in your company.
I am flattered. I too am look forward to learning more about you.
There are aspects to Riva of which we have not been informed.
Precisely. Our way of communicating has developed over the centuries and its one that I find quite harmonious.
Then Riva the mediator
Is deaf.
Deaf?
Born, and hope to die.
And the three of you speak for him?
Yes.
We serve as translators. We convey not only his thoughts, but his emotional intent as well. I am the Scholar. I represent the intellect, and speak in matters of judgement, philosophy, logic. Also, I am the dreamer, the part that longs to see the beauty beyond the truth which is always the first duty of art. I am the poet who
Artists, they tend to ramble, neglect the moment. I am passion, the libido. I am the anarchy of lust, the romantic and the lover. I am also the warrior, the perfect line which never wavers.
I am that which binds all the others together. I am harmony, wisdom, balance.
Remarkable. And so these
Speak to me!
What?
Speak directly to me.
The uniqueness of this presentation provoked this inadvertent breach in protocol. No insult was intended.
Then none is perceived.
I'm curious about how this rare form of communication came about.
The gene for hearing is not present in my planet's ruling line.
Not that unusual, indeed it is similar to the House of Hanover of your planet Earth, all who had haemophilia. Or the leaders of Fendaus Five, who were without limbs.
Many of the galaxy's greatest contributors have been similarly special.
My Chorus is so attuned, they can hear my thoughts and translate to you. It is a relationship which goes back for centuries. Their ancestors provided the same service to my ancestors.
Your method of communication is most elegant and quite beautiful.
It takes a fine mind to realise that, Counsellor Troi.
This part of you doesn't speak very often.
Only when the spirit moves me.
Riva, if you are ready, the situation at Solais Five is very critical. We should not delay.
Very well.
With your permission, Captain.
Make it so, Mister Worf.
Enterprise, this is the away team. Seven to beam up.
O'BRIEN:Commander Riker. The away team, plus four, is on board.
Acknowledged. Ensign, set your course for Solais Five.
Course is set.
Velocity, warp eight.
Warp eight, aye.
Engage, Ensign.
Yes, sir.
What is this?
Riva id deaf. These three speak for him. Treat them as interpreters. Address yourselves directly to Riva. Now, may I present my First Officer.
First, Captain, may I say it is an honour to be on board such a fine vessel. Now, please, continue with the introductions.
This is my First Officer, Commander Riker.
It is an honour to meet you.
Lieutenant Commander Data.
It is a pleasure to meet such a unique individual.
Thank you.
Lieutenant La Forge.
It is my pleasure to meet you, sir.
What is that you're wearing?
A visor. It interprets the electromagnetic spectrum and then carries the readings to my brain.
And without it, can you see?
Without it I'm as blind as a stump.
Then your visor serves the same function as my Chorus, which interprets my thoughts and translates them into sound?
Yes.
And you don't resent it?
The visor or being blind?
Either.
No, since they're both part of me, and I really like who I am, there's no reason for me to resent either one.
What is your position on the ship?
I'm the Chief Engineer, sir.
It's a blessing to understand we are special, each in his own way.
Yes. Yes, that's the way I feel exactly.
I offer the hospitality of my vessel. And at your convenience, there is a briefing on the Solari wars. If you wish, I'll have you conducted to your quarters.
Thank you.
Perhaps, if it is not inconvenient, Counsellor Troi could escort me. With your permission.
This way.
What about you?
At times like this, we become an encumbrance.
So, if you have rooms for us?
Lieutenant Worf will escort you.
Riva's not what I expected.
Much of what we do is similar.
Yes, I suppose in a way it is.
We have both learned how to allow people to examine feelings hidden deep within their psyche. In fact, with you here now is provoking an emotional revelation.
You mean some emotion buried in your psyche?
Well, not that deep.
Exactly what are you feeling?
Can't you tell?
Some of it.
Well I feel that soon, perhaps after the briefing by your Captain, that you will be hungry, and that perhaps we could dine together and compare experiences.
I'd like that.
As will I.
Will he be with us?
Well, until we find our own method of communication.
I look forward to that time.
As do I.
I'm sorry, Data. Begin the briefing.
The factions on Solais Five are historical enemies. So many have died that both societies are on the verge of extinction.
Enough. Thank you, Captain, there is no need to continue. The specific issues of the conflict have no relevance.
So none of the background which we have provided would be helpful in understanding why they continue to fight?
The portfolio will indicate that the conflict is over a piece of land, or wealth, or some other tangible asset. But we both know that is not the case.
They've been at war for so long, it has become personal.
Exactly. The basis for peace must also be personal. This is an historic confrontation, correct?
The factions have been at war for fifteen centuries.
What's changed?
I do not know what you mean.
They have been killing each other for a long time, now they want to talk peace. So something about this situation has recently changed. What's the new piece to the puzzle?
Data?
Unknown, sir.
Perhaps they have run out of people to kill. In any case, whatever the reason, peace is now preferred, which should make your job easier.
Well, if not easier, at least possible, for now they are motivated. But it doesn't matter. I'll find something. I always have.
Always?
To date, I have never failed. Now, unless there is something else?
No. This is for your benefit.
Then, thank you for your time and effort.
I believe I have to get ready for a dinner appointment.
If you will excuse me.
Yes, of course. The meeting is adjourned.
Our mediator is very self assured. We'll know soon enough if he can deliver.
We're approaching Solais Five.
Half impulse.
Slowing to one half impulse.
The sound of this ship is quite remarkable. Can't you feel it?
Yes.
It moves through my body like a great pulse.
I've grown so accustomed to it, I forget it's there.
It's easy to let that happen. Sometimes we must allow the surroundings to flow over us, to dwell on each separate part, how it feels, to allow it to fill you.
How do we communicate? I know you can read lips, but I need your words.
Words are here on top. What's under them, their meaning, is what's important. Yes, that's true. We both know how to express important words, like dream. Being here with you. Yes, being here with you know is very special to me, too.
Standard orbit.
Captain, I'm reading laser activity on the Solais Five.
How concentrated is the activity?
It is localised, but very intense.
So much for the cease fire.
Hailing frequencies.
I'm receiving one side only.
This is Captain Jean Luc Picard, commander of the Federation starship USS Enterprise. If you continue to violate the cease fire, I will abort this mission.
ALIEN 1:You have no jurisdiction here, Picard. Where is Riva?
Riva is in charge of the summit. I command the ship that brings him. I will not endanger this ship under any circumstances.
The other faction is breaking through, sir.
ALIEN 2:Riva gave his word we would speak to no one else. Now who breaks the rules? Where is Riva?
I shall summon him for you. Get Riva here.
Counsellor Troi, please have Riva report to the Bridge.
They need you on the Bridge, now.
The cease fire has been broken.
I'm sure I can resolve that. Put them on the viewscreen.
Viewer on.
The quality of the transmission is very poor.
It is sufficient.
Brothers. Your bravery as fighters is known. Now you must demonstrate courage in a new way. Cease hostilities. Allow us to meet.
The laser fire has ceased.
For how long? These Solari don't seem likely candidates for peace.
I will need to see a topographical overlay of the battle area in order to pick a site for the meetings. Then I will need your help in creating the proper setting.
Worf, prepare your security team.
Yes, sir.
That's not necessary.
But it is prudent.
I prefer to arrive with the smallest possible complement. We do not want to add to an already tense situation.
If that is your judgement, so be it. We are here to provide whatever service you require.
Thank you, Captain.
There. beam us down to that hilltop and inform the factions to join us. The time for killing is come to an end.
Phasers on stun, Mister Worf.
You won't need those.
I'm sure we won't. Energise.
Yes, this will do. It is important that we set this up properly. Commander. If it be possible, I would like torches here and here.
Engineering.
This is the away team.
Yes, Commander.
We are going to need your help.
I thought you might.
We would like two torches. Head high?  And what else?
A table here.
Describe it.
Three sided, and if possible made to resemble indigenous rock.
Did you read that, Geordi?
I did. That should be no problem.
When will the emissaries arrive?
It shouldn't be too long.
And how long do you think the negotiations will take?
They won't go quickly.
They're coming, Commander.
The first few minutes will be very tense. Please stay calm, and do not respond even if you are provoked.
We'll do our best.
ALIEN 1:Who is Riva?
I am Riva.
Be at ease. I commend you both. To come here proves not only your courage, but your wisdom. Please, give this conference a chance.
I have no magic. You have been fighting all your lives. You know only
ALIEN 3:No, no, never! Death first!
Riva!
ALIEN 2:Don't! Traitor!
ALIEN 2:No, wait. Wait.
Away team to Enterprise. Beam us up. Now!
ALIEN 2:His words are not mine. Please, Riva.
ALIEN 2:We need you. We need you!
How did this happen?
A total surprise. Apparently a member of one of the factions didn't like the idea of peace.
I don't understand what you're trying to say. Counsellor?
Riva, go slowly. Slowly.
Can you write it out? I am so sorry that your friends were killed. I'm sorry, I don't know what you are trying to tell me. We have to find some way to communicate with him. Data, he knows some kind of gestural language. Find our which one and learn it.
Aye, sir.
Counsellor, take him to Sickbay. Maybe Pulaski can help.  Listen to me. You are not alone. Do you understand? We are all in this together now.
Captain's log, supplemental. We are monitoring increased military activity on Solais Five. I fear that without Riva, we will be unable to keep the Solari from destroying themselves.
How's it going?
